


 KANSAS CITY LIFE VARIABLE LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT (Form: NSAR-U, Received: 02/28/2013 16:27:02) 














	 


	 






	FORM N-SAR-U







	SEMI-ANNUAL REPORT







	FOR REGISTERED INVESTMENT COMPANIES







	Report for fiscal year ending:  12/31/12







	Is this a transition report?  N







	Is this an amendment to a previous filing?  N







	Those items or sub-items with a box after the item should be completed only if the answer has changed from the previous filing on this form.











	1.






	A.  Registrant Name: KANSAS CITY LIFE VARIABLE LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT




	B.  File Number: 811-9080




	C.  Telephone Number: (816)753-7000



	 







	2.






	A.  Street: 3520 BROADWAY




	B.  City: KANSAS CITY




	C.  State: MO




	D.  Zip Code: 64111 Zip Ext: 2565



	 







	3.






	Is this the first filing on this form by Registrant?  N



	 







	4.






	Is this the last filing on this form by Registrant?  N



	 







	5.






	Is Registrant a small business investment company (SBIC)?  N




	(If answer is“Y”, complete only items 89 through 110.)



	 







	6.






	Is Registrant a unit investment trust (UIT)?  Y




	(If answer is "Y" complete only items 111 through 132.)



	 







	7.






	A.   Is Registrant a series of multiple portfolio company?  N




	(If answer is "N" (No), go to item 8.)



	 










	For period ending 12/31/12







	File number 811-9080







	UNIT INVESTMENT TRUSTS











	111.






	A.  Depositor Name: KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY




	C.  City: KANSAS CITY State: MO Zip Code: 64111 Zip Ext: 2565



	 







	112.






	Not Applicable.



	 







	113.






	Not Applicable.



	 







	114.






	A.  Principal Underwriter Name: SUNSET FINANCIAL SERVICES, INC.




	B.  File Number: 8-14148




	C.  City: KANSAS CITY State: MO Zip Code: 64111 Zip Ext: 6139



	 







	115.






	A.  Independent Public Accountant Name: KPMG LLP




	B.  City: OMAHA State: NE Zip Code: 68102 Zip Ext: 1626



	 







	116.






	Family of investment companies information:




	A.  Is Registrant part of a family of investment companies?  N



	 







	117.






	A.  Is Registrant a separate account of an insurance company?  Y




	If answer is "Y", are any of the following types of contracts funded by the Registrant?:




	B.  Variable annuity contracts?  N




	C.  Scheduled premium variable life contracts?  N




	D.  Flexible premium variable life contracts?  Y




	E.  Other types of insurance products registered under the Securities Act of 1933?  N



	 







	118.






	State the number of series existing at the end of the period that had securities registered under the Securities Act of 1933:  1



	 







	119.






	State the number of new series for which registration statements under the Securities Act of 1933 became effective during the period:  0



	 







	120.






	State the total value of the portfolio securities on the date of deposit for the new series included in item 119 ($000's omitted):  N/A



	 







	121.






	State the number of series for which a current prospectus was in existence at the end of the period:  1



	 







	122.






	State the number of existing series for which additional units were registered under the Securities Act of 1933 during the current period:  0



	 







	123.






	State the total value of the additional units considered in answering item 122 ($000's omitted):  $0



	 







	124.






	State the total value of units of prior series that were placed in the portfolios of subsequent series during the current period (the value of these units is to be measured on the date they were placed in the subsequent series)( $000‘s omitted):  $0



	 







	125.






	State the total dollar amount of sales loads collected (before reallowances to other brokers or dealers) by Registrant’s principal underwriter and any underwriter which is an affiliated person of the principal underwriter during the current period solely from the sale of units of all series of Registrant ($000‘s omitted):  $0



	 







	126.






	Of the amount shown in item 125, state the total dollar amount of sales loads collected from secondary market operation in Registrant’s units (include the sales loads, if any, collected on units of a prior series placed in the portfolio of a subsequent series.)($000‘s omitted):  $0



	 







	127.






	List opposite the appropriate description below the number of series whose portfolios are invested primarily (based upon a percentage of NAV) in each type of security shown, the aggregate total assets at market value as of a date at or near the end of the current period of each such group of series and the total income distributions made by each such group of series during the current period (excluding distributions of realized gains, if any):







	 






	 





	Number of Series Investing






	Total Assets ($000's omitted)






	Total Income Distributions ($000's omitted)







	 




	 




	 




	 







	A.  U.S. Treasury direct issue





	 




	 




	 







	B.  U.S. Government agency





	 




	 




	 







	C.  State and municipal tax-fee





	 




	 




	 







	D.  Public utility debt





	 




	 




	 








	E.  Brokers or dealers debt or debt of brokers' or


	dealers' parent






	 




	 




	 







	F.  All other corporate intermed. & long-term debt





	 




	 




	 







	G.  All other corporate short-term debt





	 




	 




	 







	H.  Equity securities of brokers or dealers or parent of broker or dealers





	 




	 




	 







	I.  Investment company equity securities






	1






	$97,015






	$3,041








	J.  All other equity securities





	 




	 




	 







	K.  Other securities





	 




	 




	 







	L.  Total assets of all series of registrant





	 




	 




	 







	  








	128.






	Is the timely payment of principal and interest on any of the portfolio securities held by any of Registrant's series at the end of the current period insured or guaranteed by an entity other than the issuer?  N




	(If answer if "N", go to item 131.)



	 







	129.






	Not Applicable.



	 







	130.






	Not Applicable.



	 







	131.






	Total expenses incurred by all series of Registrant during the current reporting period ($000's omitted)   $7,959








	132.






	List the “811” (Investment Company Act of 1940) registration number for all Series of Registrant that are being included in this filing:



	 







	 


























Insurance Designers of Kansas City- Life Insurance









HOME
ABOUT US
CONTACT US




























HOME
ABOUT US

INSURANCE PRODUCTS

Life Insurance
Annuities
Long Term Care
Disability Insurance
Critical Illness


CONTRACTING
APPLICATIONS & FORMS
UNDERWRITING
ADVANCED MARKETING
AGENT DESKTOP
RESOURCE CENTERCONTACT US

 Like us on Facebook
Follow @idakansas




 


POPULAR
  QUICKLINKS




LIFE QUOTES
 iGO e-APP
AML TRAINING
AGENT DESKTOP
RESOURCE CENTER
ANNUITY RATE WATCH
CARRIER FORMS


















LIFE INSURANCE





Permanent Products
 Permanent Quotes
Term Products
Term Quotes
Winflex Web
Carrier Information

As a leader in life insurance brokerage, Insurance Designers of Kansas City can help you better understand your options, how coverage works, and where you can get a policy that best meets your client's needs and budget. Through a diversity of carriers and products, you and your clients can have the most competitive insurance solution and rate to match each specific situation.
For questions on Life Insurance Products, Carriers 
                                      or Illustration Support,Contact Steve Reiter



UNIVERSAL LIFE
Universal Life is a flexible-premium, adjustable benefit life insurance policy that accumulates account value. 
                                  The flexibility of this policy allows you to
                                  change the amount of insurance as your needs for insurance change. Some changes
                                  require underwriting approval. As with all life insurance, the main purpose for
                                  buying a Universal Life Insurance policy is the death protection provided to
                                  your loved ones at your death, tax-free.
VARIABLE LIFE 
Variable Universal Life Insurance (VUL) is designed to build a cash value. In
                                  a VUL, the cash value can be invested in a wide variety of separate accounts,
                                  similar to mutual funds, and the choice of which of the available separate accounts
                                  to use is entirely up to the contract owner. The premiums can vary from nothing
                                  in a given month up to maximums defined by the IRS code for life insurance.
TERM LIFE
Term Life Insurance is perhaps the simplest form of life insurance. It was developed
                                  to provide temporary life insurance protection on a limited budget. Since term
                                  insurance can be purchased in large amounts for a relatively small initial premium,
                                  it is well suited for short-range goals such as life insurance coverage for paying
                                  off a loan, dependent care, or college education for dependents.
SURVIVORSHIP LIFE
Survivorship or Second To Die is very similar to Universal Life except that it
                                  insures two people. The primary feature is that no death benefit is paid until
                                  both persons insured under the policy have died. This policy is specifically
                                  designed to provide funds at the death of the second spouse to cover estate tax
                                  liability. This policy can provide needed funds so that the family's estate is
                                  preserved for the heirs.
INDEXED LIFE
Indexed Universal Life is Permanent Life Insurance designed to provide death-benefit
                                  protection. In addition, it offers the upside potential of interest linked to
                                  a stock-market index - without the risk of investing directly in the market.
                                  This gives you and your clients the ability to combine life insurance guarantees
                                  with the opportunity to earn index interest.
WHOLE LIFE
Whole Life's primary uses are guaranteed death benefit, guaranteed cash values,
                                  fixed annual premiums, access to cash values, and the fact that mortality and
                                  expense charges will not reduce the cash value shown in the policy.





















This Page and Content is for Licensed Agents and Financial Advisors.  Not for use by the General Public or Consumers.
The content and information in this site is subject to change without notice.  We depend on outside sources for much of the site content. 
Every attempt is made to keep the content current and up-to-date.  We encourage contact with your IDA-KC Sales Manager or Support Team for any content confirmation.

Copyright © 2012 Websites for Insurance Agents 









KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY. Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account - PDF





























 Log in
Registration







Search for

















KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY. Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account



































                                                        SHARE 




                                                        HTML 




                                                        DOWNLOAD 




































                                                            Size: px
                                                        

                                                            Start display at page:
                                                        










Download "KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY. Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account"




                                                                Error: 




 Download Document









  Elijah Holland
 1 years ago                                                                                            
 Views:  











Transcription





1 KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account Supplement dated May 1, 2016 to the Prospectus dated May 1, 2016 for the Century II Accumulator Variable Universal Life Insurance Contract CONNECTICUT For Contracts sold in the state of Connecticut, we change the Prospectus as follows to provide for the Right to Exchange provision: Add the following paragraph to Transfer Privilege on page 32 of the Prospectus. Right to Exchange The Right to Exchange provision allows you to exchange the Contract for one that provides benefits that don t vary based on the performance of the Funds. Once within the first 24 months of the Contract or within 24 months following the effective date of an increase to the Specified Amount, you may exercise a one-time Right to Exchange by requesting that this Contract be exchanged for any flexible premium fixed benefit policy we offer for exchange on the Contract Date. 58152 CENTURY II ACCUMULATOR VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE PROSPECTUS INDIVIDUAL FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE LIFE INSURANCE CONTRACT KANSAS CITY LIFE VARIABLE LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT OF KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Street Address: Send correspondence to: 3520 Broadway Variable Administration Kansas City, Missouri P.O. Box Telephone (816) Kansas City, Missouri Telephone (800) This Prospectus describes an individual flexible premium variable life insurance contract ("Contract") offered by Kansas City Life Insurance Company ("Kansas City Life"). We have provided a definitions section at the end of this Prospectus for your reference as you read. The Contract is designed to provide insurance protection on the person named. The Contract also provides you the opportunity to allocate your premiums to one or more divisions ("Subaccounts") of the Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account ("Variable Account") or the Fixed Account. The assets of each Subaccount are invested in a corresponding portfolio ("Portfolio") of a designated mutual fund ("Fund") as follows: AIM Variable Insurance Funds (Invesco Variable Insurance Funds) Invesco V.I. American Franchise Fund Series I Shares Invesco V.I. Core Equity Fund Series I Shares Invesco V.I. Technology Fund Series I Shares American Century Variable Portfolios, Inc. VP Capital Appreciation Fund Class I VP Income & Growth Fund Class I VP International Fund Class I VP Mid Cap Value Fund Class I VP Ultra Fund Class I VP Value Fund Class I American Century Variable Portfolios II, Inc. VP Inflation Protection Fund Class II American Funds Insurance Series Asset Allocation Fund Class 2 Shares Capital Income Builder Class 2 Shares Global Bond Fund Class 2 Shares Global Growth Fund Class 2 Shares Growth-Income Fund Class 2 Shares New World Fund Class 2 Shares American Funds Insurance Series Managed Risk Funds Managed Risk Asset Allocation Fund Class P2 Shares Managed Risk Blue Chip Income and Growth Fund Class P2 Shares Managed Risk Growth Fund Class P2 Shares Managed Risk Growth-Income Fund Class P2 Shares Managed Risk International Fund Class P2 Shares Calamos Advisors Trust Calamos Growth and Income Portfolio Columbia Funds Variable Series Trust II Columbia Variable Portfolio Mid Cap Growth Fund (Class 2) Columbia Variable Portfolio Seligman Global Technology Fund (Class 2) Columbia Variable Portfolio Select Smaller-Cap Value Fund (Class 2) Dreyfus Variable Investment Fund Appreciation Portfolio Initial Shares Opportunistic Small Cap Portfolio Initial Shares Dreyfus Stock Index Fund, Inc. Initial Shares The Dreyfus Socially Responsible Growth Fund, Inc. Initial Shares Federated Insurance Series Federated Managed Tail Risk Fund II P Federated High Income Bond Fund II P Federated Government Money Fund II S (formerly Federated Prime Money Fund II) Fidelity Variable Insurance Products VIP Contrafund Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom Income Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2010 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2015 Portfolio Service Class 23 VIP Freedom 2020 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2025 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2030 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2035 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2040 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2045 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2050 Portfolio Service Class 2 Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance Products Trust Franklin Global Real Estate VIP Fund Class 2 Franklin Small-Mid Cap Growth VIP Fund Class 2 Templeton Developing Markets VIP Fund Class 2 Templeton Foreign VIP Fund Class 2 JPMorgan Insurance Trust JPMorgan Insurance Trust Mid Cap Value Portfolio Class 1 Shares JPMorgan Insurance Trust Small Cap Core Portfolio Class 1 Shares JPMorgan Insurance Trust U.S. Equity Portfolio Class 1 Shares MFS Variable Insurance Trust MFS Growth Series Initial Class Shares MFS Research Series Initial Class Shares MFS Total Return Bond Series Initial Class Shares MFS Total Return Series Initial Class Shares MFS Utilities Series Initial Class Shares MFS Variable Insurance Trust II MFS Strategic Income Portfolio Initial Class Shares Northern Lights Variable Trust TOPS Managed Risk Balanced ETF Portfolio Class 2 Shares TOPS Managed Risk Growth ETF Portfolio Class 2 Shares TOPS Managed Risk Moderate Growth ETF Portfolio Class 2 Shares The accompanying prospectuses for the Funds describe these Portfolios. The value of amounts allocated to the Variable Account will vary according to the investment performance of the Funds. You bear the entire investment risk of amounts allocated to the Variable Account. Another choice available for allocation of premiums is our Fixed Account. The Fixed Account is part of Kansas City Life s general account. It pays interest at declared rates guaranteed to equal or exceed 3%. The Contract also offers you the flexibility to vary the amount and timing of premiums and to change the amount of death benefit payable. This flexibility allows you to provide for your changing insurance needs under a single insurance contract. You can select from three coverage options available under the Contract: Option A: a level death benefit; Option B: a death benefit that fluctuates with the contract value; and Option C: a death benefit that fluctuates with the amount of premiums paid and partial surrenders withdrawn. We guarantee that the death proceeds will never be less than a specified amount of insurance (less any outstanding loans and past due charges) as long as you pay sufficient premiums to keep the Contract in force. The Contract provides for a value that you can receive by surrendering the Contract. There is no guaranteed minimum value and there may be no cash surrender value on early surrenders. If the value is insufficient to cover the charges due under the Contract, the Contract will lapse without value. It may not be advantageous to replace existing insurance. Within certain limits, you may return the Contract or exercise a no-fee transfer right. This Prospectus and the accompanying Fund prospectuses provide important information you should have before deciding to purchase a Contract. Please keep these for future reference. The Subaccounts and the Fixed Account are not deposits or obligations of, or guaranteed or endorsed by, any bank, nor are federally insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. An investment in the Contract involves certain risks including the loss of premiums (principal). The Securities and Exchange Commission has not approved or disapproved these securities or passed upon the accuracy or adequacy of this Prospectus. Any representation to the contrary is a criminal offense. The date of this Prospectus is May 1, 2016.4 PROSPECTUS CONTENTS SUMMARY OF THE CONTRACT...1 CONTRACT BENEFITS...1 CONTRACT RISKS...3 PORTFOLIO RISKS...4 FEE TABLE...5 GENERAL INFORMATION ABOUT KANSAS CITY LIFE...17 KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY FIXED ACCOUNT THE VARIABLE ACCOUNT AND THE FUNDS...18 KANSAS CITY LIFE VARIABLE LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT THE FUNDS ADDITION, DELETION OR SUBSTITUTION OF INVESTMENTS VOTING RIGHTS CHARGES AND DEDUCTIONS...26 PREMIUM EXPENSE CHARGE MONTHLY DEDUCTION DAILY MORTALITY AND EXPENSE RISK CHARGE TRANSFER PROCESSING FEE SURRENDER CHARGE PARTIAL SURRENDER FEE NET LOAN INTEREST CHARGE FUND EXPENSES THE CONTRACT...29 PURCHASING A CONTRACT WHO SHOULD PURCHASE A CONTRACT APPLYING FOR A CONTRACT OWNERSHIP CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP DETERMINATION OF CONTRACT DATE REPLACEMENT OF EXISTING INSURANCE FREE LOOK RIGHT TO CANCEL CONTRACT ALLOCATIONS AND TRANSFERS...31 PREMIUM ALLOCATIONS AND CREDITING TRANSFER PRIVILEGE DOLLAR COST AVERAGING PLAN PORTFOLIO REBALANCING PLAN CHANGES IN THE CONTRACT OR BENEFITS SUPPLEMENTAL AND/OR RIDER BENEFITS ADDITIONAL SUPPLEMENTAL AND/OR RIDER BENEFITS PREMIUMS...45 PREMIUMS PREMIUMS TO PREVENT LAPSE HOW YOUR CONTRACT VALUES VARY...47 BONUS ON CONTRACT VALUE IN THE VARIABLE ACCOUNT DETERMINING THE CONTRACT VALUE CASH SURRENDER VALUE COMPANY HOLIDAYS DEATH BENEFIT AND CHANGES IN SPECIFIED AMOUNT...48 AMOUNT OF DEATH PROCEEDS COVERAGE OPTIONS INITIAL SPECIFIED AMOUNT AND COVERAGE OPTION CHANGES IN COVERAGE OPTION... 495 CHANGES IN SPECIFIED AMOUNT SELECTING AND CHANGING THE BENEFICIARY CASH BENEFITS...50 CONTRACT LOANS SURRENDERING THE CONTRACT FOR CASH SURRENDER VALUE PARTIAL SURRENDERS PAYMENT OPTIONS PAYMENT OF PROCEEDS UNCLAIMED PROPERTY LAWS REINSTATEMENT TAX CONSIDERATIONS...54 INTRODUCTION TAX STATUS OF THE CONTRACT TAX TREATMENT OF CONTRACT BENEFITS OUR INCOME TAXES POSSIBLE TAX LAW CHANGES OTHER INFORMATION ABOUT THE CONTRACTS AND KANSAS CITY LIFE...58 SALE OF THE CONTRACTS TELEPHONE, FACSIMILE, ELECTRONIC MAIL AND INTERNET AUTHORIZATIONS LITIGATION BUSINESS DISRUPTION AND CYBER SECURITY RISKS CHANGE OF ADDRESS NOTIFICATION FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEFINITIONS...62 APPENDIX A...65 APPENDIX B...66 STATEMENT OF ADDITIONAL INFORMATION TABLE OF CONTENTS...676 SUMMARY OF THE CONTRACT The Contract is an individual flexible premium variable life insurance contract. As long as it remains in force it provides lifetime insurance protection on the Insured. You pay Premiums for insurance coverage. The Contract also provides for accumulation of Premiums and a Cash Surrender Value if the Contract terminates. The Cash Surrender Value, if any, during the early years of the Contract is likely to be much lower than the Premiums paid. The Contract is built around its Contract Value. The Contract Value will increase or decrease depending on the investment performance of the Subaccounts, the amount of interest we credit to the Fixed Account, the Premiums you pay, the Contract fees and charges we deduct, and the effect of any Contract transactions (such as transfers, partial surrenders, and loans). We do not guarantee any minimum Contract Value. You could lose some or all of your money. This summary describes the Contract s important benefits and risks. The sections in the Prospectus following this summary discuss the Contract s benefits and other provisions in more detail. The "Definitions" section at the end of the Prospectus defines certain words and phrases used in this Prospectus. The Contract is not available in all states. This Prospectus does not offer the Contracts in any jurisdiction where they cannot be lawfully sold. You should rely only on the information contained in this Prospectus or that we have referred you to. We have not authorized anyone to provide you with information that is different. We may offer other variable life insurance contracts that have different death benefits, contract features and optional programs. These contracts would also have different charges that would affect your Subaccount performance and Contract Value. To obtain more information about these other contracts, contact your registered representative. NOTE: Because this is a summary, it does not contain all the information that may be important to you. You should read this entire Prospectus and the Funds prospectuses carefully before investing. CONTRACT BENEFITS Death Benefits. We pay a death benefit to the Beneficiary if the Insured dies while the Contract is in force. We pay the death benefit when we receive satisfactory proof at our Home Office of the Insured s death. Death benefits are available as lump sum or under a variety of payment options. The Minimum Specified Amount is $100,000 for issue ages 0-49 and $50,000 for issue ages We may allow these minimum limits to be reduced. (See "APPLYING FOR A CONTRACT") There are three Coverage Options available: Option A at least equal to the Specified Amount. Option B at least equal to the Specified Amount plus Contract Value. Option C at least equal to the Specified Amount plus total Premiums paid, minus the amount of any partial surrenders. Option C is only available at issue. A Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Rider is also available on this Contract (if requested). This rider guarantees the payment of the Contract death benefit, regardless of the investment performance of the Subaccount. The cumulative Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Rider Premium requirement must be met in order for this guarantee to remain in effect. (See "SUPPLEMENTAL AND/OR RIDER BENEFITS") There is flexibility to change the Coverage Option and Specified Amount. However, Coverage Option C is only available at issue. (See "CHANGES IN COVERAGE OPTION" for rules and limits) Changing the Coverage Option or Specified Amount may have tax consequences. We deduct any Loan Balance from the amount payable. Cash Benefits Contract Loans. You may take loans for amounts up to the Cash Surrender Value less loan interest to the next Contract Anniversary. A 5% annual effective interest rate applies. Currently, a preferred loan is available in the 11 th Contract Year. Loans reduce the amount available for allocations and transfers. Loans may have tax consequences. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") 17 Full Surrender. You may surrender your Contract at any time for its Cash Surrender Value. A surrender charge may apply. Surrendering the Contract may have tax consequences. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") Partial Surrender. Partial surrenders generally are available provided you have enough remaining Cash Surrender Value. A partial surrender fee applies. Partial surrenders may have adverse tax consequences. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") Transfers. You may transfer amounts among the Subaccounts and the Fixed Account, subject to certain restrictions. There is no limit on the number of transfers you can make between the Subaccounts or to the Fixed Account. The first six transfers during each Contract Year are free. After the first six transfers, we will assess a $25 Transfer Processing Fee. Unused free transfers do not carry over to the next Contract Year. We will deduct any Transfer Processing Fee from the remaining Contract Value. Tax Benefits. We intend for the Contract to satisfy the definition of life insurance under the Internal Revenue Code ("Code"). Therefore, the death benefit generally should be excludable from the gross income of its recipient, but may be subject to state and federal estate taxes. Similarly, you should not be deemed to be in constructive receipt of the Contract Value, and therefore should not be taxed on increases in the Contract Value, until you take out a loan or partial surrender or surrender the Contract. In addition, transfers of Contract Value among the Subaccounts and/or the Fixed Account are not taxable transactions. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS,") Free Look Right to Cancel. For a limited time, you have the right to cancel your Contract and receive a refund. (See "FREE LOOK RIGHT TO CANCEL CONTRACT") During this "free-look" period, we will allocate Premiums to the Federated Government Money Fund II Subaccount for 30 days. (See "PREMIUM ALLOCATIONS AND CREDITING") For a limited time after requesting an increase in the Contract's amount of insurance coverage, you may cancel the increase and you may be entitled to a refund of certain charges. Guaranteed Payment Period and Guaranteed Monthly Premium. If the value is not enough to pay charges due, the Contract will terminate without value after a Grace Period. (See "PREMIUMS TO PREVENT LAPSE") However, we guarantee to keep the Contract in force during the first seven years of the Contract as long as you meet a Premium requirement. (See "GUARANTEED PAYMENT PERIOD AND GUARANTEED MONTHLY PREMIUM") Supplemental Benefits. The following supplemental and/or rider benefits are available and may be added to your Contract. We may deduct monthly charges for some of these benefits and/or riders from your Contract Value as part of the Monthly Deduction. Each is subject to its own requirements as to eligibility and possible additional cost, including processing fee. Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Rider. Lifetime Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit. Disability Continuance of Insurance. Disability Premium Benefit Rider. Accidental Death Benefit. Option to Increase Specified Amount. Spouse's Term Insurance. Children's Term Insurance. Other Insured Term Insurance. Additional Life Insurance Rider. Monthly Benefit Rider. Acceleration of Death Proceeds/Enhanced Living Benefits Rider. Accelerated Death Benefit/Living Benefits Rider. Accelerated Death Benefit/Terminal Illness Rider. All of these riders may not be available in all states. Additional rules and limits apply to these supplemental and/or rider benefits. Please ask your registered representative for further information or contact the Home Office. Illustrations. We may prepare, for use in marketing and other materials, tables to illustrate hypothetically how certain values under a Contract change with investment performance over an extended period of time. Such tables illustrate how Contract Values, Cash Surrender Values and death benefits under a Contract covering an Insured of a given Age would vary over time if Planned Premiums were paid annually and the return on the assets in each of the Funds were an assumed uniform gross annual rate. 28 Actual returns will fluctuate over time and will be both positive and negative. The actual values under the Contract could be significantly different from those shown, even if actual returns averaged the rates used in the illustrations but fluctuated over and under those averages throughout the years shown. Depending on the timing and degree of fluctuation, the actual values could be substantially less than those shown, and may, under certain circumstances, result in the lapse of the Contract unless the Owner pays more than the stated Premium. Such illustrations show Contract Values based on both current charges and guaranteed charges. CONTRACT RISKS Investment Risk. If you invest your Contract Value in one or more Subaccounts, then you will be subject to the risk that investment performance will be unfavorable and that the Contract Value will decrease. In addition, we deduct Contract fees and charges from your Contract Value. There is no minimum guaranteed Contract Value. The Contract Value may decrease if the investment performance of the Subaccounts (to which Contract Value is allocated) is negative or is not sufficiently positive to cover the charges deducted under the Contract. During times of poor investment performance, these deductions will have an even greater impact on your Contract Value. You could lose everything you invest. If you allocate net Premiums to the Fixed Account, then we credit your Fixed Account Value with a declared rate of interest. You assume the risk that the rate may decrease, although it will never be lower than a guaranteed minimum annual effective rate of 3%. Risk of Lapse. If the Contract Value is not enough to pay the Monthly Deduction when due, the Contract will terminate without value after a Grace Period. The purpose of the Grace Period is to give you the chance to pay enough Premiums to keep your Contract in force. If your Contract does lapse you must pay the required amount before the end of the Grace Period. The Grace Period is 61 days and starts when we send the notice. Since the value of amounts allocated to the Variable Account will vary according to the investment performance of the Funds, the specific amount of Premiums required to prevent termination will also vary. A lapse could result in adverse tax consequences. Tax Risks. In order to qualify as a life insurance contract for Federal income tax purposes and to receive the tax treatment normally accorded life insurance contracts under Federal tax law, a Contract must satisfy certain requirements which are set forth in the Internal Revenue Code. Guidance as to how these requirements are to be applied is limited. Nevertheless, we believe that Contracts issued on a standard basis should satisfy the applicable requirements. There is less guidance, however, with respect to Contracts issued on a substandard basis, and such Contracts may not satisfy the applicable requirements in all circumstances, particularly if you pay the full amount of Premiums permitted under the Contract. Depending on the total amount of Premiums you pay, the Contract may be treated as a modified endowment contract under Federal tax laws. If a Contract is treated as a modified endowment contract, then surrenders, withdrawals, and loans under the Contract will be taxable as ordinary income to the extent there are earnings in the Contract. In addition, a 10% penalty tax may be imposed on surrenders, withdrawals, and loans taken before you reach Age 59½. If the Contract is not a modified endowment contract, then distributions generally will be treated first as a return of basis or investment in the Contract and then as taxable income. Moreover, loans will generally not be treated as distributions although the tax treatment of preferred loans is unclear. Finally, neither distributions nor loans from a Contract that is not a modified endowment contract are subject to the 10% penalty tax. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") You should consult a qualified tax adviser for assistance in all Contract-related tax matters. Risk of Increase in Current Fees and Expenses. Certain fees and expenses are currently assessed at less than their maximum levels. We may increase these current charges in the future up to the guaranteed maximum levels. If fees and expenses are increased, you may need to increase the amount and/or frequency of Premiums to keep the Contract in force. Surrender and Partial Surrender Risks. During the first fifteen Contract Years, we will deduct a surrender charge from the Contract Value if the Contract is completely surrendered or lapses. An additional surrender charge and surrender charge period will apply to each portion of the Contract resulting from a Specified Amount increase, starting with the effective date of the increase. Under some circumstances, the amount of the surrender charge during the first few Contract Years could result in a Cash Surrender Value of zero. You should purchase the Contract only if you have the financial ability to keep it in force for a substantial period of time. You should not purchase the Contract if you intend to surrender all or part of the Contract Value in the near future. We designed the Contract to meet long-term financial goals. The Contract is not suitable as a short-term investment. 39 Even if you do not surrender your Contract, surrender charges may play a role in determining whether your Contract will lapse, because surrender charges affect the Cash Surrender Value, which is a measure we use to determine whether your Contract will enter the Grace Period (and possibly terminate). (See "RISK OF LAPSE") A surrender or partial surrender may have tax consequences. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") Loan Risks. A Contract loan will affect your Contract in several ways over time, whether or not it is repaid, because the investment results of the Subaccounts may be less than (or greater than) the net interest rate credited on the amount transferred to the Loan Account securing the loan. Your Contract Value, by comparison to a Contract under which no loan has been made, will be less if the Fixed Account interest rate is less than the investment return of the applicable Subaccounts (and greater if the Fixed Account interest rate is higher than the investment return of the applicable Subaccounts). A Contract loan increases the risk that the Contract will terminate, since a loan decreases the Cash Surrender Value. If the death benefit becomes payable while a Contract loan is outstanding, the Loan Balance will be deducted in calculating the Death Proceeds. A loan may have tax consequences. In addition, if you surrender the Contract or allow it to lapse while a Contract loan is outstanding, the amount of the loan, to the extent it has not previously been taxed, will be added to any amount you receive and taxed accordingly. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") Risk of Frequent Transfers. We have policies and procedures that attempt to detect frequent, large, programmed, or short-term transfers among the Subaccounts that may adversely affect other Owners and persons with rights under the Contracts. We employ various means to try to detect such transfer activity, but the detection and deterrence of harmful trading activity involves judgments that are inherently subjective. Our ability to detect such transfer activity may be limited by operational and technological systems, as well as our ability to predict strategies employed by Owners to avoid such detection. Accordingly, there is no assurance that we will prevent all transfer activity that may adversely affect Owners and other persons with interests under the Contracts. In addition, we cannot guarantee that the Funds will not be harmed by transfer activity related to other insurance companies and/or retirement plans that may invest in the Funds. PORTFOLIO RISKS A comprehensive discussion of the risks of each Fund Portfolio may be found in each Portfolio s prospectus. Please refer to the Portfolios prospectuses for more information. There is no assurance that any Portfolio will achieve its stated investment objective. 410 FEE TABLE The following tables describe the fees and expenses that you will pay when buying, owning, and surrendering the Contract. The first table describes transaction fees that you will pay at the time that you pay Premiums, make partial surrenders, transfer Contract account value among the Subaccounts and the Fixed Account, completely surrender the Contract, or the Contract lapses. If the amount of a charge depends on the personal characteristics of the Insured under the Contract, the fee table lists the minimum and maximum charges we assess under the Contract and the fees and charges of a representative Contract with an Insured having the characteristics described for that charge. These minimum, maximum and representative charges may assist you in understanding the range of possible charges, as well as the charge an Owner may typically pay, but these charges may not be representative of the amount you will actually pay under the Contract. Charge Premium Expense Charge Surrender Charge 2 Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Transaction Fees When Charge is Deducted Upon receipt of each Premium Payment Upon complete surrender or lapse during the first 15 Contract Years 3 Upon complete surrender or lapse during the first 15 Contract Years 3 Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 5% of each Premium Payment $ $45.00 per $1,000 of the Specified Amount $21.20 per $1,000 of the Specified Amount Partial Surrender Fee Upon each partial surrender The lesser of 2% of the amount surrendered or $25 Transfer Processing Fee Upon each transfer over 6 in a Contract Year 5% of each Premium Payment $ $45.00 per $1,000 of the Specified Amount $21.20 per $1,000 of the Specified Amount The lesser of 2% of the amount surrendered or $25 $25 per transfer $25 per transfer 1 For each type of charge, the guaranteed charge and the current charge are shown. The guaranteed charge is the maximum amount permitted by the Contract while the current charge is the amount currently charged. 2 The surrender charge is based on the Specified Amount when the Contract is issued and varies depending on the Insured s Age and sex. The minimum charge shown in the table is the charge applicable to the youngest Owner (female) to whom a Contract would be issued if the Contract were surrendered in the first Contract Year. The maximum charge is the charge applicable to the oldest Owner (male) to whom a Contract would be issued if the Contract were surrendered in the first Contract Year. The surrender charge as shown in the table may not be typical of the charges you will pay. Information about the surrender charge you could pay is available from your registered representative, and data relating to the calculation of the surrender charge is in Appendix A and Appendix B. 3 If you increase the Contract s Specified Amount, an additional surrender charge and surrender charge period will apply to each portion of the Contract resulting from a Specified Amount increase, starting with the effective date of the increase and based on the Insured s Age and sex at the time of the increase. 511 The next table describes the fees and expenses that you will pay periodically during the time that you own the Contract, not including Portfolio fees and expenses. If the amount of a charge depends on the personal characteristics of the Insured under the Contract, the fee table lists the minimum and maximum charges we assess under the Contract depending on whether the Insured had the most favorable or least favorable characteristics, respectively. The table also lists the fees and charges of a typical Contract with a Specified Amount and with an Insured having the characteristics described for that charge. These charges may not be typical of the charges you will pay. Charge Cost of Insurance 4 Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Monthly Expense Charge 6 Maintenance Charge Per Thousand Charge Periodic Charges Other Than Portfolio Operating Expenses When Charge is Deducted On the Allocation Date and each Monthly Anniversary Day On the Allocation Date and each Monthly Anniversary Day On the Contract Date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On the Contract Date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 $ $83.33 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $0.09 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $10 $10 $ $1.36 per $1,000 of Specified Amount Mortality and Expense Risk Charge Daily Annual rate of 0.90% of the average daily net assets of each Subaccount you are invested in Net Loan Interest Charge 7 At the end of each Contract Year 2% 2% $ $25.01 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $0.05 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $ $1.36 per $1,000 of Specified Amount Annual rate of 0.90% of the average daily net assets of each Subaccount you are invested in 4 Cost of insurance charges vary based on the Insured s Age, sex, number of completed Contract Years, Specified Amount, risk class, and other factors. The charge generally is higher for less favorable risk classes and increases as the Insured ages. The cost of insurance charges shown in the table may not be typical of the charges you will pay. We guarantee that the cost of insurance rates will not exceed the maximum cost of insurance rates set forth in your Contract. More detailed information concerning your cost of insurance charges is available on request from our Home Office. 5 The net amount at risk on a Monthly Anniversary Day is the difference between the death benefit and the Contract Value. 6 The monthly expense charge is the sum of the maintenance charge and the per thousand charge. 7 The maximum guaranteed net cost of loans is 2% annually. The net cost of a loan is the difference between the rate of interest charged on any Loan Balance (5%) and the amount credited to the Loan Account (3%). Preferred loans are available beginning in the eleventh Contract Year. We credit the amount in the Loan Account securing a preferred loan with interest at an effective annual rate of 5%. Therefore, the net cost of a preferred loan is 0% per year. 612 Periodic Charges Other Than Portfolio Operating Expenses Charge Optional Rider Charges 8 Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Rider Lifetime Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Disability Continuance of Insurance Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Disability Premium Benefit Rider Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Accidental Death Benefit Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year When Charge is Deducted Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 NA No Charge No Charge On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day $0.03 per $1,000 of Specified Amount $ $0.52 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $0.02 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $ $0.32 per $1.00 of rider coverage amount $0.09 per $1.00 of rider coverage amount $ $0.16 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.09 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.01 per $1,000 of Specified Amount $ $0.32 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $0.01 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $ $0.15 per $1.00 of rider coverage amount $0.04 per $1.00 of rider coverage amount $ $0.16 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.09 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount 8 Charges for most of the riders vary based on the Insured s issue or actual Age, sex and risk class, and may vary based on the Contract Year and base Specified Amount or net amount at risk. Charges based on risk classes are generally higher for less favorable risk classes and charges based on actual Age may increase as the Insured ages. The rider charges shown in the table may not be typical of the charges you will pay. Your Contract s specifications page will indicate the rider charges applicable to your Contract, and more detailed information concerning these rider charges is available on request from our Home Office. 713 Periodic Charges Other Than Portfolio Operating Expenses Charge Option to Increase Specified Amount Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Spouse's Term Insurance Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Children's Term Insurance Other Insured Term Insurance Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Additional Life Insurance Rider Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Monthly Benefit Rider Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year When Charge is Deducted On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 $0.05- $0.18 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.16 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $1.87 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $1.45 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.50 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $83.33 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.09 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $83.33 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $0.09 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $ $22.56 per $100 of coverage amount $1.53 per $100 of coverage amount for a 20 year payout $0.05- $0.18 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.16 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $1.87 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $1.45 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.50 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $30.39 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.08 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $20.26 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $0.04 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 $ $22.05 per $100 of coverage amount $1.25 per $100 of coverage amount for a 20 year payout 814 Periodic Charges Other Than Portfolio Operating Expenses Charge Acceleration of Death Proceeds/Enhanced Living Benefits Rider Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 34 year-old male Preferred Non-Tobacco and a Contract with a $225,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Accelerated Death Benefit/Living Benefits Rider Accelerated Death Benefit/Terminal Illness Rider When Charge is Deducted On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On payment of the accelerated death benefit On payment of the accelerated death benefit Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 $ $15.00 per $1000 of net amount at risk 5 multiplied by the Benefit Base divided by the Specified Amount of the Contract $0.07 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 multiplied by the Benefit Base divided by the Specified Amount of the Contract $ $0.28 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 multiplied by the Benefit Base divided by the Specified Amount of the Contract $0.02 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 5 multiplied by the Benefit Base divided by the Specified Amount of the Contract $250 processing fee No Charge $200 processing fee, and an interest charge equal to the accelerated death benefit amount multiplied by the applicable loan interest rate divided by 1 plus the loan interest rate. The loan interest rate is stated in your Contract. $0 processing fee, and an interest charge equal to the accelerated death benefit amount multiplied by the applicable loan interest rate divided by 1 plus the loan interest rate. The loan interest rate is stated in your Contract. For information concerning compensation paid in connection with the sale of the Contracts, see "SALE OF THE CONTRACTS." 915 The next table shows the lowest and highest total operating expenses deducted from Portfolio assets during the fiscal year ended December 31, Expenses of the Portfolios may be higher or lower in the future. More detail concerning each Portfolio s fees and expenses is contained in the prospectus for each Portfolio. RANGE OF PORTFOLIO OPERATING EXPENSES 9 Total Annual Portfolio Operating Expenses (total of all expenses that are deducted from Portfolio assets, including management fees, distribution or service fees (12b-1 fees), and other expenses-before any contractual waiver of fees and expenses) 0.27% 1.58% 10 9 The portfolio expenses used to prepare this table were provided to Kansas City Life by the Fund(s) or their investment advisers. The expenses shown are those incurred for the year ended December 31, Current or future expenses may be greater or less than those shown. If required by applicable law, Kansas City Life may deduct any redemption fees imposed by the Funds. 10 The table showing the range of expenses of the Portfolios takes into account the expenses of several fund asset allocation portfolios that are fund of funds. A fund of funds portfolio typically allocates its assets, within predetermined percentage ranges, among certain other fund portfolios (each such portfolio an acquired fund. ) Each fund of funds has its own set of operating expenses, as does each of the portfolios in which it invests. In determining the range of portfolio expenses, Kansas City Life took into account the information received from the Fund on the combined actual expenses for each of the fund of funds and the portfolios in which it invests. See the Fund prospectuses for more information. The following tables show the fees and expenses charged (after contractual waiver or reimbursement) by each Portfolio for the fiscal year ended December 31, ANNUAL PORTFOLIO OPERATING EXPENSES 11 (expenses that are deducted from Portfolio assets, as a percentage of net assets of the Portfolio): 11 These expenses are deducted directly from the assets of the Portfolios and therefore reduce their net asset value. The investment adviser of each Fund or the Fund provided the information, and Kansas City Life has not independently verified it. The expenses shown are those incurred for the year ended December 31, Current or future expenses may be greater or less than those shown. See the Portfolios' prospectuses for more complete information. Portfolio AIM Variable Insurance Funds (Invesco Variable Insurance Funds) Invesco V.I. American Franchise Fund Series I Shares Invesco V.I. Core Equity Fund Series I Shares Invesco V.I. Technology Fund Series I Shares Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.67% NA 0.29% NA 0.96% NA NA 0.61% NA 0.29% 0.01% 0.91% 0.01% % 0.75% NA 0.40% NA 1.15% NA NA 12 Invesco Advisers, Inc. ("Invesco or the Adviser") has contractually agreed to waive a portion of the Fund s management fee in an amount equal to the net management fee that Invesco earns on the Fund s investments in certain affiliated funds, which will have the effect of reducing Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses. Unless Invesco continues the fee waiver agreement, it will terminate on June 30, The fee waiver agreement cannot be terminated during its term. 1016 Portfolio American Century Variable Portfolios, Inc. VP Capital Appreciation Fund Class I VP Income & Growth Fund Class I Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 1.00% NA 0.00% NA 1.00% 0.01% % 0.70% NA 0.00% NA 0.70% NA NA VP International Fund Class I 1.31% NA 0.02% NA 1.33% 0.31% % VP Mid Cap Value Fund Class I 1.00% NA 0.01% NA 1.01% 0.12% % VP Ultra Fund Class I 1.00% NA 0.01% NA 1.01% 0.15% % VP Value Fund Class I 0.97% NA 0.00% NA 0.97% 0.18% % American Century Variable Portfolios II, Inc. VP Inflation Protection Fund Class II 0.46% 0.25% 0.01% NA 0.72% NA NA 13 Effective August 1, 2015, the advisor has agreed to waive 0.01 percentage points of the fund s management fee. The advisor expects this waiver to continue until April 30, 2017 and cannot terminate it prior to such date without the approval of the Board of Directors. 14 Effective August 1, 2015, the advisor has agreed to waive 0.31 percentage points of the fund s management fee. The advisor expects this waiver to continue until April 30, 2017 and cannot terminate it prior to such date without the approval of the Board of Directors. 15 Effective August 1, 2015, the advisor has agreed to waive 0.12 percentage points of the fund s management fee. The advisor expects this waiver to continue until April 30, 2017 and cannot terminate it prior to such date without the approval of the Board of Directors. 16 Effective August 1, 2015, the advisor has agreed to waive 0.15 percentage points of the fund s management fee. The advisor expects this waiver to continue until April 30, 2017 and cannot terminate it prior to such date without the approval of the Board of Directors. 17 Effective August 1, 2015, the advisor has agreed to waive 0.18 percentage points of the fund s management fee. The advisor expects this waiver to continue until April 30, 2017 and cannot terminate it prior to such date without the approval of the Board of Directors. 1117 Portfolio American Funds Insurance Series Asset Allocation Fund Class 2 Shares Capital Income Builder Class 2 Shares Global Bond Fund Class 2 Shares Global Growth Fund Class 2 Shares Growth-Income Fund Class 2 Shares New World Fund Class 2 Shares American Funds Insurance Series Managed Risk Funds Managed Risk Asset Allocation Fund Class P2 Shares Managed Risk Blue Chip Income and Growth Fund Class P2 Shares Managed Risk Growth Fund Class P2 Shares Managed Risk Growth-Income Fund Class P2 Shares Managed Risk International Fund Class P2 Shares Class P2 Shares Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.28% 0.25% 0.01% NA 0.54% NA NA 0.50% 0.25% % 18 NA 0.81% NA NA 0.53% 0.25% 0.04% NA 0.82% NA NA 0.52% 0.25% 0.03% NA 0.80% NA NA 0.27% 0.25% 0.02% NA 0.54% NA NA 0.72% 0.25% 0.07% NA 1.04% NA NA 0.15% 0.25% 0.29% 0.27% 0.96% 0.06% % 0.15% 0.25% 0.39% 0.39% 1.18% 0.16% % 0.15% 0.25% 0.39% 0.32% 1.11% 0.16% % 0.15% 0.25% 0.39% 0.27% 1.06% 0.16% % 0.15% 0.25% 0.40% 0.50% 1.30% 0.17% % 18 Based on estimated amounts for the current fiscal year. 19 The investment adviser is currently waiving a portion of its management fees equal to.05% of the fund's net assets. In addition, the investment adviser is currently reimbursing a portion of other expenses. This waiver and reimbursement will be in effect through at least May 1, 2017, unless modified or terminated by the fund's board. The adviser may elect at its discretion to extend, modify or terminate the reimbursement at that time. The waiver may only be modified or terminated with the approval of the fund's board. Portfolio Calamos Advisors Trust Calamos Growth and Income Portfolio Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.75% NA 0.72% NA % NA NA 20 For the year ended December 31, 2015, the Fund's Other Expenses included less than 1 basis point (0.01%) of Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses from investments in money market funds. 1218 Portfolio Columbia Funds Variable Series Trust II Columbia Variable Portfolio Mid Cap Growth Fund (Class 2) Columbia Variable Portfolio Seligman Global Technology Fund (Class 2) Columbia Variable Portfolio Select Smaller-Cap Value Fund (Class 2) Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.82% % 0.13% 21 NA 1.20% 0.19% % 1.03% % 0.17% 23 NA 1.45% 0.22% % 0.87% % 0.12% 25 NA 1.24% 0.08% % 21 Management fees reflect the combination of advisory and administrative services fees under one agreement providing for a single management fee. As a result, other expenses do not include administrative services fees. Advisory fees and administrative services fees paid pursuant to separate prior agreements amounted to 0.76% and 0.06% of average daily net assets of the Fund, respectively. 22 Columbia Management Investment Advisers, LLC and certain of its affiliates have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or to reimburse expenses (excluding transaction costs and certain other investment related expenses, interest, taxes, acquired fund fees and expenses, and infrequent and/or beyond usual expenses) until April 30, 2017, unless sooner terminated at the sole discretion of the Fund s Board of Trustees. Under this agreement, the Fund s net operating expenses, subject to applicable exclusions, will not exceed the annual rates of 0.76% for Class 1, 1.01% for Class 2 and 0.885% for Class Management fees reflect the combination of advisory and administrative services fees under one agreement providing for a single management fee. As a result, other expenses do not include administrative services fees. Advisory fees and administrative services fees paid pursuant to separate prior agreements amounted to 0.95% and 0.08% of average daily net assets of the Fund, respectively. 24 Columbia Management Investment Advisers, LLC and certain of its affiliates have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or to reimburse expenses (excluding transaction costs and certain other investment related expenses, interest, taxes, acquired fund fees and expenses, and infrequent and/or beyond usual expenses) until April 30, 2017, unless sooner terminated at the sole discretion of the Fund s Board of Trustees. Under this agreement, the Fund s net operating expenses, subject to applicable exclusions, will not exceed the annual rates of 0.98% for Class 1 and 1.23% for Class Management fees reflect the combination of advisory and administrative services fees under one agreement providing for a single management fee. As a result, other expenses do not include administrative services fees. Advisory fees and administrative services fees paid pursuant to separate prior agreements amounted to 0.79% and 0.08% of average daily net assets of the Fund, respectively. 26 Columbia Management Investment Advisers, LLC and certain of its affiliates have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or to reimburse expenses (excluding transaction costs and certain other investment related expenses, interest, taxes, acquired fund fees and expenses, and infrequent and/or beyond usual expenses) until April 30, 2017, unless sooner terminated at the sole discretion of the Fund s Board of Trustees. Under this agreement, the Fund s net operating expenses, subject to applicable exclusions, will not exceed the annual rates of 0.91% for Class 1, 1.16% for Class 2 and 1.035% for Class 3. Portfolio Dreyfus Variable Investment Fund Appreciation Portfolio Initial Shares Opportunistic Small Cap Portfolio Initial Shares Dreyfus Stock Index Fund, Inc. Initial Shares The Dreyfus Socially Responsible Growth Fund, Inc. Initial Shares Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.75% NA 0.05% NA 0.80% NA NA 0.75% NA 0.10% NA 0.85% NA NA 0.25% NA 0.02% NA 0.27% NA NA 0.75% NA 0.11% NA 0.86% NA NA 1319 Portfolio Federated Insurance Series Federated Managed Tail Risk Fund II P Federated High Income Bond Fund II P Federated Government Money Fund II S (formerly Federated Prime Money Fund II) Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.75% 0.00% % % 1.73% 0.68% % 0.60% NA 0.17% 28 NA 0.77% NA NA 0.20% 30 NA 0.45% NA 0.65% 0.02% 30, % 27 The Fund has adopted a Distribution (12b-1) Plan for its P class pursuant to which the P class of the Fund may incur or charge a Distribution (12b- 1) Fee of up to a maximum amount of 0.25%. No such fee is currently incurred or charged by the P class of the Fund. The P class of the Fund will not incur or charge such a Distribution (12b-1) Fee until such time as approved by the Fund s Board of Trustees (the Trustees ). 28 The Fund may incur or charge administrative service fees on its P class up to a maximum amount of 0.25%. No such fees are currently incurred or charged by the P class of the Fund. The P class of the Fund will not incur or charge such fees until such time as approved by the Trustees. 29 The Co-Advisers and certain of their affiliates on their own initiative have agreed to waive certain amounts of their respective fees and/or reimburse expenses. Effective May 1, 2016, total annual fund operating expenses (excluding Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses, expenses allocated from affiliated partnerships, interest expense, extraordinary expenses and proxy-related expenses paid by the Fund, if any) paid by the Fund s P class (after the voluntary waivers and/or reimbursements) will not exceed 0.27% (the Fee Limit ) up to but not including the later of (the Termination Date ): (a) May 1, 2017; or (b) the date of the Fund s next effective Prospectus. While the Co-Advisers and their affiliates currently do not anticipate terminating or increasing these arrangements prior to the Termination Date, these arrangements may only be terminated or the Fee Limit increased prior to the Termination Date with the agreement of the Trustees. 30 The Management Fee, Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses and Fee Waivers and/or Expense Reimbursements have been restated to reflect current fees due to a reduction in the stated, gross Management Fee for the Fund. 31 The Adviser and certain of its affiliates, on their own initiative, have agreed to waive certain amounts of their respective fees and/or reimburse expenses. Total annual fund operating expenses (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, extraordinary expenses, and proxy-related expenses paid by the Fund, if any) paid by the Fund s S class (after the voluntary waivers and/or reimbursements) will not exceed 0.63% (the Fee Limit ) up to but not including the later of (the Termination Date ): (a) May 1, 2017; or (b) the date of the Fund s next effective Prospectus. While the Adviser and its affiliates currently do not anticipate terminating or increasing these arrangements prior to the Termination Date, these arrangements may only be terminated or the Fee Limit increased prior to the Termination Date with the agreement of the Trustees. 1420 Portfolio Fidelity Variable Insurance Products VIP Contrafund Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom Income Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2010 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2015 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2020 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2025 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2030 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2035 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2040 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2045 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2050 Portfolio Service Class 2 Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.55% 0.25% 0.08% NA 0.88% NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.46% 0.71% 32 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.55% 0.80% 32 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.58% 0.83% 32 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.60% 0.85% 32 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.63% 0.88% 32 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.66% 0.91% 32 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.68% 0.93% 32 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.68% 0.93% 32 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.68% 0.93% 32 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.68% 0.93% 32 NA NA 32 Differs from the ratios of expenses to average net assets in the Financial Highlights section of the Fund Prospectus because of acquired fund fees and expenses. Portfolio Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance Products Trust Franklin Global Real Estate VIP Fund Class 2 Franklin Small-Mid Cap Growth VIP Fund Class 2 Templeton Developing Markets Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 1.05% 0.25% 0.06% NA 1.36% NA NA 0.77% 0.25% 0.04% NA 1.06% NA NA 33 VIP Fund Class % 0.25% 0.08% 0.01% 1.59% 0.01% 1.58% Templeton Foreign VIP Fund Class % 0.25% 0.03% NA 1.03% NA NA 33 The investment manager has contractually agreed in advance to reduce its fees as a result of the fund s investment in a Franklin Templeton money market fund (the acquired fund ) for at least the next 12 month period. 15  View more














Similar documents





CENTURY II VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE PROSPECTUS INDIVIDUAL FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE LIFE INSURANCE CONTRACT



        CENTURY II VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE PROSPECTUS INDIVIDUAL FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE LIFE INSURANCE CONTRACT KANSAS CITY LIFE VARIABLE LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT OF KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Street Address:    

        More information 




KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY. Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account



        KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account Supplement dated May 1, 2015 to the Prospectus dated May 1, 2015 for the Century II Variable Universal Life Insurance    

        More information 




Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy



        May 1, 2015 State Farm Life Insurance Company P R O S P E C T U S Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy prospectus PROSPECTUS DATED MAY 1, 2015 INDIVIDUAL FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE INSURANCE    

        More information 




Sentinel Benefit Provider A Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy Intended Primarily for the Corporate Market P R O S P E C T U S Dated May 1, 2009



        Sentinel Benefit Provider A Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy Intended Primarily for the Corporate Market P R O S P E C T U S Dated May 1, 2009 National Life Insurance Company Home Office: National    

        More information 




Thrivent Financial Variable Universal Life Insurance



        Thrivent Financial Variable Universal Life Insurance Issued by Aid Association for Lutherans between 1998 and 2003 and by Thrivent Financial between 2003 and 2004. Prospectuses April 30, 2016 Thrivent    

        More information 




Variable Deferred Annuity



        May 1, 2015 State Farm Life Insurance Company P R O S P E C T U S Variable Deferred Annuity profile Profile Dated May 1, 2015 STATE FARM VARIABLE DEFERRED ANNUITY POLICY STATE FARM LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY    

        More information 




MINNESOTA LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY



        MINNESOTA LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Minnesota Life Individual Variable Universal Life Account Supplement Dated August 22, 2015 to the Prospectus for Accumulator Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy (dated    

        More information 




Thrivent Financial Variable Universal Life Insurance II



        Thrivent Financial Variable Universal Life Insurance II Prospectuses April 30, 2015 Thrivent Variable Life Account I Thrivent Series Fund, Inc. How Do You Want to Hear From Us? Choose email, U.S. mail    

        More information 




Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Prospectus May 2015



        Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Prospectus May 2015 Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Prospectus VAE0515 Annuities issued in all states except New York by Transamerica Premier Life Insurance Company, Cedar    

        More information 




Sentinel Advantage Variable Annuity P R O S P E C T U S Dated May 1, 2011



        Sentinel Advantage Variable Annuity P R O S P E C T U S Dated May 1, 2011 National Life Insurance Company Home Office: National Life Drive, Montpelier, Vermont 05604 1-800-732-8939 The Contracts described    

        More information 




AFAdvantage Variable Annuity



        AFAdvantage Variable Annuity from May 1, 2013 AFAdvantage Variable Annuity issued by American Fidelity Separate Account B and American Fidelity Assurance Company PROSPECTUS May 1, 2013 American Fidelity    

        More information 




Guaranteed Income for Life (GIFL) Rollover Variable Annuity IRA



        GIFL_Prospectus Cvr_Prdt 0414:Layout 1 4/29/14 10:36 AM Page 2 Guaranteed Income for Life (GIFL) Rollover Variable Annuity IRA PROSPECTUS Exclusively available for 401(k) plan participants with the John    

        More information 




The rates below apply for applications signed between December 15, 2015 and January 14, 2016. Income Growth Rate: 6.00% Income Percentages



        PRUDENTIAL DEFINED INCOME ( PDI ) VARIABLE ANNUITY PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY PRUCO LIFE FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE ANNUITY ACCOUNT PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY OF NEW JERSEY PRUCO LIFE of NEW JERSEY    

        More information 




Allstate ChoiceRate Annuity



        Allstate ChoiceRate Annuity Allstate Life Insurance Company P.O. Box 80469 Lincoln, NE 68501-0469 Telephone Number: 1-800-203-0068 Fax Number: 1-866-628-1006 Prospectus dated May 1, 2008 Allstate Life    

        More information 




Excel Performance Variable Universal Life Prospectus May 1, 2016



        Excel Performance Variable Universal Life Prospectus May 1, 2016 Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. LI 1253 5-16 PROSPECTUS: May 1, 2016 Excel Performance VUL Individual Flexible Premium Variable Universal    

        More information 




Voya GoldenSelect Guarantee Annuity



        Voya Insurance and Annuity Company Deferred Modified Guaranteed Annuity Prospectus Voya GoldenSelect Guarantee Annuity May 1, 2015 This prospectus describes Voya GoldenSelect Guarantee Annuity, a group    

        More information 




The Hartford Saver Solution SM A FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT



        The Hartford Saver Solution SM A FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT  THE HARTFORD SAVER SOLUTION SM FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT This Disclosure Statement provides important information    

        More information 




Nationwide Destination SM [B]



        Nationwide Destination SM [B] Prospectus dated May 1, 2016 An Individual Flexible Premium Deferred Variable Annuity Contract Issued by Nationwide Life Insurance Company Through its Nationwide Variable    

        More information 




Freedom Global IUL II SM Freedom Index Universal Life II SM Index Universal Life Insurance Offered by WRL Agent Guide



        Freedom Global IUL II SM Freedom Index Universal Life II SM Index Universal Life Insurance Offered by WRL Agent Guide AG05113-01/12 Western Reserve Life Assurance Co. of Ohio  Thank you for your interest    

        More information 




Synergy Global Advantage Gold. Fixed Indexed Universal Life Insurance Consumer Brochure. Distributed by:



        Synergy Global Advantage Gold Fixed Indexed Universal Life Insurance Consumer Brochure Distributed by: ADV 1188 (12-2011) Fidelity & Guaranty Life Insurance Company Rev. 09-2014 14-680 Synergy Global Advantage    

        More information 




The Hartford Saver Solution Choice SM A FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT



        The Hartford Saver Solution Choice SM A FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT  THE HARTFORD SAVER SOLUTION CHOICE SM FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT This Disclosure Statement provides important    

        More information 




American Legacy Fusion variable annuity



        American Legacy Fusion variable annuity May 1, 2015 Product Prospectus This document and many others can be read online by signing up for edelivery! Make a positive environmental impact by signing up today!    

        More information 




Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY")



        Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY") Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VUL Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts") Supplement to: Overture Encore!    

        More information 




TRANSAMERICA LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Home Office: [4333 Edgewood Road NE, Cedar Rapids, IA 52499] A Stock Company



        TRANSAMERICA LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Home Office: [4333 Edgewood Road NE, Cedar Rapids, IA 52499] A Stock Company Subject to the provisions of this Certificate and receipt of due proof of the Insured s    

        More information 




Columbia Funds Series Trust Columbia Large Cap Growth Fund II Columbia Large Cap Growth Fund III. Columbia Large Cap Growth Fund



        Columbia Funds Series Trust Columbia Large Cap Growth Fund II Columbia Large Cap Growth Fund III Columbia Large Cap Growth Fund V Columbia International Value Fund Columbia International Opportunities    

        More information 




WRL Financial Foundation IUL SM



        WRL Financial Foundation IUL SM Index Universal Life Insurance Agent Guide AG06113-07/13 Western Reserve Life Assurance Co. of Ohio Thank you for your interest in the WRL Financial Foundation IUL offered    

        More information 




Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Product Guide



        Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Product Guide Advisor s Edge Product Guide Annuities issued by: Monumental Life Insurance Company Cedar Rapids, IA Underwritten and distributed by Transamerica Capital,    

        More information 




Lincoln ChoicePlus SM Design variable annuity



        FOR INCOME Prospectus Lincoln ChoicePlus SM Design variable annuity May 1, 2012 This document and many others can be read online by signing up for edelivery! Make a positive environmental impact by signing    

        More information 




RiverSource Variable Universal Life Insurance III



        May 1, 2016 RiverSource Variable Universal Life Insurance III This wrapper contains a prospectus and a prospectus supplement dated May 1, 2016. S-6189 CA (5/16) Issued by: RiverSource Life Insurance Company    

        More information 




The Lincoln National Life Insurance Company (the "Company") A Stock Company



        Lincoln MoneyGuard II Sample Interstate Compact policy Issue State Alabama The Lincoln National Life Insurance Company (the "Company") A Stock Company Home Office: Service Office: State of Issue Department    

        More information 




Life Insurance Review



        Supplemental Illustration Prepared by: MetLife Agent Financial Services Representative 200 Park Ave. New York, NY 10166 Insurance Products: Not A Deposit Not FDIC-Insured Not Insured By Any Federal Government    

        More information 




Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY")



        Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY") Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VUL Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts") Supplement to: Overture Encore!    

        More information 




Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Product Guide Effective July 1, 2015



        Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Product Guide Effective July 1, 2015 Advisor s Edge Product Guide Annuities issued by Transamerica Premier Life Insurance Company Cedar Rapids, IA. Annuities are underwritten    

        More information 




Variable Universal Life II (VUL II)



        Variable Universal Life II (VUL II) Issued by Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company Massachusetts Mutual Variable Life Separate Account I This prospectus describes an individual, flexible premium,    

        More information 




No-Load Variable Annuity



        May 1, 2008 P ROSPECTUS T. ROWE PRICE No-Load Variable Annuity ISSUED BY SECURITY BENEFIT LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY  VARIABLE ANNUITY PROSPECTUS T. Rowe Price No-Load Variable Annuity An Individual Flexible    

        More information 




Nationwide New Heights Fixed Indexed Annuity



        Fixed Indexed Annuity Fixed Indexed Annuity Hypothetical Illustration Report Prepared for: Prepared on: Valued Client 6/24/2015 Prepared by: Sample NC The purpose of this hypothetical illustration is to    

        More information 




Variable Universal Life (VUL)



        Variable Universal Life (VUL) What is it? Permanent (cash value) life insurance with maximum flexibility Variable universal life (VUL) is considered the most flexible type of permanent (cash value) life    

        More information 




Supplement Dated May 1, 2015 to your Prospectus



        Supplement Dated May 1, 2015 to your Prospectus Hartford Overnight Mail Address: The definition of In Writing located in the Glossary section of your prospectus is deleted and replaced with the following:    

        More information 




RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV Estate Series



        April 29, 2013 RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV Estate Series This wrapper contains: Combined prospectus for RiverSource» Variable Universal Life IV and RiverSource»    

        More information 




Income Plus Variable Annuity



        Just the facts about New York Life... Income Plus Variable Annuity What is the New York Life Income Plus Variable Annuity? 1 Why should I consider Income Plus with the Guaranteed Future Income Benefit    

        More information 




RELIASTAR LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY



        RELIASTAR LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY and its SELECT*LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT RELIASTAR SELECT VARIABLE ACCOUNT Supplement Dated June 14, 2010 This supplement updates and amends certain information contained in    

        More information 




Pacific Life Insurance Company [45 Enterprise Aliso Viejo, CA 92656] [www.pacificlife.com (800) 347-7787]



        Pacific Life Insurance Company [45 Enterprise Aliso Viejo, CA 92656] [www.pacificlife.com (800) 347-7787] READ YOUR POLICY CAREFULLY. This is a legal contract between you, the Owner, and us, Pacific Life    

        More information 




Stag Variable Life Insurance Products Underlying Fund Investment Results



        This information is for use by policyholders of: Stag Accumulator policies issued before 08/01/2003* Stag Protector policies issued before 08/01/2003* Stag Variable Life Last Survivor policies issued before    

        More information 




MassMutual Transitions Select SM Variable Annuity



        MassMutual Transitions Select SM Variable Annuity Issued by Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company Massachusetts Mutual Variable Annuity Separate Account 4 This prospectus describes an individual    

        More information 




RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV Estate Series



        April 29, 2013 RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV Estate Series This wrapper contains: Combined prospectus for RiverSource» Variable Universal Life IV and RiverSource»    

        More information 




Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY")



        Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY") Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VUL Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts") Supplement to: Overture Encore!    

        More information 




Be prepared for the opportunities retirement may offer.



        LIFETIME INCOME BENEFIT RIDER NATIONWIDE HIGH POINT 365 Be prepared for the opportunities retirement may offer. Nationwide High Point 365 Lifetime Income Benefit rider A rider for the Nationwide New Heights    

        More information 




SUPPLEMENT DATED MAY 19, 2015 FIRST INVESTORS INCOME AND EQUITY FUNDS PROSPECTUS DATED JANUARY 31, 2015



        SUPPLEMENT DATED MAY 19, 2015 FIRST INVESTORS INCOME AND EQUITY FUNDS PROSPECTUS DATED JANUARY 31, 2015 FIRST INVESTORS LIFE SERIES FUNDS PROSPECTUS DATED MAY 1, 2015 1. In The Funds Summary Section for    

        More information 




PROTECTION PROTECTION VUL. Taking the right steps in planning for the future CONSUMER GUIDE



        CONSUMER GUIDE PROTECTION PROTECTION VUL Taking the right steps in planning for the future JOHN HANCOCK LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY (U.S.A.) JOHN HANCOCK LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY OF NEW YORK IM5237CG There are    

        More information 




A Consumer Guide For Annuity Products in New York



        A Consumer Guide For Annuity Products in New York Boris Kulikov Wandanowak.com Andrew M. Cuomo, Governor Benjamin M. Lawsky, Superintendent New York State Department of Financial Services This guide provides    

        More information 




Statement of Additional Information. May 1, 2013. New York Life Legacy Creator Single Premium Variable Universal Life Insurance



        Statement of Additional Information dated May 1, 2013 for New York Life Legacy Creator Single Premium Variable Universal Life Insurance from NEW YORK LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY CORPORATION ( NYLIAC ) This    

        More information 




Great American Life. American Valor II. Platinum Series Flexible Fixed-Indexed Annuity B1067408NW



        Great American Life American Valor II Platinum Series Flexible Fixed- Annuity B1067408NW Building Lifestyle Security You ve worked hard for what you have. Wouldn t you like the freedom to enjoy your retirement    

        More information 




Protection That Offers Selection To Fit Your Lifestyle! More Choices More Control!



        Protection That Offers Selection To Fit Your Lifestyle! More Choices More Control! Consumer Brochure A Flexible Premium Life Insurance Policy with Equity Index Options Policy Form 01-1143-07 and state    

        More information 




"This notice is not part of the accompanying prospectus"



        We no longer offer certain of our variable annuity products and are not required to update the annuity prospectuses for such products. We maintain on this site, for your reference, the most recent annuity    

        More information 




SUPPLEMENT DATED NOVEMBER 2, 2015 TO THE PROSPECTUS DATED MAY 1, 2015 FOR ISP CHOICE OFFERED BY FORESTERS LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY COMPANY



        SUPPLEMENT DATED NOVEMBER 2, 2015 TO THE PROSPECTUS DATED MAY 1, 2015 FOR ISP CHOICE OFFERED BY FORESTERS LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY COMPANY This supplement makes changes to your prospectus regarding the    

        More information 




INDIVIDUAL LIFE INSURANCE. A Consumer Resource. Stag Wall Street. Flexible-premium, single-life variable universal life insurance



        INDIVIDUAL LIFE INSURANCE A Consumer Resource Stag Wall Street Flexible-premium, single-life variable universal life insurance Why Stag Wall Street? Stag Wall Street Variable Universal Life insurance provides    

        More information 




RiverSource RAVA 5 Advantage Variable Annuity. RAVA 5 Select Variable Annuity RAVA 5 Access Variable Annuity. May 1, 2016



        May 1, 2016 RiverSource RAVA 5 Advantage Variable Annuity RAVA 5 Select Variable Annuity RAVA 5 Access Variable Annuity (Offered for contract applications signed on or after April 29, 2013) This wrapper    

        More information 




Hy7hn MONUMENT ADVISOR JEFFERSON NATIONAL LIFE ANNUITY ACCOUNT G. May 1, 2015 PROSPECTUS



        Hy7hn MONUMENT ADVISOR JEFFERSON NATIONAL LIFE ANNUITY ACCOUNT G May 1, 2015 PROSPECTUS Monument Advisor Individual Variable Annuity Issued by: JEFFERSON NATIONAL LIFE ANNUITY ACCOUNT G AND JEFFERSON NATIONAL    

        More information 




Accumulator Variable Universal Life



        Accumulator Variable Universal Life Variable Product Series Building your future with a secure partner SM Kansas City Life Insurance Company Century II Accumulator Variable Universal Life Features at a    

        More information 




Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. ("Ameritas Life") Ameritas Variable Separate Account VL and Ameritas Variable Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts")



        Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. ("Ameritas Life") Ameritas Variable Separate Account VL and Ameritas Variable Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts") Supplement to: Executive Select, Regent 2000, and Allocator    

        More information 




Strategic Group Variable Universal Life



        Strategic Group Variable Universal Life Issued by Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company Massachusetts Mutual Variable Life Separate Account I This prospectus describes a variable rider issued in    

        More information 




A Technical Guide for Individuals. The Whole Story. Understanding the features and benefits of whole life insurance. Insurance Strategies



        A Technical Guide for Individuals The Whole Story Understanding the features and benefits of whole life insurance Insurance Strategies Contents 1 Insurance for Your Lifetime 3 How Does Whole Life Insurance    

        More information 




Sales Strategy Life Insurance in Retirement Planning Plus



        Sales Strategy Life Insurance in Retirement Planning Plus Life insurance protection is the foundation of a family s future, providing cash to: replace income for surviving family, pay off family debt,    

        More information 




RiverSource Variable Universal Life Insurance III



        April 29, 2013 RiverSource Variable Universal Life Insurance III This wrapper contains a prospectus. visit ameriprise.com/paperless S-6189 AF (4/13) Issued by: RiverSource Life Insurance Company From the    

        More information 




Allianz Vision SM Prospectus



        Allianz Life Insurance Company of New York www.allianzlife.com/newyork/ Allianz Vision New York Variable Annuity Allianz Vision SM Prospectus New York Variable Annuity Individual flexible-payment deferred    

        More information 




PHL Variable Insurance Company PO Box 8027, Boston, MA 02266-8027



        PHL Variable Insurance Company PO Box 8027, Boston, MA 02266-8027 Phoenix Personal Income Annuity and Phoenix Personal Protection Choice Indexed Annuity Disclosure Document A Single Premium Deferred Modified    

        More information 




Supplement Dated June 23, 2011 to your Prospectus. This Supplement Should Be Retained With Your Prospectus For Future Reference.



        Supplement Dated June 23, 2011 to your Prospectus The following language is added under Section 8.b. State Variations: Washington - The Personal Pension Account rider will not be available for Contracts    

        More information 




Cost-effective index universal life insurance with upside potential and downside protection



        Elite Index II Producer Guide Cost-effective index universal life insurance with upside potential and downside protection Policies issued by American General Life Insurance Company (AGL) Security and choice    

        More information 




ING LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY COMPANY and its Variable Annuity Account C. State University of New York Defined Contribution Retirement Plans



        ING LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY COMPANY and its Variable Annuity Account C State University of New York Defined Contribution Retirement Plans Supplement dated October 3, 2007 to your current Contract Prospectus    

        More information 




ANNUITIES: WHAT ARE THEY AND HOW ARE THEY USED



        ANNUITIES: WHAT ARE THEY AND HOW ARE THEY USED (FORC Journal: Vol. 18 Edition 1 - Spring 2007) 1 An annuity is a contract under which the owner of the contract pays money or transfers assets to the obligor    

        More information 




Elite Global Plus II Fixed index interest universal life insurance



        Elite Global Plus II Fixed index interest universal life insurance Product Guide Protection plus growth opportunity with a global index option Policies issued by: American General Life Insurance Company    

        More information 




Commonwealth Variable Universal Life variable life insurance issued by Genworth Life and Annuity Insurance Company



        as of November 30, 2012 Commonwealth Variable Universal Life variable life insurance issued by 14609 12/01/12 Exp. 01/15/13 '2012 Genworth Financial, Inc. All rights reserved. Page 1 of 7 IMPORTANT INFORMATION    

        More information 




MEMBERS Variable Annuity Series



        MEMBERS Variable Annuity Series Prospectus May 2015 edelivery from Transamerica Less paper conserves natural resources No waiting for the mail Receive documents electronically Store documents securely    

        More information 




Transamerica Variable Annuity Series Prospectus May 2015



        Transamerica Variable Annuity Series Prospectus May 2015 edelivery from Transamerica Less paper conserves natural resources No waiting for the mail Receive documents electronically Store documents securely    

        More information 




Voya SmartDesign Multi-Rate Index Annuity



        Voya Insurance and Annuity Company Deferred Modified Guaranteed Annuity Prospectus Voya SmartDesign Multi-Rate Index Annuity May 1, 2015 This prospectus describes Voya SmartDesign Multi-Rate Index Annuity,    

        More information 




Understanding Indexed Universal Life Insurance



        Understanding Indexed Universal Life Insurance Consumer Brochure  Table of Contents Overview... [ 2 ] Indexed Universal Life Insurance...[ 2 ] What is Indexed Universal Life Insurance?... [ 2 ] How North    

        More information 




SAMPLE. is equal to the Death Benefit less the Account Value of your policy.



        DEFINITIONS EquiLife Limited Pay UL (Joint first-to-die) The following are definitions of some of the terms used in your EquiLife Joint First-to-Die policy. If you need additional information or clarification    

        More information 




Statement of Additional Information. May 1, 2013. NYLIAC Survivorship Variable Universal Life



        Statement of Additional Information dated May 1, 2013 for NYLIAC Survivorship Variable Universal Life from NEW YORK LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY CORPORATION ( NYLIAC ) This Statement of Additional Information    

        More information 




Lifetime Income Benefit Rider



        for a secure Retirement Lifetime Income Benefit Rider (LIBR-2010)* Included automatically on most Fixed Indexed Annuities** for use with Fixed Indexed Annuities *May vary by state. Not available in all    

        More information 




Secure Lifetime GUL 3 Guaranteed Universal Life Insurance Information for Financial Professionals



        Secure Lifetime GUL 3 Guaranteed Universal Life Insurance Information for Financial Professionals Our commitment to your clients is stronger than ever before! Policies issued by American General Life Insurance    

        More information 




Banner Life Insurance Company. 3275 Bennett Creek Avenue. Frederick, Maryland 21704. 800-638-8428. [Jane Doe], or subsequently changed by the Owner



        RENEWABLE AND CONVERTIBLE TERM LIFE INSURANCE. Banner Life Insurance Company. 3275 Bennett Creek Avenue. Frederick, Maryland 21704. 800-638-8428 Insured - [John Doe] Face Amount - [$1,000,000] Policy Number    

        More information 




Prospectus December 18, 2015 Private Investment Classes



        Prospectus December 18, 2015 Private Investment Classes Liquid Assets Portfolio (LPVXX) STIC Prime Portfolio (SPVXX) Treasury Portfolio (TPFXX) Government & Agency Portfolio (GPVXX) Government TaxAdvantage    

        More information 




Are You Meeting Your Business Insurance Needs?



        FOR BUSINESS OWNERS Principal Variable Universal Life Income II SM Are You Meeting Your Business Insurance Needs?  Meeting your business needs Individuals buy life insurance for many reasons. One key reason    

        More information 




19801NY 12/01/12 Exp. 01/15/13 '2012 Genworth Financial, Inc. All rights reserved. Page 1 of 13



        as of November 30, 2012 For contracts issued on or after May 1, 2003 RetireReady SM Choice NY 19801NY 12/01/12 Exp. 01/15/13 '2012 Genworth Financial, Inc. All rights reserved. Page 1 of 13 IMPORTANT INFORMATION    

        More information 




Pacific PRIME IUL Flexible Premium Indexed Universal Life Insurance



        Pacific PRIME IUL Flexible Premium Indexed Universal Life Insurance Balance Life Insurance Protection with Growth Potential Pacific Life Insurance Company PPIUL-1B page 1 Pacific PRIME IUL Balance Protection    

        More information 




White Paper Tax Planning with Life Insurance



        White Paper www.selectportfolio.com Toll Free 800.445.9822 Tel 949.975.7900 Fax 949.900.8181 Securities offered through Securities Equity Group Member FINRA, SIPC, MSRB Page 2 Table of Contents... 3 What    

        More information 




Nationwide Platinum EdgeSM



        Nationwide Platinum EdgeSM Prospectus dated May 1, 2015 A ﬂexible purchase payment modiﬁed guaranteed annuity contract issued by Nationwide Life Insurance Company Make the switch to a cleaner mailbox and    

        More information 




Roll-up Rate: 5% Withdrawal Percentages



        PRUDENTIAL PREMIER RETIREMENT VARIABLE ANNUITY (Offering Highest Daily Lifetime Income v3.0) PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY PRUCO LIFE FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE ANNUITY ACCOUNT PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY    

        More information 




Variable universal life insurance. Quick reference. You want it all.



        Variable universal life insurance Quick reference You want it all. Need more from your life insurance? You need life insurance protection for your family, retirement investments for yourself and your preschooler    

        More information 




Basic Plus II. Both Flexible Savings and Life Protection under One Single Policy



        Basic Plus II Both Flexible Savings and Life Protection under One Single Policy Basic Plus II ( the product ) gives you the opportunity to earn interest returns while acquiring comprehensive life protection,    

        More information 




Life Insurance Review Using Legacy Advantage SUL Insurance Policy



        Using Legacy Advantage SUL Insurance Policy Supplemental Illustration Prepared by: MetLife Agent 200 Park Ave. New York, NY 10166 Insurance Products: Not A Deposit Not FDIC-Insured Not Insured By Any Federal    

        More information 




Principal Investment Plus Variable Annuity SM. Prospectus (FOR APPLICATIONS SIGNED ON OR AFTER AUGUST 1, 2013) Prospectus.



        Principal Investment Plus Variable Annuity SM Prospectus Prospectus (FOR APPLICATIONS SIGNED ON OR AFTER AUGUST 1, 2013) May 1, 2013 2012 November August 1, 2, 2013 2015 Sign up for edelivery! principal.com,    

        More information 




SECURITY LIFE OF DENVER INSURANCE COMPANY IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF SECURITY LIFE OF DENVER INSURANCE COMPANY



        SECURITY LIFE OF DENVER INSURANCE COMPANY and its Security Life Separate Account L1 and Security Life Separate Account S-L1 Supplement Dated July 31, 2015 This supplement amends certain information contained    

        More information 




Guardian Investor II SM Variable Annuity Fact Card



        THE GUARDIAN INSURANCE & ANNUITY COMPANY, INC. (GIAC) Guardian Investor II SM Variable Annuity Fact Card A Variable Annuity is a long-term financial product for retirement purposes that allows you to accumulate    

        More information 




MML Series Investment Fund II MML Blend Fund MML Equity Fund MML Managed Bond Fund MML Money Market Fund



        Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company Massachusetts Mutual Variable Annuity Separate Account 1 (For Tax-Qualified Arrangements) Massachusetts Mutual Variable Annuity Separate Account 2 (For Non-Tax    

        More information 




Pruco Life Insurance Company Pruco Life Insurance Company of New Jersey



        Pruco Life Insurance Company Pruco Life Insurance Company of New Jersey PRUDENTIAL PREMIER RETIREMENT VARIABLE ANNUITY X SERIES SM ( X SERIES ) PRUDENTIAL PREMIER RETIREMENT VARIABLE ANNUITY B SERIES SM    

        More information 




Edward Jones Money Market Fund



        Edward Jones Money Market Fund S U M M A R Y P R O S P E C T U S April 30, 2015 INVESTMENT SHARES (TICKER JNSXX) RETIREMENT SHARES (TICKER JRSXX) Before you invest, you may want to review the Fund s Prospectus,    

        More information 




Important Disclosure Information



        Important Disclosure Information Health Savings Account Custodial Agreement (Under section 223(a) of the Internal Revenue Code) Please keep this agreement with your HSA records. Thank you for choosing    

        More information 




Versa-Flex NLG. Guaranteed Protection for an Evolving Legacy. Flexible Premium Universal Life Insurance Client Guide VFNLG-1E



        Pacific Life Insurance Company Versa-Flex NLG Flexible Premium Universal Life Insurance Client Guide Guaranteed Protection for an Evolving Legacy VFNLG-1E VERSA-FLEX NLG As Your Life Changes, Your Life    

        More information 


















                2017 © DocPlayer.net Privacy Policy | Terms of Service | Feedback





















KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY. Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account - PDF





























 Log in
Registration







Search for

















KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY. Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account



































                                                        SHARE 




                                                        HTML 




                                                        DOWNLOAD 




































                                                            Size: px
                                                        

                                                            Start display at page:
                                                        










Download "KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY. Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account"




                                                                Error: 




 Download Document









  Judith Jennings
 1 years ago                                                                                            
 Views:  











Transcription





1 KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account Supplement dated May 1, 2015 to the Prospectus dated May 1, 2015 for the Century II Variable Universal Life Insurance Contract MARYLAND For Contracts sold in the state of Maryland, we change the Prospectus as follows: Add the following wording after the Guaranteed Payment Period and Guaranteed Monthly Premium section of the Prospectus on page 43: No-Lapse Monthly Premium and No-Lapse Payment Period In addition to the Guaranteed Payment Period described above, there is a fifteen year No-Lapse Payment Period. A No-Lapse Payment Period is the period during which we guarantee that the Contract will not lapse if the amount of total Premiums you pay is greater than or equal to the sum of: (1) the accumulated No-Lapse Monthly Premiums in effect on each prior Monthly Anniversary Date; and (2) an amount equal to the sum of any partial surrenders taken and Indebtedness under the Contract. The No-Lapse Payment Period is fifteen years following the Contract Date and fifteen years following the effective date of an increase in the Specified Amount. The Contract shows the No-Lapse Monthly Premium. The per $1,000 No-Lapse Monthly Premium factors for the Specified Amount vary by risk class, issue Age and sex. We include additional Premiums for substandard ratings and supplemental and/or rider benefits in the No-Lapse Monthly Premium. However, upon a change to the Contract, we will recalculate the No-Lapse Monthly Premium, will notify you of the new No-Lapse Monthly Premium and amend your Contract to reflect the change. Add the following paragraph to the Premium Payments Upon Increase in Specified Amount section on page 43 of the Prospectus: A new No-Lapse Payment Period begins on the effective date of an increase in Specified Amount. You will be notified of the new No-Lapse Monthly Premium for this period. Delete the After the Guaranteed Payment Period section on page 44 of the Prospectus and replace it with the following: After the Guaranteed Payment Period but During the No-Lapse Payment Period A Grace Period starts if on any Monthly Anniversary Day the Cash Surrender Value is less than the amount of the Monthly Deduction and the accumulated Premiums paid as of the Monthly Anniversary Date are less than required to guarantee the Contract will not lapse during the No-Lapse Payment Period. After the No-Lapse Period A Grace Period starts if the Cash Surrender Value on a Monthly Anniversary Day will not cover the Monthly Deduction. You must pay a Premium sufficient to provide a Cash Surrender Value equal to three Monthly Deductions during the Grace Period to keep the Contract in force.2 Add the following paragraph to the Changes in Specified Amount section on page 46 of the Prospectus: In addition, a new No-Lapse Payment Period begins on the effective date of the increase and will continue for fifteen years. We will recalculate the Contract s No-Lapse Monthly Premium to reflect the increase. If a No-Lapse Payment Period is in effect, the Contract s No-Lapse Monthly Premium will also generally be increased. See No-Lapse Monthly Premium and No-Lapse Payment Period above b3 CENTURY II VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE PROSPECTUS INDIVIDUAL FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE LIFE INSURANCE CONTRACT KANSAS CITY LIFE VARIABLE LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT OF KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Street Address: Send correspondence to: 3520 Broadway Variable Administration Kansas City, Missouri P.O. Box Telephone (816) Kansas City, Missouri Telephone (800) This Prospectus describes an individual flexible premium variable life insurance contract ("Contract") offered by Kansas City Life Insurance Company ("Kansas City Life"). We have provided a definitions section at the end of this Prospectus for your reference as you read. The Contract is designed to provide insurance protection on the person named. The Contract also provides you the opportunity to allocate your premiums to one or more divisions ("Subaccounts") of the Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account ("Variable Account") or the Fixed Account. The assets of each Subaccount are invested in a corresponding portfolio ("Portfolio") of a designated mutual fund ("Fund") as follows: AIM Variable Insurance Funds (Invesco Variable Insurance Funds) Invesco V.I. American Franchise Fund Series I Shares Invesco V.I. Core Equity Fund Series I Shares Invesco V.I. Technology Fund Series I Shares American Century Variable Portfolios, Inc. American Century VP Capital Appreciation Fund Class I American Century VP Income & Growth Fund Class I American Century VP International Fund Class I American Century VP Mid Cap Value Fund Class I American Century VP Ultra Fund Class I American Century VP Value Fund Class I American Century Variable Portfolios II, Inc. American Century VP Inflation Protection Fund Class II Calamos Advisors Trust Calamos Growth and Income Portfolio Columbia Funds Variable Series Trust II Columbia Variable Portfolio Mid Cap Growth Fund (Class 2) (formerly Columbia Variable Portfolio Mid Cap Growth Opportunity Fund (Class 2)) Columbia Variable Portfolio Seligman Global Technology Fund (Class 2) Columbia Variable Portfolio Select Smaller-Cap Value Fund (Class 2) Dreyfus Variable Investment Fund Appreciation Portfolio Initial Shares Opportunistic Small Cap Portfolio Initial Shares Dreyfus Stock Index Fund, Inc. Initial Shares The Dreyfus Socially Responsible Growth Fund, Inc. Initial Shares Federated Insurance Series Federated Managed Tail Risk Fund II P Federated High Income Bond Fund II P Federated Prime Money Fund II Fidelity Variable Insurance Products Contrafund Portfolio VIP Contrafund Portfolio Service Class 2 Fidelity Variable Insurance Products VIP Freedom Income Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2010 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2015 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2020 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2025 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2030 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2035 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2040 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2045 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2050 Portfolio Service Class 24 Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance Products Trust Franklin Global Real Estate VIP Fund Class 2 Franklin Small-Mid Cap Growth VIP Fund Class 2 Templeton Developing Markets VIP Fund Class 2 Templeton Foreign VIP Fund Class 2 JPMorgan Insurance Trust JPMorgan Insurance Trust Mid Cap Value Portfolio Class 1 Shares JPMorgan Insurance Trust Small Cap Core Portfolio Class 1 Shares JPMorgan Insurance Trust U.S. Equity Portfolio Class 1 Shares MFS Variable Insurance Trust MFS Growth Series Initial Class Shares MFS Research Series Initial Class Shares MFS Total Return Bond Series Initial Class Shares (formerly MFS Research Bond Series Initial Class Shares) MFS Total Return Series Initial Class Shares MFS Utilities Series Initial Class Shares MFS Variable Insurance Trust II MFS Strategic Income Portfolio Initial Class Shares Northern Lights Variable Trust TOPS Managed Risk Balanced ETF Portfolio Class 2 Shares TOPS Managed Risk Growth ETF Portfolio Class 2 Shares TOPS Managed Risk Moderate Growth ETF Portfolio Class 2 Shares The accompanying prospectuses for the Funds describe these portfolios. The value of amounts allocated to the Variable Account (prior to the date the Contract matures) will vary according to the investment performance of the Portfolios of the Funds. You bear the entire investment risk of amounts allocated to the Variable Account. Another choice available for allocation of premiums is our Fixed Account. The Fixed Account is part of Kansas City Life s general account. It pays interest at declared rates guaranteed to equal or exceed 4%. The Contract also offers you the flexibility to vary the amount and timing of Premium Payments and to change the amount of death benefit payable. This flexibility allows you to provide for your changing insurance needs under a single insurance contract. You can select from two Coverage Options available under the Contract: Option A: a level death benefit; and Option B: a death benefit that fluctuates with the value of the Contract. We guarantee that the Death Proceeds will never be less than a specified amount of insurance (less any outstanding loans and past due charges) as long as you pay sufficient premiums to keep the Contract in force. The Contract provides for a value that you can receive by surrendering the Contract. There is no guaranteed minimum value. If the value is insufficient to cover the charges due under the Contract, the Contract will lapse without value. It may not be advantageous to replace existing insurance. Within certain limits, you may return the Contract or exercise a no-fee transfer right. This Prospectus and the accompanying Fund prospectuses provide important information you should have before deciding to purchase a Contract. Please keep these for future reference. The Subaccounts and the Fixed Account are not deposits or obligations of, or guaranteed or endorsed by, any bank, nor are federally insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government agency. An investment in the Contract involves certain risks including the loss of Premium Payments (principal). The Securities and Exchange Commission has not approved or disapproved these securities or passed upon the accuracy or adequacy of this Prospectus. Any representation to the contrary is a criminal offense. The date of this Prospectus is May 1, 2015.5 PROSPECTUS CONTENTS SUMMARY OF THE CONTRACT...1 CONTRACT BENEFITS...1 CONTRACT RISKS...3 PORTFOLIO RISKS...4 FEE TABLE...4 RANGE OF PORTFOLIO OPERATING EXPENSES ANNUAL PORTFOLIO OPERATING EXPENSES GENERAL INFORMATION ABOUT KANSAS CITY LIFE...16 KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY FIXED ACCOUNT THE VARIABLE ACCOUNT AND THE FUNDS...16 KANSAS CITY LIFE VARIABLE LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT THE FUNDS ADDITION, DELETION OR SUBSTITUTION OF INVESTMENTS VOTING RIGHTS CHARGES AND DEDUCTIONS...23 PREMIUM EXPENSE CHARGE MONTHLY DEDUCTION DAILY MORTALITY AND EXPENSE RISK CHARGE TRANSFER PROCESSING FEE SURRENDER CHARGE PARTIAL SURRENDER FEE NET LOAN INTEREST CHARGE FUND EXPENSES THE CONTRACT...28 PURCHASING A CONTRACT WHO SHOULD PURCHASE A CONTRACT APPLYING FOR A CONTRACT OWNERSHIP CHANGES OF OWNERSHIP DETERMINATION OF CONTRACT DATE REPLACEMENT OF EXISTING INSURANCE FREE LOOK RIGHT TO CANCEL CONTRACT ALLOCATIONS AND TRANSFERS...30 PREMIUM ALLOCATIONS AND CREDITING TRANSFER PRIVILEGE DOLLAR COST AVERAGING PLAN PORTFOLIO REBALANCING PLAN CHANGES IN THE CONTRACT OR BENEFITS SUPPLEMENTAL AND/OR RIDER BENEFITS ADDITIONAL SUPPLEMENTAL AND/OR RIDER BENEFITS PREMIUM PAYMENTS...42 PREMIUMS PREMIUM PAYMENTS TO PREVENT LAPSE HOW YOUR CONTRACT VALUES VARY...44 BONUS ON CONTRACT VALUE IN THE VARIABLE ACCOUNT DETERMINING THE CONTRACT VALUE CASH SURRENDER VALUE COMPANY HOLIDAYS... 456 DEATH BENEFIT AND CHANGES IN SPECIFIED AMOUNT...45 AMOUNT OF DEATH PROCEEDS COVERAGE OPTIONS INITIAL SPECIFIED AMOUNT AND COVERAGE OPTION CHANGES IN COVERAGE OPTION CHANGES IN SPECIFIED AMOUNT SELECTING AND CHANGING THE BENEFICIARY CASH BENEFITS...48 CONTRACT LOANS SURRENDERING THE CONTRACT FOR CASH SURRENDER VALUE PARTIAL SURRENDERS MATURITY BENEFIT PAYMENT OPTIONS PAYMENT OF PROCEEDS UNCLAIMED PROPERTY LAWS REINSTATEMENT TAX CONSIDERATIONS...52 INTRODUCTION TAX STATUS OF THE CONTRACT TAX TREATMENT OF CONTRACT BENEFITS POSSIBLE TAX LAW CHANGES OUR INCOME TAXES OTHER INFORMATION ABOUT THE CONTRACTS AND KANSAS CITY LIFE...56 SALE OF THE CONTRACTS TELEPHONE, FACSIMILE, ELECTRONIC MAIL AND INTERNET AUTHORIZATIONS LITIGATION CYBER SECURITY CHANGE OF ADDRESS NOTIFICATION FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DEFINITIONS...59 APPENDIX MAXIMUM SURRENDER CHARGE FACTORS...62 STATEMENT OF ADDITIONAL INFORMATION TABLE OF CONTENTS...637 SUMMARY OF THE CONTRACT The Contract is an individual Flexible Premium Variable Life Insurance Contract. As long as it remains in force it provides lifetime insurance protection on the Insured until the Maturity Date. You pay Premiums for insurance coverage. The Contract also provides for accumulation of Premiums and a Cash Surrender Value if the Contract terminates. The Cash Surrender Value, if any, during the early years of the Contract is likely to be much lower than the Premiums paid. The Contract is built around its Contract Value. The Contract Value will increase or decrease depending on the investment performance of the Subaccounts, the amount of interest we credit to the Fixed Account, the Premiums you pay, the Contract fees and charges we deduct, and the effect of any Contract transactions (such as transfers, partial surrenders, and loans). We do not guarantee any minimum Contract Value. You could lose some or all of your money. This summary describes the Contract s important benefits and risks. The sections in the Prospectus following this summary discuss the Contract s benefits and other provisions in more detail. The "Definitions" section at the end of the Prospectus defines certain words and phrases used in this Prospectus. The Contract is not available in all states. This Prospectus does not offer the Contracts in any jurisdiction where they cannot be lawfully sold. You should rely only on the information contained in this Prospectus or that we have referred you to. We have not authorized anyone to provide you with information that is different. We may offer other variable life insurance contracts that have different death benefits, contract features and optional programs. These contracts would also have different charges that would affect your Subaccount performance and Contract Value. To obtain more information about these other contracts, contact your registered representative. NOTE: Because this is a summary, it does not contain all the information that may be important to you. You should read this entire Prospectus and the Funds prospectuses carefully before investing. CONTRACT BENEFITS Death Benefits. We pay a death benefit to the Beneficiary if the Insured dies while the Contract is in force and prior to the Contract s Maturity Date. We pay the death benefit when we receive satisfactory proof at our Home Office of the Insured s death. Death benefits are available as lump sum or under a variety of payment options. The Minimum Specified Amount is $100,000 for issue ages 0-49 and $50,000 for issue ages We may allow these minimum limits to be reduced. (See "APPLYING FOR A CONTRACT") There are two Coverage Options available: Option A at least equal to the Specified Amount. Option B at least equal to the Specified Amount plus Contract Value. (See "COVERAGE OPTIONS") There is flexibility to change the Coverage Option and Specified Amount. (See "CHANGES IN COVERAGE OPTION" for rules and limits) Changing the Coverage Option or Specified Amount may have tax consequences. We deduct any Indebtedness from the amount payable. Cash Benefits Contract Loans. You may take loans for amounts up to the Cash Surrender Value less loan interest to the next Contract Anniversary. A 6% annual effective interest rate applies. Currently, a preferred loan is available in the 11th Contract Year. Loans reduce the amount available for allocations and transfers. Loans may have tax consequences. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") Full Surrender. You may surrender your Contract at any time for its Cash Surrender Value. A surrender charge may apply. Surrendering the Contract may have tax consequences. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") Partial Surrender. Partial surrenders generally are available provided you have enough remaining Cash Surrender Value. A partial surrender fee applies. We will assess a surrender charge for any resulting reduction in the Specified Amount. Partial surrenders may have adverse tax consequences. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") 18 Transfers. You may transfer amounts among the Subaccounts and the Fixed Account, subject to certain restrictions. There is no limit on the number of transfers you can make between the Subaccounts or to the Fixed Account. The first six transfers during each Contract Year are free. After the first six transfers, we will assess a $25 Transfer Processing Fee. Unused free transfers do not carry over to the next Contract Year. We will deduct any Transfer Processing Fee from the remaining Contract Value. Tax Benefits. We intend for the Contract to satisfy the definition of life insurance under the Internal Revenue Code. Therefore, the death benefit generally should be excludable from the gross income of its recipient, but may be subject to state and federal estate taxes. Similarly, you should not be deemed to be in constructive receipt of the Contract Value, and therefore should not be taxed on increases in the Contract Value, until you take out a loan or partial surrender, surrender the Contract, or we pay the maturity benefit. In addition, transfers of Contract Value among the Subaccounts and/or the Fixed Account are not taxable transactions. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") Free Look Right to Cancel. For a limited time, you have the right to cancel your Contract and receive a refund. (See "FREE LOOK RIGHT TO CANCEL CONTRACT") During this "free-look" period, we will allocate Premiums to the Federated Prime Money Fund II Subaccount for 30 days. (See "PREMIUM ALLOCATIONS AND CREDITING") For a limited time after requesting an increase in the Contract's amount of insurance coverage, you may cancel the increase and you may be entitled to a refund of certain charges. Guaranteed Payment Period and Guaranteed Monthly Premium. If the value is not enough to pay charges due, the Contract will terminate without value after a Grace Period. (See "PREMIUM PAYMENTS TO PREVENT LAPSE") However, we guarantee to keep the Contract in force during the first ten years of the Contract and during the ten years following the effective date of an increase in the Specified Amount as long as you meet a Premium requirement. (See "GUARANTEED PAYMENT PERIOD AND GUARANTEED MONTHLY PREMIUM") Supplemental Benefits. The following supplemental and/or rider benefits are available and may be added to your Contract. We will deduct monthly charges for these benefits and/or riders from your Contract Value as part of the Monthly Deduction. Each is subject to its own requirements as to eligibility and possible additional cost, including processing fee. Disability Continuance of Insurance Disability Premium Benefit Rider Accidental Death Benefit Option to Increase Specified Amount Spouse's Term Insurance Children's Term Insurance Other Insured Term Insurance Extra Protection Monthly Benefit Rider Acceleration of Death Proceeds/Enhanced Living Benefits Rider Accelerated Death Benefit/Living Benefits Rider Accelerated Death Benefit/Terminal Illness Rider Maturity Extension Rider All of these riders may not be available in all states. Additional rules and limits apply to these supplemental and/or rider benefits. Please ask your registered representative for further information or contact the Home Office. Illustrations. We may prepare for use in marketing and other materials tables to illustrate hypothetically how certain values under a Contract change with investment performance over an extended period of time. Such tables illustrate how Contract Values, Cash Surrender Values and death benefits under a Contract covering an Insured of a given Age would vary over time if Planned Premium Payments were paid annually and the return on the assets in each of the Funds were an assumed uniform gross annual rate(s). Actual returns will fluctuate over time and will be both positive and negative. The actual values under the Contract could be significantly different from those shown even if actual returns averaged the rates used in the illustrations, but fluctuated over and under those averages throughout the years shown. Depending on the timing and degree of fluctuation, the actual values could be substantially less than those shown, and may, under certain circumstances, result in the lapse of the Contract unless the Owner pays more than the stated Premium. Such illustrations show Contract Values based on both current charges and guaranteed charges. 29 CONTRACT RISKS Investment Risk. If you invest your Contract Value in one or more Subaccounts, then you will be subject to the risk that investment performance will be unfavorable and that the Contract Value will decrease. In addition, we deduct Contract fees and charges from your Contract Value. There is no minimum guaranteed Contract Value. The Contract Value may decrease if the investment performance of the Subaccounts (to which Contract Value is allocated) is negative or is not sufficiently positive to cover the charges deducted under the Contract. During times of poor investment performance, these deductions will have an even greater impact on your Contract Value. You could lose everything you invest. If you allocate net Premiums to the Fixed Account, then we credit your Fixed Account Value with a declared rate of interest. You assume the risk that the rate may decrease, although it will never be lower than a guaranteed minimum annual effective rate of 4%. Risk of Lapse. If the Contract Value is not enough to pay the Monthly Deduction when due, the Contract will terminate without value after a Grace Period. The purpose of the Grace Period is to give you the chance to pay enough Premiums to keep your Contract in force. If your Contract does lapse you must pay the required amount before the end of the Grace Period. The Grace Period is 61 days and starts when we send the notice. Since the value of amounts allocated to the Variable Account will vary according to the investment performance of the Funds, the specific amount of Premiums required to prevent termination will also vary. A lapse could result in adverse tax consequences. Tax Risks. In order to qualify as a life insurance contract for Federal income tax purposes and to receive the tax treatment normally accorded life insurance contracts under Federal tax law, a Contract must satisfy certain requirements which are set forth in the Internal Revenue Code. Guidance as to how these requirements are to be applied is limited. Nevertheless, we believe that Contracts issued on a standard basis should satisfy the applicable requirements. There is less guidance, however, with respect to Contracts issued on a substandard basis, and such Contracts may not satisfy the applicable requirements in all circumstances, particularly if you pay the full amount of Premiums permitted under the Contract. Depending on the total amount of Premiums you pay, the Contract may be treated as a modified endowment contract under Federal tax laws. If a Contract is treated as a modified endowment contract, then surrenders, withdrawals, and loans under the Contract will be taxable as ordinary income to the extent there are earnings in the Contract. In addition, a 10% penalty tax may be imposed on surrenders, withdrawals, and loans taken before you reach Age 59½. If the Contract is not a modified endowment contract, then distributions generally will be treated first as a return of basis or investment in the contract and then as taxable income. Moreover, loans will generally not be treated as distributions, although the tax treatment of preferred loans is unclear. Finally, neither distributions nor loans from a Contract that is not a modified endowment contract are subject to the 10% penalty tax. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") You should consult a qualified tax adviser for assistance in all Contract-related tax matters. Risk of Increase in Current Fees and Expenses. Certain fees and expenses are currently assessed at less than their maximum levels. We may increase these current charges in the future up to the guaranteed maximum levels. If fees and expenses are increased, you may need to increase the amount and/or frequency of Premiums to keep the Contract in force. Surrender and Partial Surrender Risks. During the first fifteen Contract Years, we will deduct a surrender charge from the Contract Value if the Contract is completely surrendered, lapses, or the Specified Amount is reduced (including when a partial surrender reduces the Specified Amount). An additional surrender charge and surrender charge period will apply to each portion of the Contract resulting from a Specified Amount increase, starting with the effective date of the increase. Under some circumstances, the amount of the surrender charge during the first few Contract Years could result in a Cash Surrender Value of zero. You should purchase the Contract only if you have the financial ability to keep it in force for a substantial period of time. You should not purchase the Contract if you intend to surrender all or part of the Contract Value in the near future. We designed the Contract to meet long-term financial goals. The Contract is not suitable as a short-term investment. Even if you do not surrender your Contract, surrender charges may play a role in determining whether your Contract will lapse, because surrender charges affect the Cash Surrender Value, which is a measure we use to determine whether your Contract will enter the Grace Period (and possibly terminate). (See "RISK OF LAPSE") A surrender or partial surrender may have tax consequences. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") Loan Risks. A Contract loan will affect your Contract in several ways over time, whether or not it is repaid, because the investment results of the Subaccounts may be less than (or greater than) the net interest rate credited on the amount transferred to the Loan Account securing the loan. 310 Your Contract Value, by comparison to a Contract under which no loan has been made, will be less if the Fixed Account interest rate is less than the investment return of the applicable Subaccounts (and greater if the Fixed Account interest rate is higher than the investment return of the applicable Subaccounts). A Contract loan increases the risk that the Contract will terminate, since a loan decreases the Cash Surrender Value. If the death benefit becomes payable while a Contract loan is outstanding, the loan balance will be deducted in calculating the Death Proceeds. A loan may have tax consequences. In addition, if you surrender the Contract or allow it to lapse while a Contract loan is outstanding, the amount of the loan, to the extent it has not previously been taxed, will be added to any amount you receive and taxed accordingly. (See "TAX CONSIDERATIONS") Risk of Frequent Transfers. We have policies and procedures that attempt to detect frequent, large, programmed, or short-term transfers among the Subaccounts that may adversely affect other Owners and persons with rights under the Contracts. We employ various means to try to detect such transfer activity, but the detection and deterrence of harmful trading activity involves judgments that are inherently subjective. Our ability to detect such transfer activity may be limited by operational and technological systems, as well as our ability to predict strategies employed by Owners to avoid such detection. Accordingly, there is no assurance that we will prevent all transfer activity that may adversely affect Owners and other persons with interests under the Contracts. In addition, we cannot guarantee that the Funds will not be harmed by transfer activity related to other insurance companies and/or retirement plans that may invest in the Funds. PORTFOLIO RISKS A comprehensive discussion of the risks of each Fund Portfolio may be found in each Portfolio s prospectus. Please refer to the Portfolios prospectuses for more information. There is no assurance that any Portfolio will achieve its stated investment objective. FEE TABLE The following tables describe the fees and expenses that you will pay when buying, owning, and surrendering the Contract. The first table describes transaction fees that you will pay at the time that you pay Premiums, make partial surrenders, transfer Contract Value among the Subaccounts and the Fixed Account, completely surrender the Contract, the Contract lapses, or the Specified Amount is reduced (including when a partial surrender reduces the Specified Amount). If the amount of a charge depends on the personal characteristics of the Insured under the Contract, the fee table lists the minimum and maximum charges we assess under the Contract and the fees and charges of a representative Contract with an Insured having the characteristics described for that charge. These minimum, maximum and representative charges may assist you in understanding the range of possible charges, as well as the charge an Owner may typically pay, but these charges may not be representative of the amount you will actually pay under the Contract. Charge Premium Expense Charge State and Local Tax Charge Surrender Charge 2 Deferred Sales Load Transaction Fees When Charge is Deducted Upon receipt of each Premium Payment Upon surrender, lapse, or decrease in the Specified Amount during the first 15 Contract Years 3 Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge % of each Premium Payment 30% of actual Premiums paid up to a maximum Premium amount shown in the Contract % of each Premium Payment 30% of actual Premiums paid up to a maximum Premium amount shown in the Contract 4 1 For each type of charge, the guaranteed charge and the current charge are shown. The guaranteed charge is the maximum amount permitted by the Contract while the current charge is the amount currently charged. 2 The surrender charge is the sum of the deferred sales load and the deferred administrative expense. 3 If you increase the Contract s Specified Amount, a separate deferred sales load will apply to the Specified Amount increase, based on the Insured s Age and sex at the time of the increase. 411 Charge Deferred Administrative Expense Transaction Fees When Charge is Deducted Upon surrender, lapse, or decrease in the Specified Amount during the first 15 Contract Years 5 Partial Surrender Fee Upon each partial surrender The lesser of 2% of the amount surrendered or $25 Transfer Processing Fee Upon each transfer over 6 in a Contract Year Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 $5.00 per $1,000 of $5.00 per $1,000 of Specified Amount 6 Specified Amount 6 The lesser of 2% of the amount surrendered or $25 $25 per transfer $25 per transfer 4 During the first 15 Contract Years (or the 15 years following an increase in Specified Amount), the deferred sales load is 30% of actual Premiums paid up to a maximum Premium amount shown in the Contract. We base the maximum Premium amount shown in a Contract on the issue age, sex, Specified Amount and smoking class of the Insured. The deferred sales load decreases after the 9 th Contract Year to 0% in the 15 th Contract Year. 5 If you increase the Contract s Specified Amount, a separate deferred administrative expense will apply to the Specified Amount increase, based on the Insured s Age and sex at the time of the increase. 6 During the first 5 Contract Years, the deferred administrative expense is $5.00 per $1,000 of Specified Amount and grades down to zero at the end of 15 years as shown below: End of Contract Year Charge per $1,000 of Specified Amount: $5.00 $4.50 $4.00 $3.50 $3.00 $2.50 $2.00 $1.50 $1.00 $0.50 $0.00 End of Contract Year means completed Contract Years or number of completed years following an increase in Specified Amount. The deferred administrative expense applies at the end of each Contract Year. 512 The next table describes the fees and expenses that you will pay periodically during the time that you own the Contract, not including Portfolio fees and expenses. If the amount of a charge depends on the personal characteristics of the Insured under the Contract, the fee table lists the minimum and maximum charges we assess under the Contract depending on whether the Insured had the most favorable or least favorable characteristics, respectively. The table also lists the fees and charges of a typical Contract with a Specified Amount and with an Insured having the characteristics described for that charge. These charges may not be typical of the charges you will pay. Periodic Charges Other Than Portfolio Operating Expenses Charge Cost of Insurance 7 Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Monthly Expense Charge 9 Maintenance Charge Acquisition Charge Mortality and Expense Risk Charge Net Loan Interest Charge 11 When Charge is Deducted On the Allocation Date and each Monthly Anniversary Day On the Allocation Date and each Monthly Anniversary Day Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 $ $26.63 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 $0.16 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 $ $26.63 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 $0.16 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 On the Contract Date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day $6.00 $6.00 On the Contract Date and on $20.00 $20.00 each Monthly Anniversary Day for the first Contract Year 10 Daily Annual rate of 0.90% Annual rate of 0.90% of the average daily of the average daily net assets of each net assets of each Subaccount you are Subaccount you are invested in invested in At the end of each Contract 2% 2% Year 7 Costs of insurance charges vary based on the Insured s Age, sex, number of completed Contract Years, Specified Amount, risk class, and other factors. The charge generally is higher for less favorable risk classes and increases as the Insured ages. The cost of insurance charges shown in the table may not be typical of the charges you will pay. We guarantee that the cost of insurance rates will not exceed the maximum cost of insurance rates set forth in your Contract. More detailed information concerning your cost of insurance charges is available on request from our Home Office. 8 The net amount at risk on a Monthly Anniversary Day is the difference between the death benefit and the Contract Value. 9 The monthly expense charge is the sum of the maintenance charge and the acquisition charge. 10 The acquisition charge is also assessed for 12 months following the effective date of an increase in Specified Amount. 11 The maximum guaranteed and current net cost of loans is 2% annually. The net cost of a loan is the difference between the rate of interest charged on any Indebtedness (6%) and the amount credited to the Loan Account (4%). Preferred loans are available beginning in the eleventh Contract Year. We credit the amount in the Loan Account securing a preferred loan with interest at an effective annual rate of 6%. Therefore, the net cost of a preferred loan is 0% per year. 613 Periodic Charges Other Than Portfolio Operating Expenses Charge Optional Rider Charges 12 Disability Continuance of Insurance Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Disability Premium Benefit Rider When Charge is Deducted On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 $ $0.52 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 $0.03 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 $ $0.32 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 $0.01 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Accidental Death Benefit Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Option to Increase Specified Amount Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day $ $0.32 per $1.00 of rider coverage amount $0.09 per $1.00 of rider coverage amount $ $0.16 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.09 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $0.18 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.18 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $0.15 per $1.00 of rider coverage amount $0.04 per $1.00 of rider coverage amount $ $0.16 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.09 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $0.18 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.18 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount 12 Charges for most of the riders vary based on the Insured s issue or actual Age, sex, and risk class, and may vary based on Contract Year and base Specified Amount or net amount at risk. Charges based on risk classes are generally higher for less favorable risk classes, and charges based on actual Age may increase as the Insured ages. The rider charges shown in the table may not be typical of the charges you will pay. Your Contract s specifications page will indicate the rider charges applicable to your Contract, and more detailed information concerning these rider charges is available on request from our Service Center. 714 Periodic Charges Other Than Portfolio Operating Expenses Charge Spouse's Term Insurance Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Children's Term Insurance Other Insured Term Insurance Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Extra Protection Rider Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Monthly Benefit Rider Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year When Charge is Deducted On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 $ $1.87 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $1.45 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.50 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $26.63 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.16 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $26.63 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.16 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $22.56 per $100 of coverage amount $1.73 per $100 of coverage amount for a 20 year payout $ $1.87 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $1.45 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.50 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $26.63 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.16 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $20.36 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $0.09 per $1,000 of rider coverage amount $ $22.05 per $100 of coverage amount $1.41 per $100 of coverage amount for a 20 year payout 815 Periodic Charges Other Than Portfolio Operating Expenses Charge Acceleration of Death Proceeds/Enhanced Living Benefits Rider Minimum and Maximum Charge Charge for a 37 year-old male Preferred Nonsmoker and a Contract with a $200,000 Specified Amount during the first Contract Year Accelerated Death Benefit/Living Benefits Rider Accelerated Death Benefit/Terminal Illness Rider When Charge is Deducted On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On rider s effective date and on each Monthly Anniversary Day On payment of the accelerated death benefit On payment of the accelerated death benefit Amount Deducted Guaranteed Charge 1 Current Charge 1 $ $15.00 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 multiplied by the Benefit Base divided by the Specified Amount of the Contract $0.08 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 multiplied by the Benefit Base divided by the Specified Amount of the Contract $ $0.28 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 multiplied by the Benefit Base divided by the Specified Amount of the Contract $0.02 per $1,000 of net amount at risk 8 multiplied by the Benefit Base divided by the Specified Amount of the Contract $250 processing fee No Charge $200 processing fee, and an interest charge equal to the accelerated death benefit amount multiplied by the applicable loan interest rate divided by 1 plus the loan interest rate. The loan interest rate is stated in your Contract. $0 processing fee, and an interest charge equal to the accelerated death benefit amount multiplied by the applicable loan interest rate divided by 1 plus the loan interest rate. The loan interest rate is stated in your Contract. Maturity Extension Rider NA No Charge No Charge For information concerning compensation paid in connection with the sale of the Contracts, see "SALE OF THE CONTRACTS." 916 The next table shows the lowest and highest total operating expenses deducted from Portfolio assets during the fiscal year ended December 31, Expenses of the Portfolios may be higher or lower in the future. More detail concerning each Portfolio s fees and expenses is contained in the prospectus for each Portfolio. RANGE OF PORTFOLIO OPERATING EXPENSES 13 Total Annual Portfolio Operating Expenses (total of all expenses that are deducted from Portfolio assets, including management fees, distribution or service fees (12b-1 fees), and other expenses-before any contractual waiver of fees and expenses) Minimum Maximum 0.27% 1.68% The portfolio expenses used to prepare this table were provided to Kansas City Life by the Fund(s) or their investment advisers. The expenses shown are those incurred for the year ended December 31, Current or future expenses may be greater or less than those shown. If required by applicable law, Kansas City Life may deduct any redemption fees imposed by the Funds. 14 The table showing the range of expenses of the Portfolios takes into account the expenses of several fund asset allocation portfolios that are fund of funds. A fund of funds portfolio typically allocates its assets, within predetermined percentage ranges, among certain other fund portfolios (each such portfolio an acquired fund. ) Each fund of funds has its own set of operating expenses, as does each of the portfolios in which it invests. In determining the range of portfolio expenses, Kansas City Life took into account the information received from the Fund on the combined actual expenses for each of the fund of funds and the portfolios in which it invests. See the Fund prospectuses for more information. The following tables show the fees and expenses charged (after contractual waiver or reimbursement) by each Portfolio for the fiscal year ended December 31, ANNUAL PORTFOLIO OPERATING EXPENSES 15 (expenses that are deducted from Portfolio assets, as a percentage of net assets of the Portfolio): 15 These expenses are deducted directly from the assets of the Portfolios and therefore reduce their net asset value. The investment adviser of each Fund or the Fund provided the information, and Kansas City Life has not independently verified it. The expenses shown are those incurred for the year ended December 31, Current or future expenses may be greater or less than those shown. See the Portfolios' prospectuses for more complete information. Portfolio AIM Variable Insurance Funds (Invesco Variable Insurance Funds) Invesco V.I. American Franchise Fund Series I Shares Invesco V.I. Core Equity Fund Series I Shares Invesco V.I. Technology Fund Series I Shares Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.67% NA 0.28% NA 0.95% NA NA 0.61% NA 0.29% 0.02% 0.92% 0.02% % 0.75% NA 0.41% NA 1.16% NA NA 16 Invesco Advisers, Inc. ("Invesco or the Adviser") has contractually agreed to waive a portion of the Fund s management fee in an amount equal to the net management fee that Invesco earns on the Fund s investments in certain affiliated funds. This waiver will have the effect of reducing Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses that are indirectly borne by the Fund. Unless Invesco continues the fee waiver agreement, it will terminate on June 30, The fee waiver agreement cannot be terminated during its term. 1017 Portfolio American Century Variable Portfolios, Inc. American Century VP Capital Appreciation Fund Class I American Century VP Income & Growth Fund Class I American Century VP International Fund Class I American Century VP Mid Cap Value Fund Class I American Century VP Ultra Fund Class I American Century VP Value Fund Class I American Century Variable Portfolios II, Inc. American Century VP Inflation Protection Fund Class II Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 1.00% NA 0.00% NA 1.00% NA NA 0.70% NA 0.00% NA 0.70% NA NA 1.33% NA 0.00% NA 1.33% NA NA 1.00% NA 0.01% NA 1.01% NA NA 1.00% NA 0.00% NA 1.00% NA NA 0.96% NA 0.00% NA 0.96% NA NA 0.47% 0.25% 0.00% NA 0.72% NA NA Portfolio Calamos Advisors Trust Calamos Growth and Income Portfolio Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.75% NA 0.67% NA % NA NA 17 For the year ended December 31, 2014, the Fund's Other Expenses included less than 1 basis point (0.01%) of Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses from investments in money market funds. Portfolio Columbia Funds Variable Series Trust II Columbia Variable Portfolio Mid Cap Growth Fund (Class 2) (formerly Columbia Variable Portfolio Mid Cap Growth Opportunity Fund (Class 2)) Columbia Variable Portfolio Seligman Global Technology Fund (Class 2) Columbia Variable Portfolio Select Smaller-Cap Value Fund (Class 2) Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.76% 0.25% 0.15% NA 1.16% NA NA 0.95% 0.25% 0.25% NA 1.45% NA NA 0.79% 0.25% 0.19% NA 1.23% NA NA 1118 Portfolio Dreyfus Variable Investment Fund Appreciation Portfolio Initial Shares Opportunistic Small Cap Portfolio Initial Shares Dreyfus Stock Index Fund, Inc. Initial Shares The Dreyfus Socially Responsible Growth Fund, Inc. Initial Shares Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.75% NA 0.05% NA 0.80% NA NA 0.75% NA 0.08% NA 0.83% NA NA 0.25% NA 0.02% NA 0.27% NA NA 0.75% NA 0.09% NA 0.84% NA NA Portfolio Federated Insurance Series Federated Managed Tail Risk Fund II - P Federated High Income Bond Fund II - P Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.75% 0.00% % % 1.68% 0.63% % 0.60% NA 0.17% 19 NA 0.77% 0.00% % Federated Prime Money Fund II 0.50% NA 0.18% 19 NA 0.68% 0.01% % 18 The Fund has adopted a Distribution (12b-1) Plan pursuant to which the Fund may incur or charge a Distribution (12b-1) fee of up to a maximum amount of 0.25%. No such fee is currently incurred or charged by the Fund. The Fund will not incur or charge such a Distribution (12b-1) fee until such time as approved by the Fund s Board of Trustees (the Trustees ). 19 The Fund may incur or charge an administrative services fee up to a maximum amount of 0.25%. No such fee is currently incurred or charged by the Fund. The Fund will not incur or charge such an Administrative Services fee until such time as approved by the Board of Trustees (the Trustees ). 20 Effective May 1, 2015, the Adviser and its affiliates on their own initiative have agreed to waive their fees and/or reimburse expenses so that the total annual fund operating expenses (excluding Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses, extraordinary expenses and proxy-related expenses paid by the Fund, if any) paid by the Fund s P class (after the voluntary waivers and/or reimbursements) will not exceed 0.28% (the Fee Limit ) up to but not including the later of (the Termination Date ): (a) May 1, 2016; or (b) the date of the Fund s next effective Prospectus. While the Adviser and its affiliates currently do not anticipate terminating or increasing these arrangements prior to the Termination Date, these arrangements may only be terminated or the Fee Limit increased prior to the Termination Date with the agreement of the Trustees. 21 The Adviser and its affiliates on their own initiative have agreed to waive their fees and/or reimburse expenses so that the total annual fund operating expenses (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, extraordinary expenses and proxy-related expenses paid by the Fund, if any) paid by the Fund s P class (after the voluntary waivers and/or reimbursements) will not exceed 0.80% (the Fee Limit ) up to but not including the later of (the Termination Date ): (a) May 1, 2016; or (b) the date of the Fund s next effective Prospectus. While the Adviser and its affiliates currently do not anticipate terminating or increasing these arrangements prior to the Termination Date, these arrangements may only be terminated or the Fee Limit increased prior to the Termination Date with the agreement of the Trustees. 22 The Adviser and its affiliates on their own initiative have agreed to waive their fees and/or reimburse expenses so that the total annual fund operating expenses (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, extraordinary expenses and proxy-related expenses paid by the Fund, if any) paid by the Fund (after the voluntary waivers and/or reimbursements) will not exceed 0.67% (the Fee Limit ) up to but not including the later of (the Termination Date ): (a) May 1, 2016; or (b) the date of the Fund s next effective Prospectus. While the Adviser and its affiliates currently do not anticipate terminating or increasing these arrangements prior to the Termination Date, these arrangements may only be terminated or the Fee Limit increased prior to the Termination Date with the agreement of the Trustees. 1219 Portfolio Fidelity Variable Insurance Products Contrafund Portfolio VIP Contrafund Portfolio Service Class 2 Fidelity Variable Insurance Products VIP Freedom Income Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2010 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2015 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2020 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2025 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2030 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2035 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2040 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2045 Portfolio Service Class 2 VIP Freedom 2050 Portfolio Service Class 2 Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.55% 0.25% 0.08% NA 0.88% NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.45% 0.70% 23 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.55% 0.80% 23 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.58% 0.83% 23 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.60% 0.85% 23 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.64% 0.89% 23 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.68% 0.93% 23 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.69% 0.94% 23 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.69% 0.94% 23 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.69% 0.94% 23 NA NA NA 0.25% 0.00% 0.69% 0.94% 23 NA NA 23 Differs from the ratios of expenses to average net assets in the Financial Highlights section of the Fund Prospectus because of acquired fund fees and expenses. Portfolio Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance Products Trust Franklin Global Real Estate VIP Fund Class 2 Franklin Small-Mid Cap Growth VIP Fund Class 2 Templeton Developing Markets Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement % 0.25% 0.05% NA 1.35% NA NA % 0.25% 0.03% NA 1.05% NA NA 24,25 VIP Fund Class % 0.25% 0.12% NA 1.61% NA NA Templeton Foreign VIP Fund 24,25 Class % 0.25% 0.03% NA 1.02% NA NA 24 The Fund administration fee is paid indirectly through the management fee. 25 Management fees and other expenses have been restated to reflect current fiscal year fees and expenses as a result of the bundling of the fund's investment management agreement with its fund administration agreement effective May 1, Such combined investment management fees are described further under "Management" in the fund's prospectus. Total annual fund operating expenses are not affected by such bundling. 1320 Portfolio JPMorgan Insurance Trust JPMorgan Insurance Trust Mid Cap Value Portfolio Class 1 Shares JPMorgan Insurance Trust Small Cap Core Portfolio Class 1 Shares JPMorgan Insurance Trust U.S. Equity Portfolio Class 1 Shares Management Fees 12b-1/ Service Fees Other Expenses Acquired Fund Fees and Expenses Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses Contractual Fee Waiver or Expense Reimbursement Total Portfolio Annual Operating Expenses After Reimbursement 0.65% NA 0.14% 0.01% 0.80% 26 NA NA 0.65% NA 0.22% 0.02% 0.89% 27 NA NA 0.55% NA 0.25% 0.01% 0.81% 28 NA NA 26 The Portfolio s adviser and administrator (the Service Providers) have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses to the extent Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses of Class 1 Shares (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, dividend expenses related to short sales, interest, taxes, expenses related to litigation and potential litigation, extraordinary expenses and expenses related to the Board of Trustees deferred compensation plan) exceed 0.90% of their average daily net assets. This contract cannot be terminated prior to 5/1/16, at which time the Service Providers will determine whether or not to renew or revise it. 27 The Portfolio s adviser and administrator (the Service Providers) have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses to the extent Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses of Class 1 Shares (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, dividend expenses related to short sales, interest, taxes, expenses related to litigation and potential litigation, extraordinary expenses and expenses related to the Board of Trustees deferred compensation plan) exceed 1.03% of their average daily net assets. This contract cannot be terminated prior to 5/1/16, at which time the Service Providers will determine whether or not to renew or revise it. 28 The Portfolio s adviser and administrator (the Service Providers) have contractually agreed to waive fees and/or reimburse expenses to the extent Total Annual Fund Operating Expenses of Class 1 Shares (excluding acquired fund fees and expenses, dividend expenses related to short sales, interest, taxes, expenses related to litigation and potential litigation, extraordinary expenses and expenses related to the Board of Trustees deferred compensation plan) exceed 0.80% of their average daily net assets. This contract cannot be terminated prior to 5/1/16, at which time the Service Providers will determine whether or not to renew or revise it. 14  View more














Similar documents





CENTURY II VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE PROSPECTUS INDIVIDUAL FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE LIFE INSURANCE CONTRACT



        CENTURY II VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE PROSPECTUS INDIVIDUAL FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE LIFE INSURANCE CONTRACT KANSAS CITY LIFE VARIABLE LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT OF KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Street Address:    

        More information 




KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY. Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account



        KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account Supplement dated May 1, 2016 to the Prospectus dated May 1, 2016 for the Century II Accumulator Variable Universal Life    

        More information 




Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy



        May 1, 2015 State Farm Life Insurance Company P R O S P E C T U S Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy prospectus PROSPECTUS DATED MAY 1, 2015 INDIVIDUAL FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE INSURANCE    

        More information 




Variable Deferred Annuity



        May 1, 2015 State Farm Life Insurance Company P R O S P E C T U S Variable Deferred Annuity profile Profile Dated May 1, 2015 STATE FARM VARIABLE DEFERRED ANNUITY POLICY STATE FARM LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY    

        More information 




Thrivent Financial Variable Universal Life Insurance II



        Thrivent Financial Variable Universal Life Insurance II Prospectuses April 30, 2015 Thrivent Variable Life Account I Thrivent Series Fund, Inc. How Do You Want to Hear From Us? Choose email, U.S. mail    

        More information 




Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Prospectus May 2015



        Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Prospectus May 2015 Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Prospectus VAE0515 Annuities issued in all states except New York by Transamerica Premier Life Insurance Company, Cedar    

        More information 




MINNESOTA LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY



        MINNESOTA LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Minnesota Life Individual Variable Universal Life Account Supplement Dated August 22, 2015 to the Prospectus for Accumulator Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy (dated    

        More information 




Guaranteed Income for Life (GIFL) Rollover Variable Annuity IRA



        GIFL_Prospectus Cvr_Prdt 0414:Layout 1 4/29/14 10:36 AM Page 2 Guaranteed Income for Life (GIFL) Rollover Variable Annuity IRA PROSPECTUS Exclusively available for 401(k) plan participants with the John    

        More information 




Excel Performance Variable Universal Life Prospectus May 1, 2016



        Excel Performance Variable Universal Life Prospectus May 1, 2016 Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. LI 1253 5-16 PROSPECTUS: May 1, 2016 Excel Performance VUL Individual Flexible Premium Variable Universal    

        More information 




Allstate ChoiceRate Annuity



        Allstate ChoiceRate Annuity Allstate Life Insurance Company P.O. Box 80469 Lincoln, NE 68501-0469 Telephone Number: 1-800-203-0068 Fax Number: 1-866-628-1006 Prospectus dated May 1, 2008 Allstate Life    

        More information 




AFAdvantage Variable Annuity



        AFAdvantage Variable Annuity from May 1, 2013 AFAdvantage Variable Annuity issued by American Fidelity Separate Account B and American Fidelity Assurance Company PROSPECTUS May 1, 2013 American Fidelity    

        More information 




Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY")



        Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY") Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VUL Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts") Supplement to: Overture Encore!    

        More information 




The rates below apply for applications signed between December 15, 2015 and January 14, 2016. Income Growth Rate: 6.00% Income Percentages



        PRUDENTIAL DEFINED INCOME ( PDI ) VARIABLE ANNUITY PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY PRUCO LIFE FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE ANNUITY ACCOUNT PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY OF NEW JERSEY PRUCO LIFE of NEW JERSEY    

        More information 




The Hartford Saver Solution SM A FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT



        The Hartford Saver Solution SM A FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT  THE HARTFORD SAVER SOLUTION SM FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT This Disclosure Statement provides important information    

        More information 




Sentinel Benefit Provider A Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy Intended Primarily for the Corporate Market P R O S P E C T U S Dated May 1, 2009



        Sentinel Benefit Provider A Variable Universal Life Insurance Policy Intended Primarily for the Corporate Market P R O S P E C T U S Dated May 1, 2009 National Life Insurance Company Home Office: National    

        More information 




The Lincoln National Life Insurance Company (the "Company") A Stock Company



        Lincoln MoneyGuard II Sample Interstate Compact policy Issue State Alabama The Lincoln National Life Insurance Company (the "Company") A Stock Company Home Office: Service Office: State of Issue Department    

        More information 




Thrivent Financial Variable Universal Life Insurance



        Thrivent Financial Variable Universal Life Insurance Issued by Aid Association for Lutherans between 1998 and 2003 and by Thrivent Financial between 2003 and 2004. Prospectuses April 30, 2016 Thrivent    

        More information 




No-Load Variable Annuity



        May 1, 2008 P ROSPECTUS T. ROWE PRICE No-Load Variable Annuity ISSUED BY SECURITY BENEFIT LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY  VARIABLE ANNUITY PROSPECTUS T. Rowe Price No-Load Variable Annuity An Individual Flexible    

        More information 




The Hartford Saver Solution Choice SM A FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT



        The Hartford Saver Solution Choice SM A FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT  THE HARTFORD SAVER SOLUTION CHOICE SM FIXED INDEX ANNUITY DISCLOSURE STATEMENT This Disclosure Statement provides important    

        More information 




Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Product Guide



        Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Product Guide Advisor s Edge Product Guide Annuities issued by: Monumental Life Insurance Company Cedar Rapids, IA Underwritten and distributed by Transamerica Capital,    

        More information 




TRANSAMERICA LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Home Office: [4333 Edgewood Road NE, Cedar Rapids, IA 52499] A Stock Company



        TRANSAMERICA LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY Home Office: [4333 Edgewood Road NE, Cedar Rapids, IA 52499] A Stock Company Subject to the provisions of this Certificate and receipt of due proof of the Insured s    

        More information 




Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY")



        Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY") Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VUL Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts") Supplement to: Overture Encore!    

        More information 




RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV Estate Series



        April 29, 2013 RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV Estate Series This wrapper contains: Combined prospectus for RiverSource» Variable Universal Life IV and RiverSource»    

        More information 




Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Product Guide Effective July 1, 2015



        Advisor s Edge Variable Annuity Product Guide Effective July 1, 2015 Advisor s Edge Product Guide Annuities issued by Transamerica Premier Life Insurance Company Cedar Rapids, IA. Annuities are underwritten    

        More information 




SUPPLEMENT DATED MAY 19, 2015 FIRST INVESTORS INCOME AND EQUITY FUNDS PROSPECTUS DATED JANUARY 31, 2015



        SUPPLEMENT DATED MAY 19, 2015 FIRST INVESTORS INCOME AND EQUITY FUNDS PROSPECTUS DATED JANUARY 31, 2015 FIRST INVESTORS LIFE SERIES FUNDS PROSPECTUS DATED MAY 1, 2015 1. In The Funds Summary Section for    

        More information 




Lincoln ChoicePlus SM Design variable annuity



        FOR INCOME Prospectus Lincoln ChoicePlus SM Design variable annuity May 1, 2012 This document and many others can be read online by signing up for edelivery! Make a positive environmental impact by signing    

        More information 




RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV Estate Series



        April 29, 2013 RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV RiverSource Variable Universal Life IV Estate Series This wrapper contains: Combined prospectus for RiverSource» Variable Universal Life IV and RiverSource»    

        More information 




Pacific Life Insurance Company [45 Enterprise Aliso Viejo, CA 92656] [www.pacificlife.com (800) 347-7787]



        Pacific Life Insurance Company [45 Enterprise Aliso Viejo, CA 92656] [www.pacificlife.com (800) 347-7787] READ YOUR POLICY CAREFULLY. This is a legal contract between you, the Owner, and us, Pacific Life    

        More information 




Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY")



        Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. of New York ("Ameritas Life of NY") Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VUL Ameritas Life of NY Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts") Supplement to: Overture Encore!    

        More information 




Hy7hn MONUMENT ADVISOR JEFFERSON NATIONAL LIFE ANNUITY ACCOUNT G. May 1, 2015 PROSPECTUS



        Hy7hn MONUMENT ADVISOR JEFFERSON NATIONAL LIFE ANNUITY ACCOUNT G May 1, 2015 PROSPECTUS Monument Advisor Individual Variable Annuity Issued by: JEFFERSON NATIONAL LIFE ANNUITY ACCOUNT G AND JEFFERSON NATIONAL    

        More information 




Voya SmartDesign Multi-Rate Index Annuity



        Voya Insurance and Annuity Company Deferred Modified Guaranteed Annuity Prospectus Voya SmartDesign Multi-Rate Index Annuity May 1, 2015 This prospectus describes Voya SmartDesign Multi-Rate Index Annuity,    

        More information 




Prospectus. Sign up for edelivery! Principal Variable Universal Life Income SM. May 1, 2015 2012. www.principal.com, Your Profile, and sign up under



        Principal Variable Universal Life Income SM Prospectus May 1, 2015 2012 Sign up for edelivery! www.principal.com, Your Profile, and sign up under - For Life products, call 1-800-247-9988. For Annuity products,    

        More information 




RiverSource Variable Universal Life Insurance III



        April 29, 2013 RiverSource Variable Universal Life Insurance III This wrapper contains a prospectus. visit ameriprise.com/paperless S-6189 AF (4/13) Issued by: RiverSource Life Insurance Company From the    

        More information 




RiverSource Variable Universal Life Insurance III



        May 1, 2016 RiverSource Variable Universal Life Insurance III This wrapper contains a prospectus and a prospectus supplement dated May 1, 2016. S-6189 CA (5/16) Issued by: RiverSource Life Insurance Company    

        More information 




Allianz Vision SM Prospectus



        Allianz Life Insurance Company of New York www.allianzlife.com/newyork/ Allianz Vision New York Variable Annuity Allianz Vision SM Prospectus New York Variable Annuity Individual flexible-payment deferred    

        More information 




RELIASTAR LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY



        RELIASTAR LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY and its SELECT*LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT RELIASTAR SELECT VARIABLE ACCOUNT Supplement Dated June 14, 2010 This supplement updates and amends certain information contained in    

        More information 




Variable Universal Life II (VUL II)



        Variable Universal Life II (VUL II) Issued by Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company Massachusetts Mutual Variable Life Separate Account I This prospectus describes an individual, flexible premium,    

        More information 




Freedom Global IUL II SM Freedom Index Universal Life II SM Index Universal Life Insurance Offered by WRL Agent Guide



        Freedom Global IUL II SM Freedom Index Universal Life II SM Index Universal Life Insurance Offered by WRL Agent Guide AG05113-01/12 Western Reserve Life Assurance Co. of Ohio  Thank you for your interest    

        More information 




SUPPLEMENT DATED NOVEMBER 2, 2015 TO THE PROSPECTUS DATED MAY 1, 2015 FOR ISP CHOICE OFFERED BY FORESTERS LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY COMPANY



        SUPPLEMENT DATED NOVEMBER 2, 2015 TO THE PROSPECTUS DATED MAY 1, 2015 FOR ISP CHOICE OFFERED BY FORESTERS LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY COMPANY This supplement makes changes to your prospectus regarding the    

        More information 




Strategic Group Variable Universal Life



        Strategic Group Variable Universal Life Issued by Massachusetts Mutual Life Insurance Company Massachusetts Mutual Variable Life Separate Account I This prospectus describes a variable rider issued in    

        More information 




Statement of Additional Information. May 1, 2013. New York Life Legacy Creator Single Premium Variable Universal Life Insurance



        Statement of Additional Information dated May 1, 2013 for New York Life Legacy Creator Single Premium Variable Universal Life Insurance from NEW YORK LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY CORPORATION ( NYLIAC ) This    

        More information 




Protection That Offers Selection To Fit Your Lifestyle! More Choices More Control!



        Protection That Offers Selection To Fit Your Lifestyle! More Choices More Control! Consumer Brochure A Flexible Premium Life Insurance Policy with Equity Index Options Policy Form 01-1143-07 and state    

        More information 




Sentinel Advantage Variable Annuity P R O S P E C T U S Dated May 1, 2011



        Sentinel Advantage Variable Annuity P R O S P E C T U S Dated May 1, 2011 National Life Insurance Company Home Office: National Life Drive, Montpelier, Vermont 05604 1-800-732-8939 The Contracts described    

        More information 




ING LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY COMPANY and its Variable Annuity Account C. State University of New York Defined Contribution Retirement Plans



        ING LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY COMPANY and its Variable Annuity Account C State University of New York Defined Contribution Retirement Plans Supplement dated October 3, 2007 to your current Contract Prospectus    

        More information 




Super Life Terms and Conditions. Super Life Series



        Super Life Terms and Conditions Super Life Series DEFINITIONS Administrative Office means the Company s office designated as such on the first page of this Policy. Age means the Insured s age at last birthday.    

        More information 




ConsecoLifeOptions SM



        Upside potential with downside protection. ConsecoLifeOptions SM indexed universal life insurance Freedom Choices Flexibility Conseco Insurance Company A life and health insurance company CL-LO-CB ConsecoLifeOptions    

        More information 




"This notice is not part of the accompanying prospectus"



        We no longer offer certain of our variable annuity products and are not required to update the annuity prospectuses for such products. We maintain on this site, for your reference, the most recent annuity    

        More information 




American Legacy Fusion variable annuity



        American Legacy Fusion variable annuity May 1, 2015 Product Prospectus This document and many others can be read online by signing up for edelivery! Make a positive environmental impact by signing up today!    

        More information 




SAMPLE. is equal to the Death Benefit less the Account Value of your policy.



        DEFINITIONS EquiLife Limited Pay UL (Joint first-to-die) The following are definitions of some of the terms used in your EquiLife Joint First-to-Die policy. If you need additional information or clarification    

        More information 




NATIONAL LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY NATIONAL VARIABLE LIFE INSURANCE ACCOUNT VARITRAK VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE INSURANCE POLICY



        NATIONAL LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY NATIONAL VARIABLE LIFE INSURANCE ACCOUNT VARITRAK VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE INSURANCE POLICY STATEMENT OF ADDITIONAL INFORMATION OFFERED BY NATIONAL LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY    

        More information 




WRL Financial Foundation IUL SM



        WRL Financial Foundation IUL SM Index Universal Life Insurance Agent Guide AG06113-07/13 Western Reserve Life Assurance Co. of Ohio Thank you for your interest in the WRL Financial Foundation IUL offered    

        More information 




19801NY 12/01/12 Exp. 01/15/13 '2012 Genworth Financial, Inc. All rights reserved. Page 1 of 13



        as of November 30, 2012 For contracts issued on or after May 1, 2003 RetireReady SM Choice NY 19801NY 12/01/12 Exp. 01/15/13 '2012 Genworth Financial, Inc. All rights reserved. Page 1 of 13 IMPORTANT INFORMATION    

        More information 




Cost-effective index universal life insurance with upside potential and downside protection



        Elite Index II Producer Guide Cost-effective index universal life insurance with upside potential and downside protection Policies issued by American General Life Insurance Company (AGL) Security and choice    

        More information 




"This notice is not part of the accompanying prospectus"



        We no longer offer certain of our variable annuity products and are not required to update the annuity prospectuses for such products. We maintain on this site, for your reference, the most recent annuity    

        More information 




A guide to buying insurance



        A guide to buying insurance What you should know before you buy Is life insurance right for you? Life insurance policies are designed for people who: Want to replace income that is lost due to death Seek    

        More information 




Personal Risk Profile and Asset Allocation A Guide to Investing Variable Product Series. Building your future with a secure partner



        Personal Risk Profile and Asset Allocation A Guide to Investing Variable Product Series Building your future with a secure partner SM Kansas City Life Insurance Company  Investment basics Taking personal    

        More information 




Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. ("Ameritas Life") Ameritas Variable Separate Account VL and Ameritas Variable Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts")



        Ameritas Life Insurance Corp. ("Ameritas Life") Ameritas Variable Separate Account VL and Ameritas Variable Separate Account VA ("Separate Accounts") Supplement to: Executive Select, Regent 2000, and Allocator    

        More information 




A Technical Guide for Individuals. The Whole Story. Understanding the features and benefits of whole life insurance. Insurance Strategies



        A Technical Guide for Individuals The Whole Story Understanding the features and benefits of whole life insurance Insurance Strategies Contents 1 Insurance for Your Lifetime 3 How Does Whole Life Insurance    

        More information 




CONSIDERATION. This Policy is issued in consideration of the Application for this Policy and the payment of the Initial Premium.



        Genworth Life Insurance Company (Hereinafter referred to as the Company ) A Stock Company State of Domicile: Delaware Home Office: [6610 West Broad Street, Richmond, VA 23230] Service Center Address: [3100    

        More information 




Allianz Life Insurance Company of North America www.allianzlife.com. A flexible-payment deferred variable annuity: Allianz Life Variable Account B



        Allianz Life Insurance Company of North America www.allianzlife.com Allianz Vision Variable Annuity Allianz Vision SM Prospectus Variable Annuity A flexible-payment deferred variable annuity: Allianz Life    

        More information 




Principal Investment Plus Variable Annuity SM. Prospectus (FOR APPLICATIONS SIGNED ON OR AFTER AUGUST 1, 2013) Prospectus.



        Principal Investment Plus Variable Annuity SM Prospectus Prospectus (FOR APPLICATIONS SIGNED ON OR AFTER AUGUST 1, 2013) May 1, 2013 2012 November August 1, 2, 2013 2015 Sign up for edelivery! principal.com,    

        More information 




Versa-Flex NLG. Guaranteed Protection for an Evolving Legacy. Flexible Premium Universal Life Insurance Client Guide VFNLG-1E



        Pacific Life Insurance Company Versa-Flex NLG Flexible Premium Universal Life Insurance Client Guide Guaranteed Protection for an Evolving Legacy VFNLG-1E VERSA-FLEX NLG As Your Life Changes, Your Life    

        More information 




Accumulator Variable Universal Life



        Accumulator Variable Universal Life Variable Product Series Building your future with a secure partner SM Kansas City Life Insurance Company Century II Accumulator Variable Universal Life Features at a    

        More information 




Roll-up Rate: 5% Withdrawal Percentages



        PRUDENTIAL PREMIER RETIREMENT VARIABLE ANNUITY (Offering Highest Daily Lifetime Income v3.0) PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY PRUCO LIFE FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE ANNUITY ACCOUNT PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY    

        More information 




QUICK NOTES SUPPLEMENTAL STUDY GUIDE NEW JERSEY



        QUICK NOTES SUPPLEMENTAL STUDY GUIDE NEW JERSEY A REVIEW SUPPLEMENT FOR THE NEW JERSEY LIFE, ACCIDENT & HEALTH STATE LICENSING EXAM (April 2016 Edition) What is Insurance Schools Quick Notes Supplemental    

        More information 




Transamerica Variable Annuity Series Prospectus May 2015



        Transamerica Variable Annuity Series Prospectus May 2015 edelivery from Transamerica Less paper conserves natural resources No waiting for the mail Receive documents electronically Store documents securely    

        More information 




MEMBERS Variable Annuity Series



        MEMBERS Variable Annuity Series Prospectus May 2015 edelivery from Transamerica Less paper conserves natural resources No waiting for the mail Receive documents electronically Store documents securely    

        More information 




Life Insurance Review Using Legacy Advantage SUL Insurance Policy



        Using Legacy Advantage SUL Insurance Policy Supplemental Illustration Prepared by: MetLife Agent 200 Park Ave. New York, NY 10166 Insurance Products: Not A Deposit Not FDIC-Insured Not Insured By Any Federal    

        More information 




PHOENIX EXECUTIVE VUL. Variable Universal Life



        PHOENIX EXECUTIVE VUL Variable Universal Life PHLVIC VARIABLE UNIVERSAL LIFE ACCOUNT December 1, 2008 PROSPECTUS PHLVIC Variable Universal Life Account Phoenix Benefit Choice VUL Phoenix Joint Edge VUL    

        More information 




A guide to buying insurance from Wells Fargo Advisors



        A guide to buying insurance from Wells Fargo Advisors What you should know before you buy Is life insurance right for you? Life insurance policies are designed for investors who: Seek liquidity to cover    

        More information 




ANNUITIES: WHAT ARE THEY AND HOW ARE THEY USED



        ANNUITIES: WHAT ARE THEY AND HOW ARE THEY USED (FORC Journal: Vol. 18 Edition 1 - Spring 2007) 1 An annuity is a contract under which the owner of the contract pays money or transfers assets to the obligor    

        More information 




11 NCAC 12.0436 INSURANCE POLICY REQUIREMENTS The Commissioner shall not approve any variable life insurance form filed pursuant to this Rule unless



        11 NCAC 12.0436 INSURANCE POLICY REQUIREMENTS The Commissioner shall not approve any variable life insurance form filed pursuant to this Rule unless it conforms to the requirements of this Section: (1)    

        More information 




Pacific PRIME UL-NLG Flexible Premium, Universal Life Insurance. Flexible and Efficient Asset Protection. Pacific Life Insurance Company PP-2C



        Pacific PRIME UL-NLG Flexible Premium, Universal Life Insurance Flexible and Efficient Asset Protection PP-2C Pacific Life Insurance Company 1 Pacific PRIME UL-NLG Help Protect Your Assets with Life Insurance    

        More information 




Statement of Additional Information. May 1, 2013. NYLIAC Survivorship Variable Universal Life



        Statement of Additional Information dated May 1, 2013 for NYLIAC Survivorship Variable Universal Life from NEW YORK LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITY CORPORATION ( NYLIAC ) This Statement of Additional Information    

        More information 




SAMPLE. means the age of a Life Insured on his or her nearest birthday.



        DEFINITIONS The following are definitions of some of the terms used in your Equimax Whole Life policy. If you need additional information or clarification please call one of our Individual Customer Service    

        More information 




Issued by Fidelity & Guaranty Life Insurance Company, Baltimore, MD Distributed by Legacy Marketing Group



        Issued by Fidelity & Guaranty Life Insurance Company, Baltimore, MD Distributed by Legacy Marketing Group Choices To Plan for the Long Term The financial challenges you face evolve with economic and life    

        More information 




Lifetime Income Benefit Rider



        for a secure Retirement Lifetime Income Benefit Rider (LIBR-2010)* Included automatically on most Fixed Indexed Annuities** for use with Fixed Indexed Annuities *May vary by state. Not available in all    

        More information 




T. Rowe Price Target Retirement 2030 Fund Advisor Class



        T. Rowe Price Target Retirement 2030 Fund Advisor Class Supplement to Summary Prospectus Dated October 1, 2015 Effective February 1, 2016, the T. Rowe Price Mid-Cap Index Fund and the T. Rowe Price Small-Cap    

        More information 




Variable Annuity. Transamerica Retirement Income Plus SM. Prospectus May 2015



        Transamerica Retirement Income Plus SM Prospectus May 2015 Variable Annuity edelivery from Transamerica Less paper conserves natural resources No waiting for the mail Receive documents electronically Store    

        More information 




Schwab Select Annuity



        Schwab Select Annuity Prospectus May 1, 2012 Detailed information about the Schwab Select Annuity Issued by Great-West Life & Annuity Insurance Company Rule 497(e) File Nos. 333-01153 and 811-07549 SCHWAB    

        More information 




Variable Annuity Prospectus



        Allianz Index Advantage New York Variable Annuity Allianz Life Insurance Company of New York www.allianzlife.com/newyork/ Allianz Index Advantage New York Variable Annuity Prospectus Individual flexible-payment    

        More information 




Understanding Annuities



        This guide: Explains the different types of annuity contracts Describes the various contractual features Discusses how to shop for an annuity State of Wisconsin Office of the Commissioner of Insurance    

        More information 




Variable Universal Life Permanent Life Insurance. Flexible premiums and potential cash value



        Variable Universal Life Permanent Life Insurance Flexible premiums and potential cash value Why consider a Variable Universal Life Policy? Permanent life insurance protection, plus potential cash value    

        More information 




Pruco Life Insurance Company Pruco Life Insurance Company of New Jersey



        Pruco Life Insurance Company Pruco Life Insurance Company of New Jersey PRUDENTIAL PREMIER RETIREMENT VARIABLE ANNUITY X SERIES SM ( X SERIES ) PRUDENTIAL PREMIER RETIREMENT VARIABLE ANNUITY B SERIES SM    

        More information 




Understanding Annuities



        This guide: Explains the different types of annuity contracts Describes the various contractual features Discusses how to shop for an annuity State of Wisconsin Office of the Commissioner of Insurance    

        More information 




LSW FlexLife Indexed Universal Life Insurance



        Indexed Universal Life Insurance Prepared on March 26, 2014 for The Client Presented by Trusted Agent 1 National Life Drive Montpelier, Vermont 05604 802 229-3333 Life Changes. Protect It. Product Issued    

        More information 




ATHENE ANNUITY AND LIFE COMPANY ALAC Separate Account 1. Visionary Variable Annuity Visionary Choice Variable Annuity



        ATHENE ANNUITY AND LIFE COMPANY ALAC Separate Account 1 Supplement Dated April 22, 2016 to the Prospectus and Statement of Additional Information Dated October 1, 2008 for Visionary Variable Annuity Visionary    

        More information 




Survivorship index universal life insurance



        Elite Survivor Index II Producer Guide Survivorship index universal life insurance Policies issued by American General Life Insurance Company (AGL) and The United States Life Insurance Company in the City    

        More information 




Roll-up Rate: 5% Withdrawal Percentages



        PRUDENTIAL PREMIER RETIREMENT VARIABLE ANNUITIES PRUDENTIAL PREMIER ADVISOR VARIABLE ANNUITIES (Offering Highest Daily Lifetime Income v3.0) PRUCO LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY PRUCO LIFE FLEXIBLE PREMIUM VARIABLE    

        More information 




SUMMARY PROSPECTUS. TCW High Yield Bond Fund FEBRUARY 29 I SHARE: TGHYX N SHARE: TGHNX



        TCW High Yield Bond Fund I SHARE: TGHYX N SHARE: TGHNX 20 6 FEBRUARY 29 SUMMARY PROSPECTUS Before you invest, you may want to review the Fund s Prospectus which contain more information about the Fund    

        More information 




Description of Employer Cash Flow and Assets



        Description of Employer Cash Flow and Assets SERP Select Account Liability Column 1 Employer Contribution The annual contribution promised by the employer to the key employee. The duration and amount of    

        More information 




your guide to equation gen IV



        your guide to EQUATION GENERATION IV equation gen IV CLIENT GUIDE ABOUT EQUITABLE LIFE OF CANADA Equitable Life is the largest federally regulated mutual life insurance company in Canada. For generations    

        More information 




Income-Tax Free Benefits for Your Heirs and Lifetime Benefits for You. Lifetime Benefits for You



        Indexed Universal Life Insurance 1 Income-Tax Free s for Your Heirs and Lifetime s for You Prepared on August 13, 2013 for by Trusted Advisor Income - 1 Tax Free s for Your Heirs Lifetime s for You Product    

        More information 




ReliaStar Life Insurance Company Separate Account N



        ReliaStar Life Insurance Company Separate Account N ING Advantage Century Plus SM (Prospectus No. PRO.100208-05) Supplement dated October 14, 2005 to the Contract Prospectus and Statement of Additional    

        More information 




RELIASTAR LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY



        RELIASTAR LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY and its SELECT*LIFE SEPARATE ACCOUNT RELIASTAR SELECT VARIABLE ACCOUNT Supplement Dated June 14, 2010 This supplement updates and amends certain information contained in    

        More information 




THE EMPIRE LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY TRILOGY. Policy Summary



        Policy Summary This Policy Summary is dated June 1, 2012. When you make a change to your Contract, we will issue a new version of these pages. The Policy Summary with the most recent date replaces any    

        More information 




SUMMARY REVIEW COLORADO COUNTY OFFICIALS AND EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ASSOCIATION 457 DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN FOR THE



        SUMMARY REVIEW FOR THE COLORADO COUNTY OFFICIALS AND EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ASSOCIATION 457 DEFERRED COMPENSATION PLAN TABLE OF CONTENTS INTRODUCTION... i HIGHLIGHTS... 2 PARTICIPATION... 2 Eligibility to    

        More information 




SECURITY LIFE OF DENVER INSURANCE COMPANY IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF SECURITY LIFE OF DENVER INSURANCE COMPANY



        SECURITY LIFE OF DENVER INSURANCE COMPANY and its Security Life Separate Account L1 and Security Life Separate Account S-L1 Supplement Dated July 31, 2015 This supplement amends certain information contained    

        More information 




CHAPTER 5 LIFE INSURANCE POLICY OPTIONS AND RIDERS



        CHAPTER 5 LIFE INSURANCE POLICY OPTIONS AND RIDERS There are a number of policy options and riders that the purchasers of insurance need to understand. Obviously, life and disability agents need to have    

        More information 




Prospectus. Sign up for edelivery! Principal Variable Universal Life Income II SM. May 1, 2016 2012



        Principal Variable Universal Life Income II SM Prospectus May 1, 2016 2012 Sign up for edelivery! www.principal.com, principal.com,my Profile, and sign up under - For Life products, call 1-800-247-9988.    

        More information 


















                2017 © DocPlayer.net Privacy Policy | Terms of Service | Feedback



















Variable Universal Life Insurance | Kansas City Life Insurance Company























Log In






Products
Find An Agency

Company Information
Careers
Become An Agency













Term LifeReturn of Premium LifeUniversal LifeIndexed Universal LifeVariable Universal LifeWhole LifeAnnuities







Variable Universal Life Insurance*


If you are looking for life insurance that offers flexible premiums along with the ability to increase or decrease your coverage, while providing a variety of investment options, then a Variable Universal Life (VUL) product might be a product to consider. Your VUL policy will provide security today with the cash value growth potential you need for tomorrow. 








Key benefits

Why is this important?


Premium flexibilityThe ability to increase or decrease premiums in the future to accommodate your budget or cash flow needs.

Death benefit flexibilityThe option to adjust the policy’s death benefit should your life insurance protection needs change in the future.

Builds cash valueAccumulates valuable long-term cash values for future cash needs such as helping fund a child’s college education, paying off your mortgage early, funding a business opportunity or supplementing retirement income.

Tax advantages Life insurance death proceeds are paid out income-tax free and the VUL policy’s cash values accumulate tax-deferred, an important feature when you consider how taxation can have an adverse effect on your savings growth potential. 

Favorable loan featureThe ability to access the VUL policy’s cash value tax-free through policy loans allows you to maximize your cash needs without sacrificing valuable life insurance protection. (Loan balances will reduce the death benefit.)

CustomizableThe option to design a VUL policy that reflects your particular needs and situation.

Investment optionsA Variable Universal Life policy allows you to decide how to invest your contract value. You can choose a variety of investments, some of which offer the potential for higher returns. Of course, investing in variable subaccounts involves risks that should be considered before making these choices.


How does Variable Universal Life work?


Variable Universal Life (VUL) is a form of cash-value life insurance that offers both a death benefit and an investment feature. The premium amount for VUL is flexible and may be changed by the policyowner as needed, though these changes can result in a change in the coverage amount. The investment feature includes "sub-accounts," which function very similar to mutual funds and can provide the possibility of a long-term cash accumulation potential greater than a fixed universal life or a traditional whole life.

You also have the ability to increase or decrease the amount of your coverage at any time  without buying a new policy (proof of insurability may be required for increase).

Kansas City Life Insurance Company also has many policy riders available that would allow you to design a life insurance policy that fits your particular needs and budget. For more information, please contact a licensed Kansas City Life Insurance Company agent near you.

You select the amount and frequency of your premium payments (subject to specified minimums and maximums). As long as there is adequate cash value to pay policy expenses, you can:




Increase premiums to accumulate cash value more rapidly or to eliminate premiums in later years


Decrease premiums when cash flow is a consideration

Stop premiums for a period of time




*Kansas City Life’s Century II Variable Product Series is distributed by Sunset Financial Services Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Kansas City Life Insurance Company.


View the Century II Variable Prospectuses

Variable Fund Performance






Learn more about related products
Universal life
Whole life 
Indexed Universal Life











Products

Term Life
Universal Life
Return of Premium
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Life*
Whole Life
Annuities
Financial Tools


Company

About Us
Leadership
Heritage
Industry Ratings
Financials
Subsidiaries
News & Press




Find An Agency
Careers
Become An Agency
Contact Us
Site Map

© Sunset Life Insurance Company 2013All rights reserved.
Twitter
Facebook







Kansas City Life Insurance Company | Life insurance and annuities























Log In






Products
Find An Agency

Company Information
Careers
Become An Agency





























Proudly serving policyholders since 1895



            Kansas City Life Insurance Company and its longstanding record of financial strength help you prepare for whatever the future may bring. We’ve made Security Assured a way of life and you can, too. From life insurance to annuities, Kansas City Life offers a full range of solutions to meet all of life’s changing moments.
            


Kansas City Life Insurance Company’s Purpose 
               Kansas City Life Insurance Company is dedicated to providing financial security to policyowners and their beneficiaries to assure them the quality of life they might otherwise not enjoy, and to sustaining the Company’s growth and prosperity through good management and reasonable profit.
            






Products
Life
Annuities
Group Benefits


Manage your account







New accounts register here!








Products

Term Life
Universal Life
Return of Premium
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Life*
Whole Life
Annuities
Financial Tools


Company

About Us
Leadership
Heritage
Industry Ratings
Financials
Subsidiaries
News & Press




Find An Agency
Careers
Become An Agency
Contact Us
Site Map

© Kansas City Life Insurance Company 2013All rights reserved.
Twitter
Facebook







Company information | Kansas City Life Insurance Company























Log In






Products
Find An Agency

Company Information
Careers
Become An Agency












About Us
Leadership
Heritage
Industry Ratings
Financials
Subsidiaries
News & Press







Kansas City Life by the Numbers



 









 




Kansas City Life Insurance Company
A promise of financial strength is only as good as the company that makes it. When Kansas City Life makes a promise, we stand behind it. Since 1895, we have assisted policyholders through world wars, the Great Depression and various periods of recession and inflation.

Kansas City Life’s reputation is built on integrity, sound investment strategies and honest business practices. To us, integrity is not an outdated notion in today’s fast-paced world. It is the guiding force behind every decision we make. Every product we sell is backed by more than a century of quality service and financial security.






Products

Term Life
Universal Life
Return of Premium
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Life*
Whole Life
Annuities
Financial Tools


Company

About Us
Leadership
Heritage
Industry Ratings
Financials
Subsidiaries
News & Press




Find An Agency
Careers
Become An Agency
Contact Us
Site Map

© Kansas City Life Insurance Company 2013All rights reserved.
Twitter
Facebook







Group Benefits | Kansas City Life Insurance Company























Log In






Products
Find An Agency

Company Information
Careers
Become An Agency
















Group Benefits


            Kansas City Life Group Benefits offers a full line of ancillary products. Employers with groups as small as two can find the right coverage at affordable prices. Here is a list of the products offered by Kansas City Life Group Benefits:
            
Small Group Products
            Intended for groups with two to nine employees and includes life, dental, long term disability, short term disability and vision.
            
True Group and Voluntary Products
            Intended for groups with 10 or more employees, and includes life, dental, long term disability, short term disability and vision.
            
ABACUS Series
            This flexible approach to employee benefits allows brokers to create customized plans through our unique rating strategy concept. Product may only require five enrolled. Voluntary Short Term Disability, Voluntary Long Term Disability and Voluntary Life are available.
            
            Learn more by visiting www.kclgroupbenefits.com. 
          














Products

Term Life
Universal Life
Return of Premium
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Life*
Whole Life
Annuities
Financial Tools


Company

About Us
Leadership
Heritage
Industry Ratings
Financials
Subsidiaries
News & Press




Find An Agency
Careers
Become An Agency
Contact Us
Site Map

© Kansas City Life Insurance Company 2013All rights reserved.
Twitter
Facebook




















Variable Products Funds Quarterly Update by Kansas City Life Insurance Company - issuu



















































issuu company logo
issuu












            Explore
        






                        Categories
                    


                                Arts & Entertainment
                            



                                Style & Fashion
                            



                                Home & Garden
                            



                                Business
                            



                                Travel
                            



                                Education
                            



                                See all categories
                                







                        Collections
                    


                                Top Picks
                            



                                Generators
                            



                                Hygge
                            



                                Feminism
                            



                                Zines
                            



                                Makers
                            






                        Find More
                    


                                Plans & Pricing
                            



                                Community
                            



                                Help & Support
                            



                                About issuu
                            









            Publisher Plans
        




















Close







                        Categories
                    


                                Arts & Entertainment
                            



                                Style & Fashion
                            



                                Home & Garden
                            



                                Business
                            



                                Travel
                            



                                Education
                            



                                See all categories
                                







                        Collections
                    


                                Top Picks
                            



                                Generators
                            



                                Hygge
                            



                                Feminism
                            



                                Zines
                            



                                Makers
                            






                        Find More
                    


                                Plans & Pricing
                            



                                Community
                            



                                Help & Support
                            



                                About issuu
                            












        Sign up
    

        Sign in
    

        Sign in
    










﻿


PDFfiller. On-line PDF form Filler, Editor, Type on PDF, Fill, Print, Email, Fax and Export


























































Loading, please wait...





Hm... Are You a Human?



                Your activity on our website looks slightly suspicious.
                
                For you to prove us wrong, please check the box below.
            


















Features
PDFfiller

About Us
Blog
Career
Whitepapers
Contact Us
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Guides
User Reviews
CRMs we love



Forms Library

Top 100 Forms
PDF Search Engine
A-Z Listing of Forms
Forms Catalog


Mobile App

iOS Application
Android Application



Functions

Edit PDFs Online
LinkToFill
SendToSign


Comparison

Adobe Acrobat Alternative
DOCSTOC ALTERNATIVE


Integrations

Salesforce
Dynamics



Support

FAQ
Tutorial Videos
Pricing


For Business

Insurance
Medical
Real Estate
Human Resources
Tax & Finance
Legal



Free Resources

Merge PDFS
Convert Word to PDF


Developers

Get Started
API Documentation
API Pricing




            © 2006-2017 PDFfiller Inc.All rights reserved
        






























                PDFfiller friendly support
                




















Kansas City Life























Log In






Products
Find An Agency

Company Information
Careers
Become An Agency





	Account Registration - Kansas City Life Insurance Company
















Create Account




* indicates required information



I Am A...*


                                    Policy Owner
                                


 


                                    Plan Sponsor
                                


 


                                    Third Party Administrator
			                    



Company Name*

                                        Enter your company name
                                    










First*
MI
Last*

Name












KCL Policy #*

                                        Enter a Kansas City Life Insurance policy number
                                    










KCL Billing #*

                                        Enter a Kansas City Life Insurance combined billing number
                                    









SSN or Tax ID*

                                    Enter your Social Security Number in the format (111-22-3333)
                                




                                    or Tax ID with the format (11-2222222)
                                








Email*

                                    Enter your email address
                                








Verify Email*

                                    Re-enter your email address
                                








Email as UserID?


                                     (Recommended)



User ID*

                                    This will be your login name
                                








Password*

                                    ( Password must be at least 6 characters )
                                








Verify Password*

                                    Re-enter your password
                                








Hint*

                                    Enter a hint that relates to your password
                                























Products

Term Life
Universal Life
Return of Premium
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Life*
Whole Life
Annuities
Financial Tools


Company

About Us
Leadership
Heritage
Industry Ratings
Financials
Subsidiaries
News & Press




Find An Agency
Careers
Become An Agency
Contact Us
Site Map

© Kansas City Life Insurance Company 2013All rights reserved.
Twitter
Facebook










SEC Info - Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account - ‘485BPOS’ on 8/28/00










SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account – ‘485BPOS’ on 8/28/00On:  Monday, 8/28/00, at 5:13pm ET   ·   Effective:  8/28/00   ·   Accession #:  948972-0-6   ·   File #:  333-25443
Previous ‘485BPOS’:  ‘485BPOS’ on 8/28/00   ·   Next:  ‘485BPOS’ on 4/30/01   ·   Latest:  ‘485BPOS’ on 4/25/17



  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size

 8/28/00  Kansas City Life Var Life S..Acct 485BPOS     8/28/00    5:108KF-->Post-Effective AmendmentFiling Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: 485BPOS     Kansas City Variable Life-485Bpos                     35±   163K 
 2: EX-2        Plan of Acquisition, Reorganization, Arrangement,      1      8K 
                          Liquidation or Succession                              
 3: EX-6        Opinion re: Discount on Capital Shares                 1      7K 
 4: EX-7.A      Opinion re: Liquidation Preference                     1      5K 
 5: EX-7.B      Opinion re: Liquidation Preference                     1      6K 

D-->485BPOS   —   Kansas City Variable Life-485Bpos
P-->
As filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on August 28, 2000.        
Registration No. 333-25443                                                      

    SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, D.C.  20549

 POST-EFFECTIVE AMENDMENT NO. 4 TO
FORM S-6  
      FOR REGISTRATION UNDER THE SECURITIES ACT OF 1933 OF SECURITIES OF
    UNIT INVESTMENT TRUSTS REGISTERED ON FORM N-8B-2

       Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account (Exact name of trust)

KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY  
(Name of depositor) 
3520 Broadway 
Kansas City, Missouri 64141-6139 
(Complete address of depositor's principal  
executive offices)        

C. John Malacarne 
Kansas City Life Insurance Company  
                    3520 Broadway  Kansas City,  Missouri 64141-6139  (Name and
complete address of agent for service)            

Copy to:  Stephen E. Roth, Esq.                                                 
Sutherland, Asbill & Brennan LLP                            
1275 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W.                              
Washington, D.C. 20004-2415                                

It is proposed that this filing will become effective:                          

___immediately upon filing pursuant to paragraph (b) of Rule 485                
_X_on August 29, 2000 pursurant to paragraph (b) of Rule 485                    
___60 days after filing pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) of Rule 485                
___on (date) pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) of Rule 485                           
Copy to:  Stephen E. Roth Esq.                                                  
Sutherland, Asbill & Brennan                                                    
1275 Pennsylvania Ave, N.W.                                                     
Washington, D.C. 20004-2415                                                    

Securities Being Offered -- Flexible Premium Variable Joint Survivorship Life   
Insurance Contracts.                                                            

The  Prospectus  is  incorporated  by  reference to the  Prospectus  included in
Registrant's  Post-Effective  Amendment  No.3  to  Form  S-6,  Registration  No.
333-25443 filed on May 1, 2000.                                                 

Supplement Dated August 29, 2000 to Prospectus Dated May 1, 2000
 Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate Account
 Survivorship Variable Universal Life Contract

Effective August 29, 2000, we are adding nine  Subaccounts to the product.  This
Supplement  revises  the  Prospectus  to  provide   information  on  these  nine
Subaccounts  and the  corresponding  Funds.  This  Supplement  also provides new
information   regarding  changes  to  the  Transfer  Privilege  section  of  the
Prospectus.                                                                     

This  supplement  adds  information  to  the  following  five  sections  of  the
Prospectus:                                                                     

o        Front page-Listing of Funds                                            
o        Diagram of the Contract-Deductions from Assets                         
o        The Funds                                                              
o        Transfer Privilege                                                     
o        Illustrations                                                          

Listing of Additional Funds                                                     

We are adding the following  portfolios of a designated mutual fund ("Funds") to
the listing on the front page of the Prospectus:                                

Federated Insurance Series          Manager                                     
Federated International Small       Federated Global Investment Management Corp.
Company Fund II                                                             

Franklin Templeton Variable         Manager                                     
Insurance Products Trust                                                    

Franklin Small Cap Fund (Class 2)   Franklin Advisers, Inc.                     
Franklin Real Estate Fund (Class 2) Franklin Advisers, Inc.                     
Templeton Developing Markets        Templeton Asset Management Ltd.             
Securities Fund (Class 2)                                                   

AIM Variable Insurance Funds        Manager                                     
AIM V.I. Dent Demographic Trends    A I M Advisors, Inc.                        
Fund                                                                        
AIM V.I. Telecommunications and                                                 
Technology Fund                                                             
AIM V.I. Value Fund                                                             

Seligman Portfolios, Inc.           Manager                                     
Seligman Capital Portfolio          J. & W. Seligman & Co. Incorporated         
(Class 2)                                                                   
Seligman Communications and                                                     
Information Portfolio (Class 2)                                             

Diagram of the Contract-Deductions from Assets                                  

The following Fund expense  information is added to the tables beginning on page
7.                                                                              

                                       Federated
                                           International
                                           Small Company
                                     Fund II

Federated Insurance Series Annual Expenses                                      
(as a percentage of average net assets)                                         
Management Fees (Investment Advisory Fees) 10/         1.25%                    
Rule 12b-1 Fees 11/                                    0.25%                    
Shareholder Services Fees 12/                          0.25%                    
Other Expenses 13/                                     1.00%                    
Total Annual Fund Expenses                             2.75%                    
Waiver of Fund Expenses 14/                           (0.25%)                   
Net Annual Fund Expenses 14/                           2.50%                    

                                                                     Templeton
                                                                      Developing
                                        Franklin      Franklin     Markets
                                           Small Cap     Real Estate  Securities
                                     Fund          Fund         Fund
                                          (Class 2) 17/ (Class 2)    (Class 2)
                                                                       18/

Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance                                           
Products Trust Annual Expenses                                                  
(as a percentage of average net assets)                                         
Management Fees (Investment Advisory Fees) 0.55%          0.56% 15/    1.25%    
Rule 12b-1 Fees 16/                        0.25%          0.25%        0.25%    
Other Expenses                             0.27%          0.02%        0.31%    
Total Annual Fund Expenses                 1.07%          0.83%        1.81%    

                                         AIM V.I.    AIM V.I.           AIM V.I.
                                      Dent        Telecommunications Value
                                     Demographic and Technology     Fund
                  Trends Fund Fund
A I M Variable Insurance Funds                                                  
Annual Expenses                                                                 
(as a percentage of average net assets)                                         
Management Fees (Investment Advisory     0.85% 19/   1.00%              0.61%   
Fees)                                                                       
Other Expenses                           0.55% 20/   0.27%              0.15%   
Total Annual Fund Expenses               1.40%       1.27%              0.76%   

                            Seligman Capital         Seligman Communications
                              Portfolio                and Information Portfolio
              (Class 2)                (Class 2)
Seligman Portfolios,                                                            
Inc. Annual Expenses                                                        
(as a percentage of average                                                 
net assets)                                                                 
Management Fees (Investment   0.40%                    0.75%                    
Advisory Fees)                                                              
Rule 12b-1 Fees 21/           0.25%                    0.25%                    
Other Expenses                0.19%                    0.11%                    
Total Annual Fund Expenses    0.84%                    1.11%                    
Waiver of Fund Expenses        NA 22/                   NA 22/                  
Net Annual Fund Expenses      0.84% 22/                1.11% 22/                

10/ The adviser  expects to voluntarily  waive a portion of the management  fee.
The adviser can terminate this waiver at any time. The maximum management fee is
1.25%.                                                                          
11/ The Fund has no present intention of paying or accruing the distribution fee
during the fiscal year ending December 31, 2000. The maximum distribution fee is
0.25%.                                                                          
12/ The shareholder  services provider expects to voluntarily waive a portion of
its fee during the fiscal year ending December 31, 2000. The maximum shareholder
services fee is 0.25%.                                                          
13/ Since the Fund recently  commenced  operations,  Other  Expenses is based on
estimates for the current year.                                                 
14/ The waiver  amount shown in the table  reflects  only the waiver of the Rule
12b-1 Fees. After deducting the amount of voluntary waivers, the Net Annual Fund
Expenses would be 1.50%.                                                        
15/ The Fund administration fee is paid indirectly through the management fee.  
16/ The Fund has a distribution plan or Rule 12b-1 plan that is described in the
Fund's prospectus.                                                              
17/ On 2/8/00, a merger and reorganization was approved that combined the assets
of the Fund with a similar fund of the Templeton  Variable Products Series Fund,
effective  5/1/00. On 2/8/00,  Fund  shareholders  approved new management fees,
which apply to the combined  fund  effective  5/1/00.  The table shows  restated
Total Annual Fund  Expenses  based on the new fees and assets of the funds as of
12/31/99,  and not the  assets  of the  combined  fund.  However,  if the  table
reflected both the new fees and the combined  assets,  the Fund's expenses after
5/1/00 would be:  Management Fees 0.55%,  Rule 12b-1 Fees 0.25%,  Other Expenses
0.27%, and Total Annual Fund Expenses 1.07%.                                    
18/ On 2/8/00,  shareholders  approved a merger and reorganization that combined
the Fund with the Templeton  Developing  Markets Equity Fund,  effective 5/1/00.
The  shareholders of that fund had approved new management  fees, which apply to
the combined fund effective  5/1/00.  The table shows restated Total Annual Fund
Expenses  based on the new fees and the assets of the fund as of  12/31/99,  and
not the assets of the combined fund.  However,  if the table  reflected both the
new fees and the  combined  assets,  the Fund's  expenses  after 5/1/00 would be
estimated  as:  Management  Fees 1.25%,  Rule 12b-1 Fees 0.25%,  Other  Expenses
0.29%, and Total Annual Fund Expenses 1.79%.                                    
19/ The  advisor is to receive a fee  calculated  at the annual rate of 0.85% of
the first $2 billion of average  daily net assets and 0.80% of the average daily
net assets over $2 billion.                                                     
20/ Other Expenses is calculated based on estimates for the current year.       
21/ Under a Rule 12b-1 Plan adopted by the Fund with respect to each  Portfolio,
Class 2 shares pay annual 12b-1 Fees of up to 0.25% of average net assets.  Each
Portfolio pays this fee to Seligman Advisors, Inc., the principal underwriter of
the  Portfolio's  shares.  Seligman  Advisors  uses this fee to make payments to
participating  insurance  companies or their  affiliates  for services  that the
participating  insurance companies provide to Contract owners of Class 2 shares,
and for distribution related expenses.  Because these 12b-1 Fees are paid out of
the  Portfolio's  assets on an ongoing  basis,  over time they will increase the
cost of a Contract owner's  investment and may cost you more than other types of
sales charges.                                                                  
22/ The manager of Seligman Capital  Portfolio and Seligman  Communications  and
Information  Portfolio has voluntarily  agreed to reimburse  "Other Expenses" of
the  Portfolio  to the extent they exceed  0.20% per annum of average  daily net
assets.  No expenses were  reimbursed in 1999.  This agreement is not binding on
the manager.                                                                    

The Funds                                                                       

We are adding the investment objectives for each of the additional Portfolios to
The Funds  section of the  Prospectus  beginning  on page 13.  You  should  also
carefully read the individual prospectuses for each of the Funds along with this
Prospectus.                                                                     

Please note that not all Funds may be available in California.                  

Federated Insurance Series                                                      
(Manager:  Federated Global Investment Management Corp.)                        

     Federated  International Small Company Fund II. The investment objective is
to  provide  long-term  growth  of  capital.  The Fund  pursues  its  investment
objective  by  investing  at least 65% of its  assets in  equity  securities  of
foreign  companies that have a market  capitalization at the time of purchase of
$1.5 billion or less.                                                           

Franklin Templeton Variable Insurance Products Trust                            

     Franklin Small Cap Fund (Class 2) (Manager:  Franklin Advisers,  Inc.). The
Fund's  investment  goal  is  long-term  capital  growth.  Under  normal  market
conditions,  the Fund will invest at least 65% of its total assets in the equity
securities of U.S. small  capitalization  (small cap) companies.  For this Fund,
small cap companies are those companies with market cap values not exceeding (i)
$1.5  billion;  or (ii) the highest  market cap value in the Russell 2000 Index;
whichever is greater at the time of purchase.                                   

     Franklin Real Estate Fund (Class 2) (Manager:  Franklin Advisers, Inc). The
Fund's principal investment goal is capital appreciation.  Its secondary goal is
to earn current income. Under normal market conditions,  the Fund will invest at
least 65% of its total assets in securities  of companies  operating in the real
estate industry.                                                                

     Templeton Developing Markets Securities Fund (Class 2) (Manager:  Templeton
Asset  Management  Ltd.)  The  Fund's   investment  goal  is  long-term  capital
appreciation.  Under normal market conditions, the Fund will invest at least 65%
of its total assets in emerging market equity securities.                       

AIM Variable Insurance Funds                                                    
(Manager:  A I M  Advisors, Inc.)                                               

     AIM  V.I.  Dent  Demographic  Trends  Fund.  The  investment  objective  is
long-term  growth of capital.  The Fund seeks to meet its objective by investing
in securities of companies that are likely to benefit from changing demographic,
economic and lifestyle trends.                                                  

     AIM V.I.  Telecommunications  and Technology Fund. The investment objective
is  long-term  growth  of  capital.  The Fund  seeks to meet  its  objective  by
investing  primarily  in equity  securities  of companies  throughout  the world
engaged  in the  development,  manufacture  or  sale of  telecommunications  and
technology services or equipment.                                               

     AIM V.I.  Value Fund.  The  investment  objective  is to achieve  long-term
growth of capital.  Income is a secondary objective.  The Fund seeks to meet its
objectives  by  investing  primarily in equity  securities  judged by the Fund's
investment  advisor  to be  undervalued  relative  to the  investment  advisor's
appraisal  of the current or  projected  earnings of the  companies  issuing the
securities or relative to the equity market generally.                          

Seligman Portfolios, Inc.                                                       
(Manager:  J. & W. Seligman & Co. Incorporated)                                 

     Seligman   Capital   Portfolio   (Class  2).  The   objective   is  capital
appreciation.   The  Portfolio   invests   primarily  in  the  common  stock  of
medium-sized U.S. companies.                                                    

     Seligman   Communications   and  Information   Portfolio   (Class  2).  The
Portfolio's  objective  is capital  gain.  The  Portfolio  seeks to achieve this
objective by investing at least 80% of its net assets,  exclusive of  government
securities,  short-term notes, and cash and cash  equivalents,  in securities of
companies operating in the  communications,  information and related industries.
The Portfolio  generally  invests at least 65% of its total assets in securities
of companies engaged in these industries.                                       

Transfer Privilege                                                              

The following is added to the Transfer Privilege section beginning on page 21 of
the Prospectus:                                                                 

     An excessive  number of transfers,  including  short-term  "market  timing"
     transfers,  may adversely  affect the performance of the underlying Fund in
     which a Subaccount invests. If, in our sole opinion, a pattern of excessive
     transfers develops, we reserve the right not to process a transfer request.
     We also  reserve the right not to process a transfer  request when the sale
     or  purchase  of  shares  of a Fund is not  reasonably  practicable  due to
actions taken or limitations imposed by the Fund.                     

Illustrations                                                                   

The second sentence of the first paragraph under Charges  Illustrated on page 21
is deleted and replaced by the following:                                       

     The tables assume an average  annual expense ration of 0.96% of the average
daily net assets of the Portfolios available under the Contracts.     

The second sentence of the third paragraph under Charges  Illustrated on page 36
is deleted and replaced by the following:                                       

     After  deduction of Portfolio  expenses and the  mortality and expense risk
     charge,  the illustrated  gross annual investment rates of return of 0%, 6%
     and 12%  corresponds to approximate  net annual rates of -1.58%,  4.39% and
10.35%, respectively on a current basis.                              

The last sentence of the third paragraph under Charges Illustrated on page 36 is
deleted and replaced by the following:                                          

     After  deduction of Portfolio  expenses and the  guaranteed  mortality  and
     expense risk charge,  the  illustrated  gross  annual  investment  rates of
     return of 0%, 6% and 12%  corresponds  to  approximate  net annual rates of
-1.85%, 4.10% and 10.05%, respectively.                               

The illustration tables shown on pages 37 through 40 are deleted and replaced by
the following:                                                                  

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]


                              $6540 ANNUAL PREMIUM                                                                         
            $1,000,000 TOTAL SUM INSURED: $1,000,000 SPECIFIED AMOUNT                                                      
                                COVERAGE OPTION A                                                                          
                      USING CURRENT COST OF INSURANCE RATES                                                                
      Male, Standard Nonsmoker, Age 35; Female, Standard Nonsmoker, Age 35                                                 

---------- --------------------- ----------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------     
                                         0% Hypothetical Gross  6% Hypothetical Gross    12% Hypothetical Gross            
                                           Investment Return      Investment Return       Investment Return                
---------- --------------------- ------------------------------ ------------------------ --------------------- ----------  
  End of         Premiums          Contract   Cash       Death   Contract  Cash     Death   Contract  Cash      Death      
Contract Year  Accumulated at 5%    Value     Surrender  Benefit  Value   Surrender Benefit  Value    Surrender Benefit    
             Interest per Year                Value                       Value                       Value                
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------  
                                                                                                                           
   1              6,867            2,429       2,429   1,000,000   2,590    2,590  1,000,000   2,750     2,750   1,000,000 
   2             14,077            7,066       7,066   1,000,000   7,676    7,676  1,000,000   8,305     8,305   1,000,000 
   3             21,648           11,624      11,624   1,000,000  12,978   12,978  1,000,000  14,427    14,427   1,000,000 
   4             29,598           16,102      16,102   1,000,000  18,505   18,505  1,000,000  21,174    21,174   1,000,000 
   5             37,945           20,500      20,500   1,000,000  24,265   24,265  1,000,000  28,611    28,611   1,000,000 
   6             46,709           25,547      25,547   1,000,000  31,035   31,035  1,000,000  37,613    37,613   1,000,000 
   7             55,911           30,501      30,501   1,000,000  38,089   38,089  1,000,000  47,534    47,534   1,000,000 
   8             65,574           35,362      35,362   1,000,000  45,436   45,436  1,000,000  58,466    58,466   1,000,000 
   9             75,719           40,128      40,128   1,000,000  53,088   53,088  1,000,000  70,511    70,511   1,000,000 
  10             86,372           44,797      44,797   1,000,000  61,054   61,054  1,000,000  83,782    83,782   1,000,000 
  15            148,180           67,864      67,864   1,000,000 107,459  107,459  1,000,000 175,101   175,101   1,000,000 
  20            227,064           88,061      88,061   1,000,000 163,814  163,814  1,000,000 323,447   323,447   1,000,000 
  25            327,742          105,746     105,746   1,000,000 232,883  232,883  1,000,000 565,231   565,231   1,380,920 
  30            456,236          120,064     120,064   1,000,000 316,900  316,900  1,000,000 956,849   956,849   1,958,775 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

You should not assume that the  hypothetical  investment  rates of return  shown                                           
above and  elsewhere in this  prospectus  are  representative  of past or future                                           
investment rates of return. These rates are hypothetical. Actual rates of return                                           
may be more or less than those  shown.  The actual rates will depend on a number                                           
of factors including the investment  allocations you make,  prevailing rates and                                           
rates of inflation. The values for a Contract will be different from those shown                                           
if the actual rates of return  averages 0%, 6% or 12% over a period of years but                                           
also  fluctuated  above or below those averages for individual  Contract  Years.                                           
Neither we nor any Fund can make the statement that these  hypothetical rates of                                           
return can be achieved for any one year or sustained over any period of time.                                              

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]


                              $6540 ANNUAL PREMIUM                                                                        
            $1,000,000 TOTAL SUM INSURED: $1,000,000 SPECIFIED AMOUNT                                                     
                                COVERAGE OPTION A                                                                         
                    USING GUARANTEED COST OF INSURANCE RATES                                                              
      Male, Standard Nonsmoker, Age 35; Female, Standard Nonsmoker, Age 35                                                

---------- --------------------- ----------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------    
                                         0% Hypothetical Gross  6% Hypothetical Gross    12% Hypothetical Gross           
                                           Investment Return      Investment Return       Investment Return               
---------- --------------------- ------------------------------ ------------------------ --------------------- -------    
  End of         Premiums          Contract   Cash       Death   Contract  Cash     Death   Contract  Cash      Death     
Contract Year  Accumulated at 5%    Value     Surrender  Benefit  Value   Surrender Benefit  Value    Surrender Benefit   
             Interest per Year                Value                       Value                       Value               
------------ ------------------- --------- ---------  ---------- -------- --------- -------- ------- --------- --------   
                                                                                                                          

   1              6,867            2,421       2,421   1,000,000   2,582    2,582  1,000,000   2,742     2,742   1,000,000
   2             14,077            7,039       7,039   1,000,000   7,645    7,645  1,000,000   8,272     8,272   1,000,000
   3             21,648           11,563      11,563   1,000,000  12,909   12,909  1,000,000  14,349    14,349   1,000,000
   4             29,598           15,997      15,997   1,000,000  18,381   18,381  1,000,000  21,029    21,029   1,000,000
   5             37,945           20,338      20,338   1,000,000  24,067   24,067  1,000,000  28,370    28,370   1,000,000
   6             46,709           25,314      25,314   1,000,000  30,740   30,740  1,000,000  37,241    37,241   1,000,000
   7             55,911           30,184      30,184   1,000,000  37,672   37,672  1,000,000  46,989    46,989   1,000,000
   8             65,574           34,947      34,947   1,000,000  44,871   44,871  1,000,000  57,699    57,699   1,000,000
   9             75,719           39,603      39,603   1,000,000  52,346   52,346  1,000,000  69,466    69,466   1,000,000
  10             86,372           44,151      44,151   1,000,000  60,106   60,106  1,000,000  82,393    82,393   1,000,000
  15            148,180           66,417      66,417   1,000,000 104,911  104,911  1,000,000 170,561   170,561   1,000,000
  20            227,064           85,201      85,201   1,000,000 158,117  158,117  1,000,000 311,385   311,385   1,000,000
  25            327,742           99,528      99,528   1,000,000 220,569  220,569  1,000,000 536,027   536,027   1,309,573
  30            456,236          104,882     104,882   1,000,000 290,116  290,116  1,000,000 887,103   887,103   1,815,996
------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------  

You should not assume that the  hypothetical  investment  rates of return  shown
above and  elsewhere in this  prospectus  are  representative  of past or future
investment rates of return. These rates are hypothetical. Actual rates of return
may be more or less than those  shown.  The actual rates will depend on a number
of factors including the investment  allocations you make,  prevailing rates and
rates of inflation. The values for a Contract will be different from those shown
if the actual rates of return  averages 0%, 6% or 12% over a period of years but
also  fluctuated  above or below those averages for individual  Contract  Years.
Neither we nor any Fund can make the statement that these  hypothetical rates of
return can be achieved for any one year or sustained over any period of time.   

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]


                              $6540 ANNUAL PREMIUM                                                                        
            $1,000,000 TOTAL SUM INSURED: $1,000,000 SPECIFIED AMOUNT                                                     
                                COVERAGE OPTION B                                                                         
                      USING CURRENT COST OF INSURANCE RATES                                                               
      Male, Standard Nonsmoker, Age 35; Female, Standard Nonsmoker, Age 35                                                

---------- --------------------- ----------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------    
                                         0% Hypothetical Gross  6% Hypothetical Gross    12% Hypothetical Gross           
                                           Investment Return      Investment Return       Investment Return               
---------- --------------------- ------------------------------ ------------------------ --------------------- --------   
  End of         Premiums          Contract   Cash       Death   Contract  Cash     Death   Contract  Cash      Death     
Contract Year  Accumulated at 5%    Value     Surrender  Benefit  Value   Surrender Benefit  Value    Surrender Benefit   
             Interest per Year                Value                       Value                       Value               
------------ ------------------- --------- ---------  ---------- -------- --------- -------- ------- --------- --------   
                                                                                                                          
   1              6,867            2,429       2,429   1,002,429   2,590    2,590  1,002,590   2,750     2,750   1,002,750
   2             14,077            7,066       7,066   1,007,066   7,676    7,676  1,007,676   8,305     8,305   1,008,305
   3             21,648           11,624      11,624   1,011,624  12,978   12,978  1,012,978  14,426    14,426   1,014,426
   4             29,598           16,101      16,101   1,016,101  18,504   18,504  1,018,504  21,173    21,173   1,021,173
   5             37,945           20,499      20,499   1,020,499  24,264   24,264  1,024,264  28,609    28,609   1,028,609
   6             46,709           25,545      25,545   1,025,545  31,032   31,032  1,031,032  37,610    37,610   1,037,610
   7             55,911           30,497      30,497   1,030,497  38,084   38,084  1,038,084  47,528    47,528   1,047,528
   8             65,574           35,355      35,355   1,035,355  45,427   45,427  1,045,427  58,454    58,454   1,058,454
   9             75,719           40,117      40,117   1,040,117  53,074   53,074  1,053,074  70,492    70,492   1,070,492
  10             86,372           44,782      44,782   1,044,782  61,032   61,032  1,061,032  83,751    83,751   1,083,751
  15            148,180           67,786      67,786   1,067,786 107,326  107,326  1,107,326 174,873   174,873   1,174,873
  20            227,064           87,802      87,802   1,087,802 163,286  163,286  1,163,286 322,336   322,336   1,322,336
  25            327,742          105,091     105,091   1,105,091 231,278  231,278  1,231,278 562,062   562,062   1,562,062
  30            456,236          118,702     118,702   1,118,702 312,844  312,844  1,312,844 951,159   951,159   1,951,159
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

You should not assume that the  hypothetical  investment  rates of return  shown
above and  elsewhere in this  prospectus  are  representative  of past or future
investment rates of return. These rates are hypothetical. Actual rates of return
may be more or less than those  shown.  The actual rates will depend on a number
of factors including the investment  allocations you make,  prevailing rates and
rates of inflation. The values for a Contract will be different from those shown
if the actual rates of return  averages 0%, 6% or 12% over a period of years but
also  fluctuated  above or below those averages for individual  Contract  Years.
Neither we nor any Fund can make the statement that these  hypothetical rates of
return can be achieved for any one year or sustained over any period of time.   

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]


                              $6540 ANNUAL PREMIUM                                                                        
            $1,000,000 TOTAL SUM INSURED: $1,000,000 SPECIFIED AMOUNT                                                     
                                COVERAGE OPTION B                                                                         
                      USING GUARANTEED COST OF INSURANCE RATES                                                            
      Male, Standard Nonsmoker, Age 35; Female, Standard Nonsmoker, Age 35                                                

---------- --------------------- ----------------------------------------------- -------------------------------------    
                                         0% Hypothetical Gross  6% Hypothetical Gross    12% Hypothetical Gross           
                                           Investment Return      Investment Return       Investment Return               
---------- --------------------- ------------------------------ ------------------------ --------------------- --------   
  End of         Premiums          Contract   Cash       Death   Contract  Cash     Death   Contract  Cash      Death     
Contract Year  Accumulated at 5%    Value     Surrender  Benefit  Value   Surrender Benefit  Value    Surrender Benefit   
             Interest per Year                Value                       Value                       Value               
------------ ------------------- --------- ---------  ---------- -------- --------- -------- ------- --------- --------   
                                                                                                                          
   1              6,867            2,421       2,421   1,002,421   2,582    2,582  1,002,582   2,742     2,742   1,002,742
   2             14,077            7,038       7,038   1,007,038   7,645    7,645  1,007,645   8,272     8,272   1,008,272
   3             21,648           11,563      11,563   1,011,563  12,909   12,909  1,012,909  14,349    14,349   1,014,349
   4             29,598           15,996      15,996   1,015,996  18,380   18,380  1,018,380  21,028    21,028   1,021,028
   5             37,945           20,337      20,337   1,020,337  24,065   24,065  1,024,065  28,368    28,368   1,028,368
   6             46,709           25,312      25,312   1,025,312  30,737   30,737  1,030,737  37,237    37,237   1,037,237
   7             55,911           30,179      30,179   1,030,179  37,666   37,666  1,037,666  46,982    46,982   1,046,982
   8             65,574           34,940      34,940   1,034,940  44,862   44,862  1,044,862  57,687    57,687   1,057,687
   9             75,719           39,592      39,592   1,039,592  52,331   52,331  1,052,331  69,446    69,446   1,069,446
  10             86,372           44,135      44,135   1,044,135  60,083   60,083  1,060,083  82,361    82,361   1,082,361
  15            148,180           66,335      66,335   1,066,335 104,773  104,773  1,104,773 170,322   170,322   1,170,322
  20            227,064           84,902      84,902   1,084,902 157,516  157,516  1,157,516 310,129   310,129   1,310,129
  25            327,742           98,614      98,614   1,098,614 218,367  218,367  1,218,367 531,654   531,654   1,531,654
  30            456,236          102,415     102,415   1,102,415 282,864  282,864  1,282,864 877,908   877,908   1,877,908
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

You should not assume that the  hypothetical  investment  rates of return  shown
above and  elsewhere in this  prospectus  are  representative  of past or future
investment rates of return. These rates are hypothetical. Actual rates of return
may be more or less than those  shown.  The actual rates will depend on a number
of factors including the investment  allocations you make,  prevailing rates and
rates of inflation. The values for a Contract will be different from those shown
if the actual rates of return  averages 0%, 6% or 12% over a period of years but
also  fluctuated  above or below those averages for individual  Contract  Years.
Neither we nor any Fund can make the statement that these  hypothetical rates of
return can be achieved for any one year or sustained over any period of time.   

 PART II
UNDERTAKING TO FILE REPORTS 

     Subject  to the terms and  conditions  of Section  15(d) of the  Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, the undersigned  Registrant hereby undertakes to file with
the  Securities  and  Exchange   Commission  such   supplementary  and  periodic
information,  documents  and  reports  as  may be  prescribed  by  any  rule  or
regulation of the Commission  heretofore or hereafter  duly adopted  pursuant to
authority conferred in that section.                                            

RULE 484 UNDERTAKING  

     The By-Laws of Kansas City Life  Insurance  Company  provide,  in part,  in
Article XII:                                                                    

     1. The  Company  shall  indemnify  any  person  who was or is a party or is
threatened to be made a party to any  threatened,  pending or completed  action,
suit, or proceeding,  whether civil, criminal,  administrative or investigative,
other  than an action by or in the right of the  Company,  by reason of the fact
that he or she is or was a Director,  Officer or employee of the Company,  or is
or was serving at the request of the Company as a Director,  Officer or employee
of another  company,  partnership,  joint  venture,  trust or other  enterprise,
against expenses,  including attorneys' fees, judgments,  fines and amounts paid
in settlement  actually and reasonably incurred by him or her in connection with
such action, suit or proceeding if he or she acted in good faith and in a manner
he or she  reasonably  believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of
the  Company,  and with  respect to any criminal  action or  proceeding,  had no
reasonable cause to believe his or her conduct was unlawful.  The termination of
any action,  suit or proceeding by judgment,  order,  settlement,  conviction or
upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent, shall not, of itself, create a
presumption  that the person did not act in good faith and in a manner  which he
or she reasonably  believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the
Company, and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding,  had reasonable
cause to believe that his or her conduct was unlawful.                          

     2. The  Company  shall  indemnify  any  person  who was or is a party or is
threatened to be made a party to any threatened,  pending or completed action or
suit by or in the right of the  company to  procure a  judgment  in its favor by
reason of the fact that he or she is or was a  director,  officer or employee of
the  company,  or is or was serving at the request of the company as a director,
officer or employee of another  company,  partnership,  joint venture,  trust or
other enterprise  against  expenses,  including  attorneys'  fees,  actually and
reasonably  incurred by him or her in connection  with the defense or settlement
of the action or suit if he or she acted in good faith and in a manner he or she
reasonably  believed  to be in or not  opposed  to  the  best  interests  of the
company;  except that no indemnification  shall be made in respect of any claim,
issue or matter as to which such  person  shall have been  adjudged to be liable
for  negligence  or  misconduct  in the  performance  of his or her  duty to the
company unless and only to the extent that the court in which the action or suit
was brought  determines  upon  application  that,  despite the  adjudication  of
liability and in view of all the circumstances of the case, the person is fairly
and  reasonably  entitled to indemnity for such  expenses  which the court shall
deem proper.                                                                    

   Missouri law authorizes Missouri  corporations to provide  indemnification to
directors, officers and other persons.                                          

     Kansas City Life owns a directors and officers  liability  insurance policy
covering  liabilities  that  directors  and officers of Kansas City Life and its
subsidiaries and affiliates may incur in acting as directors and officers.      

     Insofar as  indemnification  for liability arising under the Securities Act
of 1933 (the "Act") may be permitted  to  directors,  officers  and  controlling
persons of the Registrant  pursuant to the foregoing  provisions,  or otherwise,
the  Registrant  has been  advised  that in the  opinion of the  Securities  and
Exchange  Commission such  indemnification is against public policy as expressed
in the Act and is,  therefore,  unenforceable.  In the  event  that a claim  for
indemnification  against  such  liabilities  (other  than  the  payment  by  the
Registrant of expenses  incurred or paid by a director,  officer or  controlling
person of the  Registrant  in the  successful  defense  of any  action,  suit or
proceeding)  is  asserted by such  director,  officer or  controlling  person in
connection with the securities being registered,  the Registrant will, unless in
the opinion of its counsel the matter has been settled by controlling precedent,
submit  to a  court  of  appropriate  jurisdiction  the  question  whether  such
indemnification  by it is against public policy as expressed in the Act and will
be governed by the final adjudication of such issue.                            

REPRESENTATIONS RELATING TO FEES AND CHARGES                                    

Kansas City Life Insurance  Company hereby  represents that the fees and charges
deducted under the contracts described in this post-effective  amendment are, in
the aggregate, reasonable in relationship to the services rendered, the expenses
expected to be  incurred,  and the risks  assumed by Kansas City Life  Insurance
Company.                                                                        

CONTENTS OF REGISTRATION STATEMENT  

This Registration  Statement  comprises the following papers and documents:  The
facing sheet.                                                         
The prospectus consisting of 71 pages. Undertaking to file reports.7  
Rule 484 undertaking.                                                 
Representations relating to fees and charges.                         
The signatures.                                                       
Written consents of the following persons:                            
(a) C. John Malacarne, Esq.                                         
(b) Mark A. Milton, Vice President and Associate Actuary            
(c) Sutherland, Asbill & Brennan LLP                                
(d) Independent Auditors                                            

     The following  exhibits,  corresponding to those required by paragraph A of
the instructions as to exhibits in Form N-8B-2:                                 

1.A. (1)  Resolutions of the Board of Directors of Kansas City Life Insurance   
    Company establishing the Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate
Account.1                                                   
(2) Not applicable.                                                   
(3)  Distributing Contracts:                                          
 (a) Distribution Agreement between Kansas City Life Insurance
Company and Sunset Financial Services, Inc..1       
(b) Not applicable.                                         
(c) Schedule of Sales Commissions.3                         
(4)  Not applicable.                                                  
(5)  (a) Specimen Contract Form.3                                     
(b) Contract Split Option Rider.3                           
(c) Joint First to Die Term Life Insurance Rider.3          

(d) Joint Survivorship Four-Year Term Life Insurance Rider.3

(6)  (a) Articles of Incorporation of Bankers Life Association of     
Kansas City.1                                       

(b) Restated Articles of Incorporation of Kansas City Life  
Insurance Company.1                                 

(c) By-Laws of Kansas City Life Insurance Company.1         

(7) Not applicable.                                                   

     (8)  (a) Agreement between Kansas City Life Insurance Company, MFS Variable
           Insurance Trust, and Massachusetts Financial Services Company.1

          (b)  Agreement  between  Kansas  City  Life  Insurance  Company,   TCI
   Portfolios, Inc. and Investors Research Corporation.1

          (c)  Agreement between Kansas City Life Insurance  Company,  Insurance
Management Series, and Federated Securities Corp.1

          (d)  Agreement  between Kansas City Life Insurance Company and each of
               Dreyfus   Variable   Investment   Fund,   The  Dreyfus   Socially
               Responsible Growth Fund, Inc., and Dreyfus Life and Annuity Index
Fund, Inc.3                                       

          (e)  Agreement  between  Kansas City Life  Insurance  Company and J.P.
Morgan Series Trust II. 4                         

          (f)  Amended and Restated Agreement between Kansas City Life Insurance
               Company  and  each of  Calamos  Insurance  Trust,  Calamos  Asset
    Management, Inc. and Calamos Financial Services, Inc.5

          (g)  Form  of  Participation   Agreement   between  Kansas  City  Life
               Insurance  Company  and  each  of  Franklin   Templeton  Variable
               Insurance  Products  Trust and Franklin  Templeton  Distributors,
Inc.7                                             

      (h)  Amendment to Participation Agreement between Kansas City Life
             Insurance Company and each of Dreyfus Variable Investment Fund,
            The Dreyfus Socially Responsible Growth Fund, Inc. and Dreyfus
Life and Annuity Index Fund, Inc.                 
(d/b/a Drefus Stock Index Fund). 4                

          (i)  Revised Exhibit B to Fund Participation  Agreement between Kansas
               City Life Insurance  Company,  Insurance  Management  Series, and
Federated Securities Corp.7                       

          (j)  Form  of  Participation  Agreement  by  and  among  AIM  Variable
               Insurance Funds,  Inc., AIM  Distributors,  Inc., and Kansas City
Life Insurance Company.7                          

          (k)  Form of Fund  Participation  Agreement  between  Kansas City Life
               Insurance  Company  and  Seligman   Portfolios,   Inc.,  Segliman
Advisors, Inc.7                                   

(9)  Not Applicable.                                                  
(10) Application Form.1                                               
   (11) Memorandum describing issuance, transfer, and redemption procedures.

B.   Not applicable.                                                            

C. Not applicable.                                                              

2.   Opinion and consent of C. John  Malacarne,  Esq., as to the legality of the
securities being registered. **                                       
3.   Not applicable. 4. Not applicable. 5. Not applicable.                      
6.   Opinion  and  Consent  of Mark A.  Milton,  Vice  President  and  Associate
     Actuary,  as to  actuarial  matters  pertaining  to  the  securities  being
registered.                                                           
7.   (a)  Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.  (b)  Consent  of  Sutherland,  Asbill &
Brennan LLP. (c) Consent of C. John Malacarne. See Exhibit 2.         

----------------------                                                          

1    Incorporated  herein by  reference to the Form S-6  Registration  Statement
     (File No.  033-95354)  for Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate  Account
filed on August 2, 1995.                                              

2 Incorporated  herein by reference to  Pre-Effective  Amendment No. 1 to the
     Form N-4 Registration  statement (File No.  033-89984) for Kansas City Life
Variable Annuity Separate Account filed on August 25, 1995.           

3    Incorporated  herein by reference to  Pre-Effective  Amendment No. 1 to the
     Form S-6  Registration  Statement  (File No.  333-25443)  for  Kansas  City
Variable Life Separate Account filed on July 15, 1997                 

4    Incorporated  herein by reference to Post-Effective  Amendment No. 5 to the
     Form S-6  Registration  Statement  (File  No.  33-95354)  for  Kansas  City
Variable Life Separate Account filed on April 19, 1999.               

5    Incorporated  herein by reference to Post-Effective  Amendment No. 2 to the
     Form S-6  Registration  Statement  (File No.  333-25443)  for  Kansas  City
Life Variable Life Separate Account filed on April 29, 1999.          

6    Incorporate  herein by reference to  Post-Effective  Amendment No. 6 of the
     S-6 Registration  Statement (File No. 33-95354) filing for Kansas City Life
Variable Life Separate Account filed on May 1, 2000.                  

7    Incorporated  herein by reference to Post-Effective  Amendment No. 7 to the
     Form N-4  Registration  Statement (File No.  33-89984) for Kansas City Life
Variable Annuity Separate Account filed on August 28, 2000.           

SIGNATURES          

Pursuant to the  requirements  of the Securities  Act of 1933,  the  Registrant,
Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate  Account  certifies that it meets all of
the  requirements  of  Securities  Act Rule  485(b)  for  effectiveness  of this
Post-Effective Amendment No. 4 to its Registration Statement and has duly caused
this  Post-Effective  Amendment  No.  4 to  be  signed  on  its  behalf  by  the
undersigned  thereunto duly  authorized,  and its seal to be herunto affixed and
attested,  all in the City of Kansas  City and the State of Missouri on the 16th
day of August, 2000.                                                            

[SEAL]                                                                          
                                        Kansas City Life Variable Life
                          Separate Account
                    Registrant

                                            Kansas City Life Insurance Company

                                By:/s/ R. Philip Bixby
R. Philip Bixby, President,CEO,
                                      Vice Chairman of the Board &
                  Director

Attest: /s/ C. John Malacarne
C. John Malacarne                                       

     Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Act of 1933,  Post-Effective
Amendment  No. 4 to the  Registration  Statement  has been  signed  below by the
following persons in the capacities indicated on the date(s) set forth below.   

Signature                 Title                        Date                     

/s/ R. Philip Bixby       President, CEO, Vice Chairman     August 16, 2000
R. Philip Bixby           of the Board and Director                             

/s/ Richard L. Finn       Senior Vice President, Finance    August 16, 2000
Richard L. Finn           and Director                                          
 (Principal Financial Officer)

/s/ John K. Koetting      Vice President and Controller     August 16, 2000
John K. Koetting          (Principal Accounting Officer)                        

/s/ J. R. Bixby           Chairman of the Board and                             
J. R. Bixby               Director                          August 16, 2000     

/s/ Walter E. Bixby III   Director                          August 16, 2000     
W. E. Bixby III                                                                 

Daryl D. Jensen           Director                          August 16, 2000     

/s/ C. John Malacarne     Director                          August 16, 2000
C.  John Malacarne                                                              

/s/ Jack D. Hayes         Director                          August 16, 2000
Jack D. Hayes                                                                   

Webb R. Gilmore           Director                          August 16, 2000     

/s/ Warren J. Hunzicker, M.D.  Director                     August 16, 2000
Warren J. Hunzicker, M.D.                                                       

Michael J. Ross           Director                          August 16, 2000     

Elizabeth T. Solberg      Director                          August 16, 2000     

E. Larry Winn Jr.         Director                          August 16, 2000     

Nancy Bixby Hudson        Director                          August 16, 2000
Exhibit Index       
List                                                                            
Page                                                                            

1.A.(11)       Memorandum describing issuance, transfer and redemption          
procedures.                                       
2.             Opinion  and  Consent  of C.  John  Malacarne,  Esq.,  as to  the
legality of the securities being registered.      
6.             Opinion  and  Consent  of  Mark A.  Milton,  Vice  President  and
    Actuary,  as to actuarial  matters  pertaining  to the
securities being registered.                      
7.(a)          Consent of Ernst & Young, LLP                                    
7.(b)          Consent of Sutherland Asbill & Brennan LLP                       

AUGUST 2000                                                                     
DESCRIPTION OF ISSUANCE,                                                        
TRANSFER AND REDEMPTION PROCEDURES FOR CONTRACTS 

PURSUANT TO RULE 6e-3(T)(b)(12)(iii)                                            

FOR FLEXIBLE PREMIUM SURVIVORSHIP LIFE INSURANCE CONTRACTS 
ISSUED BY                                                                       
KANSAS CITY LIFE INSURANCE COMPANY                                              

This  document  sets forth the current  administrative  procedures  that will be
followed  by  Kansas  City  Life  Insurance  Company  ("Kansas  City  Life")  in
connection   with  its  issuance  of  individual   flexible   premium   variable
survivorship life insurance contracts (the "Contracts"),  the transfer of assets
held  thereunder,  and the redemption by Contract owners (the "Owners") of their
interests  in those  Contracts.  Capitalized  terms  used  herein  have the same
meaning as in the  prospectus  for the Contract  that is included in the current
registration statement on Form S-6 for the Contract as filed with the Securities
and Exchange Commission ("Commission" or "SEC").                                

I. Procedures  Relating to Purchase and Issuance of the Contracts and Acceptance
of Premiums                                                                     

A. Offer of the Contracts,  Applications,  Initial Net Premiums, and Issuance of
the Contracts                                                                   

1. Offer of the  Contracts.  The Contracts will be offered and sold for premiums
pursuant  to  established  premium  schedules  and  underwriting   standards  in
accordance  with state  insurance  laws.  Premiums for the Contracts and related
insurance  charges will not be the same for all Owners selecting the same amount
and type of Death  Benefit.  Insurance is based on the  principle of pooling and
distribution  of mortality  risks,  which assumes that each Owner pays a premium
and related insurance charges  commensurate with the Insureds' mortality risk as
actuarially  determined  utilizing  factors such as Age, sex, level of Specified
Amount,  health and occupation of each Insured.  A uniform premium and insurance
charges for all Insureds would discriminate  unfairly in favor of those Insureds
representing  greater risk.  Although there will be no uniform insurance charges
for all Insureds, there will be a uniform insurance rate for all Insureds of the
same risk  class and same  Total  Sum  Insured.  A  description  of the  Monthly
Deduction under the Contract,  which includes  charges for cost of insurance and
for supplemental benefits, is in Appendix A to this memorandum.                 

2. Application.  To purchase a Contract,  the Owner must complete an application
and submit it through an authorized  Kansas City Life agent. An application will
not be deemed to be complete unless all required information,  including without
limitation  age,  sex,  and medical  and other  background  information  on each
proposed Insured, has been provided in the application.                         

If the  applicant  is eligible for  temporary  insurance  coverage,  a temporary
insurance  agreement  "TIA")  should also  accompany  the  application.  The TIA
provides  temporary  insurance  coverage prior to the date when all underwriting
and other requirements have been met and the application has been approved, with
certain limitations,  as long as an initial premium payment accompanies the TIA.
In  accordance  with Kansas  City  Life's  underwriting  rules,  temporary  life
insurance  coverage  may not exceed  $250,000.  The TIA may not be in effect for
more than 60 days. At the end of the 60 days,  the TIA coverage  terminates  and
the initial premium will be returned to the applicant.                          

3. Payment of Minimum Initial Premium and  Determination  of Contract Date. With
the TIA,  the  applicant  must pay an  initial  premium  payment  at the time of
application that is at least equal to two months of minimum initial premium (one
month of minimum initial premium is required for Contracts when premium payments
will be made under a pre-authorized  payment or combined  billing  arrangement).
The minimum  initial premium  payment  required  depends on a number of factors,
such as the age,  sex and risk class of the  proposed  Insureds,  the  Specified
Amount,  any  optional  benefits  and riders  selected  and the Planned  Premium
Payments the Owner proposes to make. (See "Planned Premium Payments," below.)   

In general,  when  applications  are submitted with the required premium payment
(and the premium payment is submitted in "good order") the Contract Date will be
the same as that of the  TIA.For  Contracts  where the  required  premium is not
accepted at the time of application or Contracts where values are applied to the
new Contract from another contract,  the Contract Date will be the approval date
plus up to seven days. There are several exceptions, described below. .         

Contract Date Calculated to Be 29th, 30th or 31st of Month                      
No  Contracts  will be given a  Contract  Date of the 29th,  30th or 31st of the
month. When values are applied to the new Contract from another contract and the
Contract Date would be  calculated  to be one of these dates,  the Contract Date
will be the 28th of the month.  In all other  situations  in which the  Contract
Date would be calculated to be the 29th, 30th or 31st of the month, the Contract
Date will be set to the 1st of the next month.                                  

Pre-Authorized Check Payment Plan (PAC) or Combined Billing (CB) -- Premium with
Application If PAC or CB is requested and the initial  premium is taken with the
application, the Contract Date will be the date of approval. Combined Billing is
a billing where multiple Kansas City Life contracts are billed together.        

Government Allotment (GA) and Federal Allotment (FA)                            
If GA or FA is requested on the application and an initial premium is taken with
the application,  the Contract Date will be the date of approval. If GA or FA is
requested and no initial  premium is received the Contract Date will be the date
we receive a full monthly allotment.                                            

Conversions                                                                     
If a Kansas City Life term insurance  product is converted to a new Contract the
Contract  Date  will be the  date up to  which  the  premiums  for the  previous
contract  were paid to. If there is more than one term policy  being  converted,
the Contract  Date will be  determined by the contract with the earliest date up
to which premiums were paid.                                                    

Kansas City Life may specify the form in which a premium payment must be made in
order for the premium to be in "good order." Ordinarily,  a check will be deemed
to be in good order upon receipt, although Kansas City Life may require that the
check first be converted  into federal funds.  In addition,  for a premium to be
received in "good  order," it must be  accompanied  by all  required  supporting
documentation, in whatever form required.                                       

An initial  premium will not be accepted from  applicants  that are not eligible
for TIA coverage.  Coverage under the Contract  begins on the Contract Date, and
Kansas City Life will deduct Contract charges as of the Contract Date.          

The Contract  Date is  determined by these  guidelines  except,  as provided for
under state  insurance  law, the Owner may be permitted to backdate the Contract
to preserve  insurance age (and receive a lower cost of insurance  rate).  In no
case  may the  Contract  Date be more  than  six  months  prior  to the date the
application was completed.  Monthly Deductions will be charged from the Contract
Date. If coverage under an existing Kansas City Life insurance contract is being
replaced, that contract will be terminated and values will be transferred on the
date  when  all  underwriting  and  other  requirements  have  been  met and the
application has been approved.  (For a discussion of underwriting  requirements,
see "Underwriting  Requirements"  below).  Kansas City Life will deduct contract
charges as of the Contract Date.                                                

4. Underwriting Requirements. Kansas City Life requires satisfactory evidence of
the proposed Insureds' insurability,  which may include a medical examination of
the  proposed  Insureds.  The  available  issue  ages are 20 through 85 for each
Insured.  There are four risk classes  available:  preferred  non-tobacco  user,
standard  non-tobacco  user,  preferred  tobacco  user,  tobacco  user.  Age  is
determined on the Contract Date based on the  Insured's age last  birthday.  For
various  purposes under the Contracts the Insureds' joint age will be calculated
under the Frasier method. The minimum Total Sum Insured is $200,000. The minimum
Specified Amount is $100,000.  The minimum  Additional Insured Amount is $10,000
and the maximum  Additional  Insurance Amount at the time of issue is four times
the  Specified  Amount.  This  coverage may increase to a maximum of 8 times the
Specified Amount after issue. The minimum $200,000. Acceptance of an application
depends on Kansas City Life's  underwriting rules, and Kansas City Life reserves
the right to reject an application.                                             

5.  Determination  of Owner of the  Contract.  The  Owner  of the  Contract  may
exercise all rights  provided  under the  Contract.  The Insureds are the Owner,
unless a different Owner is named in the  application.  The Owner may by Written
Notice  name a  contingent  Owner or a new Owner  while at least one  Insured is
living.  Unless a  contingent  Owner  has been  named,  on the death of the last
surviving  Owner,  ownership  of the  Contract  passes to the estate of the last
surviving Owner, who will become the Owner if the Owner dies. The Owner may also
be changed prior to both  Insureds'  deaths by Written  Notice  satisfactory  to
Kansas City Life.                                                               

B.      Payment and Acceptance of Additional Premiums                           

1. Generally.  Additional  unscheduled  premium payments can be made at any time
while  the  Contract  is in force.  Kansas  City Life has the right to limit the
number and amount of such premium payments,  subject to the procedures described
below. A loan repayment must be clearly marked as such or it will be credited as
a premium. No premium payment will be accepted after the Maturity Date.         

2. Procedures for Accepting  Additional Premium Payments.  Premium payments must
be made by check payable to Kansas City Life  Insurance  Company or by any other
method that Kansas City Life deems acceptable.  Kansas City Life may specify the
form in which a premium  payment  must be made in order for the premium to be in
"good  order."  Ordinarily,  a check  will be  deemed to be in good  order  upon
receipt, although Kansas City Life may require that the check first be converted
into federal funds.  In addition,  for a premium to be received in "good order,"
it must be accompanied  by all required  supporting  documentation,  in whatever
form required.                                                                  

Total  premiums paid may not exceed premium  limitations  for life insurance set
forth in the Internal Revenue Code.  Kansas City Life will monitor Contracts and
will notify the Owner if a premium payment exceeds this limit and will cause the
Contract to violate the definition of insurance.  The owner may choose to take a
refund of the portion of the premium  payment that is determined to be in excess
of applicable  limitations,  or the Owner may submit an  application to increase
the Additional Insurance Amount, subject to our underwriting requirements.  (See
"Underwriting  Requirements" above.) Kansas City Life will monitor Contracts and
will  attempt to notify  the Owner on a timely  basis if  premiums  paid under a
Contract exceed the "7-Pay Test" as set forth in the Internal  Revenue Code and,
therefore,  the  Contract  is in  jeopardy  of  becoming  a  modified  endowment
contract.                                                                       

3. Planned Premium Payments.  When applying for a Contract,  the Owner selects a
plan for paying level premium payments at specified intervals,  e.g., quarterly,
semi-annually  or  annually.  If the Owner  elects,  Kansas  City Life will also
arrange  for  payment  of  Planned  Premium  Payments  on a special  monthly  or
quarterly basis under a  pre-authorized  payment  arrangement.  The Owner is not
required to pay premium  payments in accordance  with these plans;  rather,  the
Owner  can pay more or less  than  planned  or skip a  Planned  Premium  Payment
entirely.  Each premium after the initial  premium must be at least $25.  Kansas
City Life may  increase  this  minimum  limit 90 days after  sending the Owner a
Written  Notice of such increase.  Subject to the limits  described  above,  the
Owner can change the amount and frequency of Planned Premium Payments by sending
Written Notice to the Home Office. Kansas City Life, however, reserves the right
to limit the amount of any increase in planned premium payment.                 

4. Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit Option and Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit
Option Premium. An optional Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Option is available
only at issue.  This option is not available if Coverage  Option B is elected or
if the Joint First to Die Rider is issued with the Contract.  If this option has
been elected,  it guarantees  payment of the Specified Amount (less Indebtedness
and any  past  due  charges)  upon the  death  of the  last  surviving  Insured,
regardless  of  the  Contract's  investment   performance,   provided  that  the
Guaranteed  Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option  Premium  requirement  is  met.  The
Guaranteed  Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option does not  guarantee  any  Additional
Insurance Amount.                                                               

The  Guaranteed  Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option  Premium  is the  amount  which
guarantees  that the  Guaranteed  Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option will remain in
effect. The Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit Option Premium  requirement is met
if, on each Monthly Anniversary Day:                                            

o    the  cumulative  premiums  paid equal or exceed the  cumulative  Guaranteed
     Minimum  Death  Benefit  Options  Premiums  (the  amount of the  Guaranteed
     Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option  Premium  is shown in the  Contract),  plus
Indebtedness, where                                                   

o    the term "the  cumulative  premiums paid" means the amount that is equal to
     (A)  the  sum of  all  premiums  paid,  less  (B)  the  sum of all  partial
     surrenders,  with  (A) and (B)  each  accumulated  at an  annual  effective
     interest  rate of 4.)% from the date the  Contract is issued to the Monthly
     Anniversary  Date on which the  Guaranteed  Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option
Premium requirement is calculated, and                                

o    the term "cumulative Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Option Premiums means
     the amount that is equal to the sum of the Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit
     Option Premiums,  with each such premium accumulated at an annual effective
     interest rate of 4% to the Monthly Anniversary Date on which the Guaranteed
Minimum Death Benefit Option Premium requirement is calculated.       

If the Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit Option Premium  requirement is not met,
the  Guaranteed  Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option is in default.  A 61-day notice
period  begins on the day Kansas City Life mails the notice that the  Guaranteed
Minimum Death Benefit Option is in default and the amount of premium required to
maintain the Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit Option.  The default premium will
be the amount by which the  cumulative  Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit Option
Premium plus  indebtedness  is greater than the  cumulative  paid  premium.  The
Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit Option will terminate if sufficient premium is
not paid by the end of the notice period.                                       

If the policy contains any Additional  Insurance Amount coverage or any optional
benefit riders, then in addition to testing the Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit
Option Premium  requirement as outlined above, the Contract Value will be tested
to  ensure  that the  policy  is funded at a  sufficient  level to  support  the
Additional  Insurance Amount or other optional  benefit riders.  On each Monthly
Anniversary  Day the Cash  Surrender  Value will be tested to determine if it is
sufficient to cover the Monthly Deduction. If not, a 61-day notice period begins
on the day Kansas  City Life mail  notice of the  default  premium  amount.  The
default  premium  will be equal to the  payment  which  would be  sufficient  to
provide a Cash Surrender Value equal to three monthly deductions. The Additional
Insurance Amount coverage and other optional benefit riders will be removed from
the contract if payment at least equal to the default premium is not received by
the end of the notice period.                                                   

There is no charge for this option during the first 10 Contract Years. Beginning
in Contract  Year 11 a monthly  charge per $1,000 of  Specified  Amount at issue
will apply.  The  Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit  Option is not available for
Coverage  Option B Contracts,  for Contracts on which the  Additional  Insurance
Amount  exceeds or is scheduled to exceed the Specified  Amount or for Contracts
which include the Joint First to Die Rider. The Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit
Option will terminate upon your request,  if the Coverage Option is changed to B
or if the amount of the  Additional  Insurance  Amount is increased to more than
the Specified Amount.                                                           

The Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit Option may be reactivated within two years
of termination  of such option.  Re-activation  requires:  (1) written notice to
restore the option, (2) evidence of insurability of the Insureds satisfactory to
us, unless Re-activation is requested within one year after the beginning of the
notice period; and (3) payment of the amount by which the cumulative  Guaranteed
Minimum Death Benefit  Option Premium plus  Indebtedness  exceeds the cumulative
paid premiums on the date of  Re-activation.  On the Monthly  Anniversary Day on
which the  Re-activation  takes  effect,  Kansas  City Life will deduct from the
Contract  Value any unpaid  Guaranteed  Minimum  Death Benefit  Option  Charges.
Kansas City Life  reserves  the right to deny  Re-activation  of the  Guaranteed
Minimum Death Benefit Option more than once during the life of the Contract.    

5. Premium Payments Upon Increase in Additional  Insurance Amount.  Depending on
the Contract Value at the time of an increase in the  Additional  Insured Amount
and the amount of the increase  requested,  an additional premium payment may be
necessary  or a  change  in  the  amount  of  Planned  Premium  Payments  may be
advisable.                                                                      

6. Premium  Payments to Prevent Lapse.  If the Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit
Option has been elected,  the Specified  Amount is guaranteed to remain in force
as long as the Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit  Option Premium  requirement is
met on each  Monthly  Anniversary  Day.  However,  while  failure  to  meet  the
Guaranteed  Minimum  Death Benefit  Option  Premium  requirement  will cause the
Guaranteed  Minimum  Death Benefit  Option to  terminate,  such failure will not
necessarily  cause the  Contract  to lapse.  Riders  are not  guaranteed  by the
Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Option and will terminate if the Cash Surrender
Value becomes negative.                                                         

If the Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit Option has not been elected or has been
removed,  a grace  period  starts  if the  Cash  Surrender  Value  on a  Monthly
Anniversary Day will not cover the Monthly  Deduction.  A premium  sufficient to
provide a Cash Surrender  Value equal to three Monthly  Deductions  must be paid
during the grace period to keep the Contract in force.                          

7. Grace Period.  The grace period is a 61-day period to make a premium  payment
sufficient  to prevent  lapse.  Kansas  City Life will send notice of the amount
required to be paid during the grace  period to the Owner's  last known  address
and the address of any assignee of record.  The grace period will begin when the
notice is sent.  The Contract will remain in force during the grace  period.  If
the last surviving Insured should die during the grace period, the Death Benefit
proceeds will still be payable to the Beneficiary, although the amount paid will
reflect a reduction for the Monthly  Deductions due on or before the date of the
last surviving  Insured's death (and for any Indebtedness).  If the grace period
premium  payment has not been paid before the grace  period  ends,  the Contract
will  lapse.  It will have no value and no  benefits  will be  payable.  A grace
period also may begin if Indebtedness becomes excessive.                        

C.      Allocation and Crediting of Initial and Additional Premiums             

1. The Separate Account,  Subaccounts,  and Fixed Account. The variable benefits
under the Contracts are supported by the Kansas City Life Variable Life Separate
Account (the "Variable  Account").  The Variable Account  currently  consists of
forty-two Subaccounts,  twenty-one of which support the Contracts, and thirty of
which support other flexible premium  variable life insurance  contracts used by
Kansas City Life. The assets of the Subaccounts are used to purchase shares of a
designated  corresponding  mutual  fund  Portfolio  that  is  part of one of the
following  Funds: MFS Variable  Insurance Trust ("MFS Trust"),  American Century
Variable  Portfolios Inc.  ("American Century Variable  Portfolios"),  Federated
Insurance Series, Federated Global Investment Management Corp., Dreyfus Variable
Investment  Fund,  Dreyfus Stock Index Fund,  The Dreyfus  Socially  Responsible
Growth Fund,  Inc, J.P.  Morgan  Series Trust II,  Franklin  Templeton  Variable
Insurance  Products Trust,  Calamos Advisors Trust, AIM Variable  Insurance Fund
and Seligman  Portfolios,  Inc..  Each Fund is registered  under the  Investment
Company Act of 1940 as an open-end management  investment  company.  Owners also
may allocate  Contract Value to Kansas City Life's  general  account (the "Fixed
Account").  Additional  Subaccounts  may be added from time to time to invest in
portfolios  of  MFS  Trust,  American  Century  Variable  Portfolios,  Federated
Insurance Series, Federated Global Investment Management Corp., Dreyfus Variable
Investment  Fund,  Dreyfus Stock Index Fund,  The Dreyfus  Socially  Responsible
Growth Fund,  Inc.,  J.P. Morgan Series Trust II,  Franklin  Templeton  Variable
Insurance  Products Trust,  Calamos Advisors Trust, AIM Variable  Insurance Fund
and Seligman Portfolios, Inc. or any other investment company.                  

2. Allocations Among the Accounts. Net Premiums and Contract Value are allocated
to the  Subaccounts  and the Fixed  Account  in  accordance  with the  following
procedures.                                                                     

a. General. In the Contract application, the Owner specifies the percentage of a
Net Premium to be allocated to each Subaccount and to the Fixed Account. The sum
of the  allocations  must equal 100%, and Kansas City Life reserves the right to
limit the number of Subaccounts to which premiums may be allocated, although the
number of  Subaccounts to which net premiums may be allocated will never be less
than  twelve.  The Owner can  change  the  allocation  percentages  at any time,
subject to these rules, by sending Written Notice to the Home Office. Changes in
allocation  may also be made by  telephone  if a proper  authorization  has been
provided.  The  change  will apply to premium  payments  received  with or after
receipt of notice.                                                              

b.  Allocation of Initial Net Premium.  On the Allocation  Date, the initial Net
Premium will be allocated to the Money Market Subaccount. The Allocation Date is
the later of the date when all underwriting and other requirements have been met
and an  application  has  been  approved,  or the date the  initial  premium  is
received in good order at the Home Office. Kansas City Life may specify the form
in which a premium  payment must be made in order for the premium to be in "good
order."  Ordinarily,  a check will be deemed to be in good  order upon  receipt,
although  Kansas City Life may require  that the check first be  converted  into
federal  funds.  In addition,  for a premium to be received in "good  order," it
must be accompanied by all required supporting  documentation,  in whatever form
required.  If any  additional  premiums  are  received in good order  before the
Reallocation  Date (as defined below),  the corresponding Net Premiums also will
be allocated to the Money Market  Subaccount.  On the Reallocation Date Contract
Value in the Money Market Subaccount will be allocated to the Subaccounts and to
the Fixed Account based on the Net Premium allocation  percentages  specified in
the application. The Reallocation Date is 30 days after the Allocation Date.    

c.  Allocation  of  Additional  Premiums.  Premiums  received  on or  after  the
Reallocation  Date will be credited to the Contract and the Net Premiums will be
invested as  requested  on the  Valuation  Day they are  received at Kansas City
Life's Home Office,  except if  additional  underwriting  is  required.  Premium
payments requiring additional  underwriting will not be credited to the Contract
until underwriting has been completed and the premium payment has been accepted.
(See  "Underwriting  Requirements"  above). If the additional premium payment is
rejected, Kansas City Life will return the premium payment immediately,  without
any adjustment for investment experience.                                       

II.     Transfers Among Accounts                                                

A.      Transfer Privilege                                      

1. General.  After the  Reallocation  Date and prior to the Maturity  Date,  the
Owner may  transfer  all or part of an amount in the  Subaccount(s)  to  another
Subaccount(s)  or to the Fixed  Account,  or transfer a part of an amount in the
Fixed Account to the Subaccount(s), subject to the restrictions described below.
Kansas City Life will make the  transfer on the  Valuation  Day that it receives
Written Notice requesting such transfer. Transfers may also be made by telephone
if the  appropriate  election has been made at the time of application or proper
authorization has been provided.                                                

2. General  Restrictions on Transfer  Privilege.  The minimum transfer amount is
the lesser of $250 or the entire amount in that Subaccount or the Fixed Account.
A transfer  request that would  reduce the amount in a  Subaccount  or the Fixed
Account  below $250 will be treated as a transfer  request for the entire amount
in that  Subaccount  or the Fixed  Account.  There is no limit on the  number of
transfers that can be made among  Subaccounts or to the Fixed Account.  However,
only one transfer may be made from the Fixed Account each Contract Year.  (For a
description of those  restrictions,  see  "Restrictions  on Transfers from Fixed
Account,"  below.) The first six  transfers  during each Contract Year are free.
Any unused free  transfers do not carry over to the next Contract  Year.  Kansas
City Life will  assess a $25  Transfer  Processing  Fee for the seventh and each
subsequent  transfer  during a Contract  Year.  For the purpose of assessing the
fee,  each  Written  Request  (or  telephone  request) is  considered  to be one
transfer,  regardless of the number of Subaccounts or the Fixed Account affected
by the  transfer.  The  processing  fee will be deducted  from the amount  being
transferred  or from the  remaining  Contract  Value,  according  to the Owner's
instructions.                                                                   

An  excessive  number  of  transfers,   including   short-term  "market  timing"
transfers,  may adversely affect the performance of the underlying Fund in which
a Subaccount invests.  If, in our sole opinion, a pattern of excessive transfers
develops,  we  reserve  the right not to  process a  transfer  request.  We also
reserve the right not to process a transfer request when the sale or purchase of
shares  of a  Fund  is  not  reasonably  practicable  due to  actions  taken  or
limitations imposed by the Fund.                                                

3. Restrictions on Transfers from Fixed Account. One transfer each Contract Year
is allowed from the Fixed Account to any or all of the  Subaccounts.  The amount
transferred  from the Fixed  Account  may not exceed 25% of the  unloaned  Fixed
Account Value on the date of transfer,  unless the balance after the transfer is
less than $250, in which case Kansas City Life will transfer the entire amount. 

4. No-Fee Transfer Right. This additional,  one-time transfer feature allows the
Owner to transfer  all or a portion of the Variable  Account  Value to the Fixed
Account  and  Kansas  City Life will make this  transfer  without  applying  the
transfer  processing  fee  (even  if the  Owner  has  already  used the six free
transfers for the Contract Year.) This Additional  No-Fee Transfer Right applies
during the first 24 months of the Contract or within the 24 months following the
effective date of an increase to the Additional Insurance Amount.               

B.      Dollar Cost Averaging Plan                                              

1. General.  The Dollar Cost  Averaging  Plan, if elected,  enables the Owner to
transfer systematically and automatically,  on a monthly basis for a period of 3
to 36 months, specified dollar amounts from the Money Market Subaccount to other
Subaccounts.  At least $250 must be transferred from the Money Market Subaccount
each month. The required amounts may be allocated to the Money Market Subaccount
through initial or subsequent  premium payments or by transferring  amounts into
the Money Market Subaccount from the other Subaccounts or from the Fixed Account
(which may be subject to certain restrictions).                                 

2. Election and  Operation of the Program.  The Owner may elect this plan at the
time of application by completing the authorization on the application or at any
time after the Contract is issued by properly  completing  the election form and
returning it to Kansas City Life.  The election form allows the Owner to specify
the number of months for the Dollar Cost Averaging Plan to be in effect. Changes
may be made in dollar cost  averaging by telephone if proper  authorization  has
been provided. Dollar cost averaging transfers will commence on the next Monthly
Anniversary Day on or next following the Reallocation Date or the date The Owner
requests.  Dollar  cost  averaging  will  terminate  at  the  completion  of the
designated number of months, when the value of the Federated Prime Money Fund II
Subaccount is completely depleted,  or the day Kansas City Life receives Written
Notice instructing Kansas City Life to cancel the Dollar Cost Averaging Plan.   

Transfers  made from the Money Market  Subaccount  for the Dollar Cost Averaging
Plan will not count  toward  the six  transfers  permitted  each  Contract  Year
without imposing the Transfer Processing Fee.                                   

C.      Portfolio Rebalancing Plan                                              

1.  General.  The  Owner  may  elect to have  the  accumulated  balance  of each
Subaccount redistributed to equal a specified percentage of the Variable Account
Value. This will be done on a quarterly basis at three-month  intervals from the
Monthly Anniversary Day on which the Portfolio Rebalancing Plan commences.      

2. Election and Operation of the Plan. The Owner may elect this plan at the time
of application by completing the authorization on the application or at any time
after the  Contract  is issued by  properly  completing  the  election  form and
returning  it to us. If  elected,  this plan  automatically  adjusts the Owner's
Portfolio mix to be consistent with the allocation most recently requested.  The
redistribution  will not count toward the six transfers  permitted each Contract
Year without  imposing the Transfer  Processing Fee.  Changes may be made in the
Portfolio  Rebalancing Plan if proper  authorization  has been provided.  If the
Dollar Cost  Averaging  Plan has been  elected and has not been  completed,  the
Portfolio  Rebalancing  Plan  will  commence  on  the  Monthly  Anniversary  Day
following  the  termination  of  the  Dollar  Cost  Averaging  Plan.   Portfolio
rebalancing  will terminate when you request any transfer or the day Kansas City
Life receive Written Notice  instructing us to cancel the Portfolio  Rebalancing
Plan. If the Contract  Value is negative at the time  portfolio  rebalancing  is
scheduled, the re-distribution will not be completed.                           

Portfolio rebalancing will terminate when the Owner requests any transfer unless
the Owner  authorizes a change in allocation at that time or the day Kansas City
Life receives written notice instructing Kansas City Life to cancel the plan.   

III.  "Redemption"  Procedures:  Full and Partial Surrenders,  Maturity Benefit,
Death Benefits, and Loans                                                       

A.      "Free-Look" Period                                                      

The Owner may cancel the Contract for a refund  during the  "free-look"  period.
This period expires 10 days after the Owner receives the Contract.  If the Owner
decides  to  cancel  the  Contract,  the Owner  must  return it by mail or other
delivery  method to the Home Office or to the authorized  Kansas City Life agent
who sold it. Immediately after mailing or delivery,  the Contract will be deemed
void.  Within seven  calendar  days after Kansas City Life receives the returned
Contract, Kansas City Life will refund premiums paid. In some states Kansas City
Life may be required to refund the greater of Contract Value and premiums paid. 

B.      Surrendering the Contract for Cash Surrender Value                      

The Owner may surrender the Contract at any time for its Cash Surrender Value by
submitting a Written  Request to the Home  Office.  Kansas City Life may require
return of the Contract. A surrender request will be processed as of the date the
Owner's  Written Request and all required  documents are received.  Payment will
generally be made within seven calendar  days.  The Cash Surrender  Value may be
taken in one lump sum or it may be  applied  to a payment  option.  The  Owner's
Contract will  terminate and cease to be in force if it is  surrendered  for one
lump sum. It cannot later be reinstated.                                        

C.      Partial Surrenders                                                      

1.  General.  The Owner may make  partial  surrenders  under the contract at any
time,  subject to the conditions  below. The Owner must submit a Written Request
to the Home Office.  Each partial  surrender  must be at least $500. The partial
surrender amount may not exceed the Cash Surrender  Value,  less $300. A Partial
Surrender  Fee will be  assessed  on a partial  surrender.  This  charge will be
deducted from the Owner's  Contract Value in addition to the amount requested to
be surrendered and will be considered part of the surrender (together,  "partial
surrender  amount").  As of the date Kansas City Life receives a Written Request
for a partial  surrender,  the  Contract  Value will be  reduced by the  partial
surrender amount.                                                               

2. Allocation of Partial Surrender Among the Accounts. When the Owner requests a
partial surrender, the Owner can direct how the partial surrender amount will be
deducted from Contract Value in the Subaccounts and Fixed Account.  If the Owner
provides no  directions,  the  partial  surrender  amount will be deducted  from
Contract Value in the Subaccounts and Fixed Account on a pro-rata basis.        

3. Effect of Partial Surrender on Death Benefit. If Coverage Option A or L is in
effect, Kansas City Life will reduce the Contract Value by the partial surrender
amount.  The Total Sum Insured will be reduced by the partial  surrender  amount
minus the excess, if any, of the Death Benefit over the Total Sum Insured at the
time the partial surrender is made. If the partial surrender amount is less than
the  excess of the Death  Benefit  over the  Total  Sum  Insured,  the Total Sum
Insured will not be reduced.  If Coverage Option B is in effect Kansas City Life
will reduce the Contract Value by the partial surrender amount. Kansas City Life
reserves  the  right to  reject  a  partial  surrender  request  if the  partial
surrender  would reduce the Total Sum Insured below the minimum amount for which
the Contract  would be issued under Kansas City Life's  then-current  rules,  as
interpreted by Kansas City Life.                                                

4. Date Partial Surrender  Requests Are Processed.  Partial  surrender  requests
will be processed as of the date the Owner's Written Request is received in good
order,  and generally will be paid within seven calendar days. A Written Request
for a partial  surrender  will be  deemed to be good  order  when,  among  other
things, all required supporting documentation has been received.                

D.      Partial Surrender Fee                                                   
Kansas City Life will deduct an administrative  charge upon a partial surrender.
This charge is the lesser of 2% of the amount  surrendered  or $25.  This charge
will be deducted from the Contract Value in addition to the amount  requested to
be  surrendered  and  will be  considered  to be part of the  partial  surrender
amount.                                                                         

E..      Redemptions for Monthly Deduction                                      
On the Allocation Date, Kansas City Life will deduct Monthly  Deductions for the
Contract Date and each Monthly  Anniversary that has occurred prior or on to the
Allocation Date. (The Monthly  Deduction is described in Appendix A.) Subsequent
Monthly  Deductions will be made as of each Monthly  Anniversary Day thereafter.
The Owner's  Contract  Date is the date used to  determine  the Owner's  Monthly
Anniversary Day. The Monthly Deduction  consists of (1) monthly expense charges,
(2) cost of insurance charges,  and (3) any charges for optional  benefits.  The
Monthly  Deduction is deducted from the Variable  Accounts and Fixed Account pro
rata on the  basis of the  portion  of  Contract  Value in each  account  on the
Monthly Anniversary Day.                                                        

F.      Death Benefits                                                          

As long as the  Contract  remains in force,  Kansas City Life will pay the Death
Benefit  proceeds  upon  receipt at the Home Office of proof of the death of the
last  surviving  Insured that Kansas City Life deems  satisfactory.  Kansas City
Life may also  require  proof of the death of the Insured who died first and may
require  return of the  Contract.  The Death  Benefit will be paid in a lump sum
generally  within seven  calendar days of receipt of  satisfactory  proof or, if
elected,  under  a  payment  option.  The  Death  Benefit  will  be  paid to the
Beneficiary.                                                                    

     As  described  below,  Kansas  City Life will pay  Death  Benefit  proceeds
through  Kansas City Life's  Personal  Growth  Account.  Kansas City Life places
proceeds  to be paid  through  the  Personal  Growth  Account  in their  general
account.  The Personal  Growth Account pays interest and provides  check-writing
privileges  under which Kansas City Life reimburses the bank that pays the check
out of the  proceeds  held  in  their  general  account.  A  Contract  Owner  or
beneficiary  (whichever applicable) has immediate and full access to Proceeds by
writing a check on the account.  Kansas City Life pays interest on Death Benefit
Proceeds  from the date of death to the  date the  Personal  Growth  Account  is
closed.                                                                         

The  Personal  Growth  Account is not a bank  account  and is not  insured,  nor
guaranteed, by the FDIC or any other government agency.                         

Kansas City Life will pay Death  Benefit  proceeds  through the Personal  Growth
Account when:                                                                   

o    the proceeds are paid to an individual; and                                
o    the amount of proceeds is $5,000 or more.                                  

Any other  use of the  Personal  Growth  Account  requires  Kansas  City  Life's
approval.                                                                       

1. Amount of Death Benefit Proceeds. The Death Benefit proceeds payable upon the
death of the last surviving Insured are equal to the sum of: (1) the greater of:
(a) the Death Benefit under the Coverage Option  selected,  calculated as of the
date of the last surviving  Insured's  death, or (b) the Corridor Death Benefit;
and (2) an amount  equal to any  benefits  provided  by any option  benefits  or
riders,  plus  any  premiums  received  after  the  date  of  death,  minus  any
indebtedness  on that date,  and, if the death  occurred  during a grace period,
minus any past due Monthly  Deductions.  A minimum Death Benefit may be provided
under the Guaranteed  Minimum Death Benefit Option.  If all or part of the Death
Benefit proceeds are paid in one sum, Kansas City Life will pay interest on this
sum as required by applicable state law from the date of receipt of due proof of
the last surviving Insured's death to the date of payment.                      

2.  Coverage  Options.  The  Contract  Owner may  choose  one of three  Coverage
Options,  which will be used to determine the Death Benefit. Under Option A, the
Death Benefit is equal to the Total Sum Insured on the date of death of the last
surviving Insured. Under Option B, the Death Benefit is the Total Sum Insured on
the date of death of the last  surviving  Insured plus the Contract Value on the
date of such death.  Under Coverage  Option L, the Death Benefit will be the sum
of:  (1) the  Total  Sum  Insured  on the date of  death  of the last  surviving
Insured;  and (2) the Contract Value on the Contract  Anniversary  preceding the
death of the last surviving Insured  multiplied by the applicable Option L Death
Benefit Percentage less the Total Sum Insured on that Contract  Anniversary.  If
the amount in (2) of the Option L Death  Benefit  calculation  is less than zero
then the Option L Death Benefit will be equal to the amount calculated in (1).  

3. Initial Specified Amount and Coverage Option. The Initial Specified Amount is
set at the time the  Contract  is issued.  The Owner may  change  the  Specified
Amount from time to time,  as discussed  below.  The Owner  selects the Coverage
Option when the Owner  applies for the  Contract.  The Owner also may change the
Coverage Option, as discussed below.                                            

4. Changes in Coverage  Option.  Kansas City Life  reserves the right to require
that no change in Coverage  Option occur during the first Contract Year and that
no more than one increase be made in any 12-month  period.  Coverage Option L is
only  available  at issue.  After any change,  the Total Sum Insured  must be at
least $200,000 and the Specified Amount must be at least $100,000. The effective
date of the change will be the Monthly Anniversary Day following the date Kansas
City Life approves the Owner's application for change.                          

If the Coverage  Option is B or L, it may be changed to A. The Total Sum Insured
will not  change.  If the  Coverage  Option  is A or L, it may be  changed  to B
subject to  evidence of  insurability  satisfactory  to Kansas  City Life.  (See
"Underwriting  Requirements,"  above.)  The new  Total Sum  Insured  will be the
greater  of the  Total Sum  Insured  less the  Contract  Value as of the date of
change or  $25,000.  If the  Coverage  Option is  changed  to B, the  Guaranteed
Minimum Death Benefit Option, if in effect, will terminate.                     

Kansas City Life  reserves the right to decline any Coverage  Option change that
Kansas  City Life  determines  would  cause the  Contract to not qualify as life
insurance under applicable tax laws.                                            

5. Increases in the Additional Insurance Amount                                 

Increases  to the  Additional  Insurance  Amount  may  be  made  either  through
scheduled annual increases requested and through unscheduled increases requested
at any other time of the  Owner's  choosing.  The maximum  Additional  Insurance
Amount coverage is four times the Specified  Amount at issue.  This coverage may
increase  to a maximum of eight  times the  Specified  Amount  after issue under
scheduled annual increases.                                                     

Scheduled increases to the Additional  Insurance Amount,  subject to Kansas City
Life's  approval,  may be based on a flat amount annual increase or a percentage
annual  increase.  Available  percentage  increases  range  from  0-25%  of  the
Additional  Insurance  Amount.  The  percentage  increase  will be  based on the
specified  percentage  of  the  Additional  Insurance  Amount  at the  time  the
scheduled  increase occurs.  Available amounts for a flat amount increase not to
exceed a dollar amount equal to 25% of the Additional Insurance Amount at issue.
The  Guaranteed  Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option  will not be  available  if the
Additional Insurance Amount is, or is scheduled to, exceed the Specified Amount.

The Owner may request  increases to the Additional  Insurance  Amount other than
the annual, scheduled increases available at issue. Kansas City Life reserve the
right to require that no increases in Additional  Insurance  Amount occur during
the  first  Contract  Year and that no more  than  one  increase  be made in any
12-month period.                                                                

Any requested,  unscheduled  increase in the Additional Insurance Amount must be
at least $10,000 and an application must be submitted. Kansas City Life reserves
the right to require  satisfactory  evidence of insurability.  In addition,  the
Insureds'  attained Age must be less than the current  maximum issue Age for the
Contracts,  as  determined  by Kansas  City Life from time to time.  A change in
Planned Premium Payments may be advisable.                                      

The increase in the  Additional  Insurance  Amount will become  effective on the
Monthly  Anniversary  Day on or next  following  the  date the  request  for the
increase  is  received  and  approved.  If the  Additional  Insurance  Amount is
increased to be greater than the Specified Amount,  the Guaranteed Minimum Death
Benefit  Option,  if  applicable,  will  terminate.  In  addition,  if the  Cash
Surrender Value is at any time  insufficient  to pay monthly  deductions for the
Contract,  the Additional Insurance Amount and riders will terminate in order to
preserve the Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Option.                           

6.  Decreases in Total Sum Insured                                              
The Owner may  request a decrease in the Total Sum  Insured.  When a decrease in
Total Sum  Insured is made,  Kansas  City Life will  first  reduce any amount of
Additional Insurance Amount remaining and only then reduce the Specified Amount,
starting with the latest  increase and  continuing in the reverse order in which
the increases  were made. If the Specified  Amount is decreased,  the Guaranteed
Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option  coverage  amount will be  decreased by the same
amount.  Under  certain  circumstances,  a partial  surrender  will  result in a
decrease in the Total Sum Insured.                                              

Kansas City Life  reserves the right to require  that no decreases  occur during
the  first  Contract  Year and that no more  than  one  decrease  be made in any
12-month period.                                                                

Kansas City Life  reserves the right to require that the Total Sum Insured after
any decrease be at least $200,000 and the Specified Amount must be $100,000. The
Owner  must  provide  written  notice  to the Home  Office of his  intention  to
decrease the Specified  Amount.  The effective  date of the decrease will be the
Monthly Anniversary Day following the date Kansas City Life approves the Owner's
request for a decrease.                                                         

Decreasing the Total Sum Insured may have the effect of decreasing  monthly Cost
of Insurance  Charges.  However, a decrease will not decrease the Target Premium
or Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Option Premium.                             

G.      Loans                                                                   

1. When Loans are  Permitted.  Prior to the death of the Insured,  the Owner may
borrow  against the Contract at any time by submitting a Written  Request to the
Home Office,  provided that the Cash Surrender  Value of the Contract is greater
than zero.  Loans may also be made by telephone if the appropriate  election has
been made at the time of application or proper  authorization  has been provided
to us. The maximum loan amount is equal to the Contract's  Cash Surrender  Value
on the  effective  date of the loan  less  loan  interest  to the next  Contract
Anniversary. Contract loans will be processed as of the date the Owner's Written
Request is received and approved.  Loan proceeds  generally  will be sent to the
Owner within seven calendar days.                                               

2. Interest.  Kansas City Life will charge  interest on any  Indebtedness  at an
annual rate of 6.0%.  Interest  is due and  payable at the end of each  Contract
Year while a loan is  outstanding.  If interest is not paid when due, the amount
of the interest is added to the loan and becomes part of the Indebtedness.      

3. Loan Collateral. When a Contract loan is made, an amount sufficient to secure
the loan is  transferred  out of the  Subaccounts  and the unloaned value in the
Fixed Account and into the  Contract's  Loan Account.  Thus, a loan will have no
immediate  effect on the Contract  Value,  but the Cash Surrender  Value will be
reduced immediately by the amount transferred to the Loan Account. The Owner may
specify the Variable Accounts and/or Fixed Account from which collateral will be
transferred. If no allocation is specified,  collateral will be transferred from
each  Subaccount  and from the unloaned  value in the Fixed  Account in the same
proportion  that the Contract Value in each Subaccount and the unloaned value in
the Fixed Account  bears to the total  Contract  Value in those  accounts on the
date that the loan is made. An amount of Cash  Surrender  Value equal to any due
and unpaid loan  interest will also be  transferred  to the Loan Account on each
Contract  Anniversary.  Due and unpaid  interest will be  transferred  from each
Subaccount  and the unloaned  value in the Fixed Account in the same  proportion
that each  Subaccount  Value and the unloaned  value in the Fixed  Account Value
bears to the total unloaned Contract Value.                                     

The Loan Account will be credited with  interest at an effective  annual rate of
not less than 4%. Interest earned on the Loan Account will be added to the Fixed
Account.                                                                        

4.  Preferred  Loan  Provision.  Beginning  in the  eleventh  Contract  Year,  a
preferred loan may be requested.  The maximum  amount  available for a preferred
loan is the  Contract  Value less  premiums  paid and may not exceed the maximum
loan amount.  The amount in the Loan Account securing the preferred loan will be
credited with interest at an effective  annual rate of 6.0%.  The preferred loan
provision is not guaranteed.                                                    

5. Loan Repayment.  The Owner may repay all or part of the Owner's  Indebtedness
at any time while the  Insured is living and the  Contract  is in force.  Kansas
City Life  reserves  the right to require  that each loan  repayment be at least
$10.00.  Loan repayments must be sent to the Home Office and will be credited as
of the  date  received.  A loan  repayment  must  be  clearly  marked  as  "loan
repayment" or it will be credited as a premium.  When a loan  repayment is made,
Contract  Value in the Loan  Account  in an  amount  equal to the  repayment  is
transferred  from the Loan Account to the  Subaccounts and the unloaned value in
the Fixed  Account.  Unless  specified  otherwise by the Owner,  loan  repayment
amounts will be  transferred  to the  Subaccounts  and the unloaned value in the
Fixed Account according to the premium allocation instructions in effect at that
time.                                                                           

6. Reduction in Death Benefit. If the Death Benefit becomes payable while a loan
is  outstanding,  the  Indebtedness  will be deducted in  calculating  the Death
Benefit proceeds.                                                               

7.  Default.  If the Loan  Account  Value  exceeds the  Contract  Value less any
applicable  Surrender  Charge on any  Valuation  Day,  the  Contract  will be in
default.  The Owner,  and any  assignee  of record,  will be sent  notice of the
default.  The Owner  will  have a 61-day  grace  period  to submit a  sufficient
payment to avoid  termination  of coverage  under the Contract.  The notice will
specify the amount that must be repaid to prevent termination.                  

H.      Payment Options                                                         

The Contract  offers a variety of ways of receiving  proceeds  payable under the
Contract,  such as on  surrender,  death or maturity,  other than in a lump sum.
These payment  options are  summarized  below.  The Owner may apply  proceeds of
$2,000 or more which are payable  under this  Contract  to any of the  following
options:                                                                        

1. Option 1 - Interest Payments. Kansas City Life will make interest payments to
the payee annually or monthly as elected.  Interest on the proceeds will be paid
at the  guaranteed  rate of 3.0%  per year and may be  increased  by  additional
interest paid annually. The proceeds and any unpaid interest may be withdrawn in
full at any time.                                                               

2. Option 2 -  Installments  of a Specified  Amount.  Kansas City Life will make
annual or monthly  payments  until the  proceeds  plus  interest are fully paid.
Interest on the proceeds  will be paid at the  guaranteed  rate of 3.0% per year
and may be increased by  additional  interest.  The present  value of any unpaid
installments may be withdrawn at any time.                                      

3. Option 3 - Installments For a Specified  Period.  Payment of the proceeds may
be made in equal  annual or monthly  payments  for a specified  number of years.
Interest on the proceeds  will be paid at the  guaranteed  rate of 3.0% per year
and may be increased by  additional  interest.  The present  value of any unpaid
installments may be withdrawn at any time.                                      

4.  Option 4 - Life  Income.  Kansas  City Life will pay an  income  during  the
payee's lifetime.  You also may choose a minimum guaranteed payment period or an
installment  refund  option  as part of your life  income  payment  option.  The
minimum  guaranteed  payment period  guarantees  that life income  payments will
continue  after  death  until  payments  have been paid for the full  guaranteed
payment period  selected.  The  installment  refund option  guarantees that life
income  payments  will  continue  after  death until the total  income  payments
received  equal the amount of  proceeds  applied  when the option was  initially
selected.                                                                       

5.  Option 5 - Joint and  Survivor  Income.  Kansas City Life will pay an income
during the  lifetime of two persons and will  continue to pay the same income as
long as either person is living.  The minimum  guaranteed payment period will be
ten years.                                                                      

6. Minimum Amounts.  Kansas City Life reserves the right to pay the total amount
of the  Contract in one lump sum, if less than $2000.  If payments are less than
$50,  payments  may be made less  frequently  at Kansas City Life's  option.  If
Kansas City Life has available at the time a payment  option is elected  options
or rates on a more  favorable  basis than those  guaranteed,  the more favorable
benefits will apply.                                                            

I.      Delay in Redemptions or Transfers                                       
Kansas City Life will ordinarily pay any Death Benefit proceeds,  loan proceeds,
partial  surrender  proceeds,  or full surrender  proceeds within seven calendar
days after receipt at the Home Office of all the  documents  required for such a
payment.  Other than the Death  Benefit,  which is  determined as of the date of
death,  the amount  will be  determined  as of the date of  receipt of  required
documents.  However, Kansas City Life may delay making a payment or processing a
transfer  request if (1) the New York Stock  Exchange is closed for other than a
regular  holiday  or  weekend,  trading  is  restricted  by the SEC,  or the SEC
declares that an emergency exists as a result of which the disposal or valuation
of Variable  Account  assets is not  reasonably  practicable;  or (2) the SEC by
order permits  postponement  of payment to protect  Kansas City Life's  Contract
Owners.                                                                         

J.      Telephone Transfer, Premium Allocation Changes and Loan Privileges      

1. Election of the Program. Transfers, changes in premium allocation, changes in
dollar cost averaging,  changes in portfolio rebalancing, and loan requests will
be based upon instructions given by telephone, provided the appropriate election
has been  made at the  time of  application  or  proper  authorization  has been
provided to Kansas City Life.  Kansas  City Life  reserves  the right to suspend
telephone  transfer,  premium allocation and/or loan privileges at any time, for
any reason,  if it deems such suspension to be in the best interests of Contract
Owners.                                                                         

2. Procedures  Employed to Confirm  Genuineness of Telephone  Transfer,  Premium
Allocation  Changes  and Loan  Privileges  Instructions.  Kansas  City Life will
employ  reasonable  procedures  to confirm  that  instructions  communicated  by
telephone are genuine,  and if Kansas City Life follows those procedures it will
not be liable for any losses due to  unauthorized  or  fraudulent  instructions.
Kansas  City Life may be liable  for such  losses  if it does not  follow  those
reasonable procedures. The procedures Kansas City Life will follow for telephone
transfers,  premium  allocation changes and loans include requiring some form of
personal  identification prior to acting on instructions  received by telephone,
providing written  confirmation of the transaction,  and making a tape recording
of the instructions given by telephone.                                         

APPENDIX A                                                                      

On the Allocation Date, Kansas City Life will deduct Monthly  Deductions for the
Contract Date and each Monthly  Anniversary that has occurred prior to or on the
Allocation Date.  Subsequent  Monthly Deductions will be made as of each Monthly
Anniversary  Day  thereafter.  The  Contract  Date is the date used to determine
Monthly  Anniversary Day. The Monthly Deduction  consists of (1) monthly expense
charges, (2) cost of insurance charges, and (3) any optional benefit charges, as
described  below. The Monthly  Deduction is deducted from the Variable  Accounts
and Fixed Account pro rata on the basis of the portion of Contract Value in each
account on the Monthly Anniversary Day.                                         

     Monthly Expense Charge. The Monthly Expense Charge is made up of two parts:

(1)  a charge of $12.50 per month for the first five Contract Years.  

     (2)  a monthly  expense  charge of $7.50  plus $.02 per $1,000 of Total Sum
Insured per month for all Contract Years.                   

The Monthly Expense Charge  reimburses Kansas City Life for expenses incurred in
the  administration  of the  Contracts and the Variable  Account.  Such expenses
include  but  are  not  limited  to:  underwriting  and  issuing  the  Contract,
confirmations,  annual reports and account  statements,  maintenance of Contract
records,  maintenance  of Variable  Account  records,  administrative  personnel
costs, mailing costs, data processing costs, legal fees, accounting fees, filing
fees, the costs of other services necessary for Contract Owner servicing and all
accounting, valuation, regulatory and updating requirements. The Monthly Expense
Charge is guaranteed not to increase.                                           

     Cost of Insurance Charge.  This charge compensates Kansas City Life for the
expense of providing insurance coverage. Kansas City Life may make a profit from
this charge. Any profit may be used to finance distribution expenses. The charge
depends  on a number of  variables  and  therefore  will vary from  Contract  to
Contract and from Monthly  Anniversary Day to Monthly  Anniversary  Day. For any
Contract,  the cost of insurance on a Monthly  Anniversary  Day is calculated by
multiplying  the  current  cost of  insurance  rate for the  Insureds by the net
amount at risk for that Monthly Anniversary Day.                                

The net amount at risk on a Monthly  Anniversary  Day is the difference  between
the Death Benefit (see "Coverage  Options," page 30),  discounted with one month
of interest and the Contract  Value,  as calculated on that Monthly  Anniversary
Day before the cost of  insurance  charge is taken.  The  interest  rate used to
discount the Death Benefit is the monthly equivalent of 4% per year.            

The cost of insurance rate for a Contract on a Monthly  Anniversary Day is based
on the Insureds' Age, sex, number of completed Contract Years, Total Sum Insured
and risk  class,  and  therefore  varies  from  time to time.  Kansas  City Life
currently  places  Insureds in the  following  classes,  based on  underwriting:
Standard Tobacco User, Standard Nontobacco User,  Preferred  Nontobacco User and
Preferred  Tobacco User. The Insureds may be placed in a substandard risk class,
which  involves  a higher  mortality  risk  than the  Standard  Tobacco  User or
Standard Nontobacco User classes.                                               

Kansas City Life places the  Insureds in a risk class when the Contract is given
underwriting  approval,   based  on  Kansas  City  Life's  underwriting  of  the
application.  When an  increase in  Additional  Insurance  Amount is  requested,
Kansas  City  Life  conducts  underwriting  before  approving  the  increase  to
determine the risk class that will apply to the increase.  If the risk class for
the increase has lower cost of insurance rates than the existing risk class, the
lower rates will apply to the entire Specified Amount. If the risk class for the
increase has higher cost of insurance rates than the existing class,  the higher
rates will apply only to the increase in Additional  Insurance  Amount,  and the
existing risk class will continue to apply to the existing Additional  Insurance
Amount.                                                                         

Kansas City Life  guarantees  that the cost of insurance rates used to calculate
the  monthly  cost of  insurance  charge  will not  exceed the  maximum  cost of
insurance rates set forth in the Contract. The guaranteed rates for standard and
preferred risk classes are based on the 1980  Commissioners'  Standard  Ordinary
Mortality Tables, Male or Female, Smoker or Nonsmoker Mortality Rates ("1980 CSO
Tables"). The guaranteed rates for substandard classes are based on multiples of
or additives to the 1980 CSO Tables.                                            

Kansas  City  Life's  current  cost of  insurance  rates  may be less  than  the
guaranteed  rates that are set forth in the Contract.  Current cost of insurance
rates will be determined  based on Kansas City Life's  expectations as to future
mortality experience. These rates may change from time to time.                 

Cost of insurance rates (whether guaranteed or current) for one or both Insureds
in a  nontobacco  user  standard  class  are  lower  than  rates for one or both
Insureds  of the same age and sex in a  tobacco  user  standard  class.  Cost of
insurance  rates  (whether  guaranteed or current) for one or both Insureds in a
nontobacco user or tobacco user standard risk class are lower than rates for one
or both  Insureds of the same age, sex and tobacco  user class in a  substandard
risk class.                                                                     

     Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Option Charge.  There is no charge for the
Guaranteed  Minimum  Death  Benefit  Option  in the first  ten  Contract  Years.
Beginning  in Contract  Year 11, the charge will be $.01 per $1,000 on a current
basis and $.03 per $1,000 on a  guaranteed  basis.  This charge will be based on
the Specified Amount and will be deducted monthly.                              

Reduced Charges for Eligible Groups                                             
The charges otherwise applicable may be reduced with respect to Contracts issued
to a class of associated individuals or to a trustee, employer or similar entity
where  Kansas City Life  anticipates  that the sales to the members of the class
will  result  in lower  than  normal  sales or  administrative  expenses.  These
reductions  will be made in  accordance  with our rules in effect at the time of
the  application  for a Contract.  The factors Kansas City Life will consider in
determining  the  eligibility of a particular  group for reduced charges and the
level of the  reduction  are as follows:  the nature of the  association  and it
organizational  framework, the method by which sales will be made to the members
of the class,  the  facility  with which  premiums  will be  collected  from the
associated  individuals  and  the  association   capabilities  with  respect  to
administrative tasks, the anticipated  persistency of the Contract,  the size of
the  class of  associated  individuals  and the  number  of years it has been in
existence and any other such circumstances which justify a reduction in sales or
administrative  expenses.  Any  reduction  will be  reasonable  and  will  apply
uniformly  to all  prospective  Contract  purchases in the class and will not be
unfairly discriminatory to the interest of any Contract holder.                 

Supplemental and/or Rider Benefits                                              
The following  optional benefits are available and may be added to the Contract.
Monthly charges for these optional benefits will be deducted from Contract Value
as part of the Monthly Deduction.  All of these benefits may not be available in
all states.                                                                     

Contract Split Option Rider                                           
Issue Ages:  20-75                                                    
     This  rider  allows  the  Owner  to split  the  Contract  equally  into two
     individual  policies,  one on the life of each  Insured.  This split option
     will be offered without evidence of insurability  under the conditions that
     the  request  is made as the  result of either  (1) the  divorce of the two
     Insureds;  or (2) as a result of a change in the Unlimited  Federal  Estate
     Tax marital  deduction  or a reduction  in the maximum  Federal  Estate Tax
     bracket rate to a rate below 25%.  Specific other  conditions  must also be
     met in order to  qualify.  When this  option  is  exercised,  the  existing
     Contract  will be  terminated.  The new  contracts  will  be  based  on the
     Insureds'  Age,  sex,  and risk class at the time of issue of the  original
     Contract.  This rider will  terminate  at the older  Insured's  age 80. The
     rider  will  also  terminate  if the Owner  elects  to keep the  Guaranteed
     Minimum Death Benefit Option in effect after it is determined  that funding
is not adequate to cover these rider charges.                         

Joint First to Die Term Life Insurance Rider                          
Issue Ages:  20-85                                                    
     This rider  covers the Insureds  under the  Contract  and  provides  yearly
     renewable  term coverage on the first Insured to die on or before the older
     Insured's age 100 and while this rider is in force. The coverage under this
     rider may be increased  (subject to insurability)  or decreased.  The Owner
     may also choose at issue a schedule for the coverage to decrease  annually.
     The  scheduled  decreases  may be based on the  percentage  of the coverage
     amount  or may be a flat  dollar  amount.  If this  rider is  elected,  the
   Guaranteed Minimum Death Benefit Option is not available on the Contract.

Joint Survivorship Four-Year Term Life Insurance Rider                
Issue Ages:  20-85                                                    
     This rider provides  four-year  level term insurance and expires four years
     after the effective date of the rider. The term insurance  provides a death
     benefit  payable at the death of the last  surviving  Insured.  The minimum
     coverage  is $100,000  and the  maximum  coverage is equal to the Total Sum
Insured.                                                              

     The rider will also  terminate if the Owner  elects to keep the  Guaranteed
     Minimum Death Benefit Option in effect after it is determined  that funding
is not adequate to cover these rider charges.                         

Bonus on Contract Value in the Variable Account                                 
A bonus  may be  credited  to the  Contract  on  each  Monthly  Anniversary  Day
following the Contract Date. The monthly bonus applies to Contracts with a Total
Sum  Insured of  $5,000,000  and above and equals an annual rate of .125% of the
Contract  Value in each  Subaccount  of the Variable  Account.  The bonus is not
guaranteed and will be paid at Kansas City Life's sole discretion.              
R-->Dates Referenced Herein   and   Documents Incorporated by Reference
This ‘485BPOS’ Filing    Date    Other Filings12/31/0024F-2NT,  N-30B-2,  NSAR-U8/29/00Filed on / Effective on:8/28/00485BPOS8/16/005/1/00485BPOS4/29/994/19/99485BPOS7/15/97S-6EL24/A8/25/958/2/95 List all Filings 
↑TopFiling Submission 0000948972-00-000006   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Sat, 29 Jul 08:36:39.1 GMT 


Life Insurance and Annuities | Kansas City Life Insurance Company























Log In






Products
Find An Agency

Company Information
Careers
Become An Agency













Term Life
Return of Premium Life
Universal Life
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Universal Life
Whole Life
Annuities







Life Insurance and Annuities


            Choosing the right financial product for your business or family can be confusing. You’ve probably at some time considered the question, "how does life insurance work?" Therefore, we’ve provided an easy-to-understand description of each product line we offer. We’ll be happy to provide you with all the details, including help with selecting the right product.
          











Term Life
Return of Premium Life
Universal Life
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Universal Life
Whole Life
Annuities





Term Life Insurance

Term life insurance provides the most coverage for the least cost initially, but expires over time and does not accrue cash value.  Read More






Return of Premium Life Insurance

Return of premium life offers consistent premiums, a guaranteed death benefit and 100 percent return of eligible premiums paid at the end of the policy’s term period.  Read More






Universal Life Insurance

A universal life policy offers you premium and death benefit flexibility along with a tax advantaged savings element that includes a guaranteed minimum interest rate.  Read More






Indexed Universal Life Insurance

A flexible premium universal life product with an indexed feature. An Indexed Universal Life policy (IUL) functions similarly to universal life; however, the client can choose to allocate their policy’s values into a Fixed Account or an Indexed Account. An IUL also supplies a floor that ensures your cash value will not decrease because you are not directly invested in the market.  Read More






Variable Universal Life Insurance*

Variable universal life insurance combines valuable life insurance protection with a variety of investment options to fit your individual financial needs. Read More

*Variable products offered through Sunset Financial Services, Inc., 3520 Broadway, Kansas City, MO 64111, 
                800-821-5529 (Home Office). 
                Sunset Financial Services is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Kansas City Life Insurance Company.







Whole Life Insurance

A whole life insurance policy can help you meet your financial goals by offering consistent premiums, a guaranteed death benefit and guaranteed cash value accumulation.  Read More






Annuities

Annuities provide tax-advantaged growth and can pay you a guaranteed income for life.  Read More












Products

Term Life
Universal Life
Return of Premium
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Life*
Whole Life
Annuities
Financial Tools


Company

About Us
Leadership
Heritage
Industry Ratings
Financials
Subsidiaries
News & Press




Find An Agency
Careers
Become An Agency
Contact Us
Site Map

© Kansas City Life Insurance Company 2013All rights reserved.
Twitter
Facebook







Careers | Kansas City Life Insurance Company























Log In






Products
Find An Agency

Company Information
Careers
Become An Agency















Careers

Thank you for your interest in Kansas City Life Insurance Company. Please select either the Home Office positions option for job openings at our Home Office in Kansas City, Mo., or select the agent and general agent option for more information about our career agency system.Search Home Office positions Search positions for agents and general agents (national)Read more about our benefits  Kansas City Life Insurance Company is committed to equal employment opportunities for all personnel regardless of race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin or disability. Equal opportunity includes, but is not limited to, hiring, training, promotion, demotion, transfer and discharge.

















Products

Term Life
Universal Life
Return of Premium
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Life*
Whole Life
Annuities
Financial Tools


Company

About Us
Leadership
Heritage
Industry Ratings
Financials
Subsidiaries
News & Press




Find An Agency
Careers
Become An Agency
Contact Us
Site Map

© Kansas City Life Insurance Company 2013All rights reserved.
Twitter
Facebook







Contact us | Kansas City Life Insurance Company























Log In






Products
Find An Agency

Company Information
Careers
Become An Agency



Contact Us
















Contact


                Call our toll-free number: 800-821-6164  
                
                Or mail us at:
                            
                Kansas City Life Insurance Company
                P.O. Box 219139
                Kansas City, MO 64121-9139

                Or email us by using the form below:
                




Select a contact subject

General Information
Policy Claims
Policy Changes
Policy Questions








Your Information
* indicates required information.
                            
                                To make changes to your policy, please register for our Customer Self-Service here. 
                                If you are already an existing member, please click here to access your account(s). 
                                If you would rather email changes, please fill in the following form to make changes. 
                                Thank you.
                            

 
First*
MI
Last*


Name











Address 1*





Address 2





City*





State*


Choose a State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
D.C.
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming




Zip Code*





Phone Number*





Fax Number





Email





Policy Number






First*
MI
Last*


Name of Insured












Month*
Day*
Year*


Date of Birth



January
February
March
April
May
June
July
August
September
October
November
December





1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31





2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012
2011
2010
2009
2008
2007
2006
2005
2004
2003
2002
2001
2000
1999
1998
1997
1996
1995
1994
1993
1992
1991
1990
1989
1988
1987
1986
1985
1984
1983
1982
1981
1980
1979
1978
1977
1976
1975
1974
1973
1972
1971
1970
1969
1968
1967
1966
1965
1964
1963
1962
1961
1960
1959
1958
1957
1956
1955
1954
1953
1952
1951
1950
1949
1948
1947
1946
1945
1944
1943
1942
1941
1940
1939
1938
1937
1936
1935
1934
1933
1932
1931
1930
1929
1928
1927
1926
1925
1924
1923
1922
1921
1920
1919
1918
1917
1916
1915
1914
1913
1912
1911
1910
1909
1908
1907
1906
1905
1904
1903
1902
1901
1900





                                    Comments*







Insured's Information
* indicates required information.
                            

First*
MI
Last*


Name of Insured












Month*
Day*
Year*


Date of Birth



January
February
March
April
May
June
July
August
September
October
November
December





1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31





2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012
2011
2010
2009
2008
2007
2006
2005
2004
2003
2002
2001
2000
1999
1998
1997
1996
1995
1994
1993
1992
1991
1990
1989
1988
1987
1986
1985
1984
1983
1982
1981
1980
1979
1978
1977
1976
1975
1974
1973
1972
1971
1970
1969
1968
1967
1966
1965
1964
1963
1962
1961
1960
1959
1958
1957
1956
1955
1954
1953
1952
1951
1950
1949
1948
1947
1946
1945
1944
1943
1942
1941
1940
1939
1938
1937
1936
1935
1934
1933
1932
1931
1930
1929
1928
1927
1926
1925
1924
1923
1922
1921
1920
1919
1918
1917
1916
1915
1914
1913
1912
1911
1910
1909
1908
1907
1906
1905
1904
1903
1902
1901
1900




Policy No(s)*








Month*
Day*
Year*


Date of Death



January
February
March
April
May
June
July
August
September
October
November
December





1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31





2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012
2011
2010
2009
2008
2007
2006
2005
2004
2003
2002
2001
2000
1999
1998
1997
1996
1995
1994
1993
1992
1991
1990
1989
1988
1987
1986
1985
1984
1983
1982
1981
1980
1979
1978
1977
1976
1975
1974
1973
1972
1971
1970
1969
1968
1967
1966
1965
1964
1963
1962
1961
1960
1959
1958
1957
1956
1955
1954
1953
1952
1951
1950
1949
1948
1947
1946
1945
1944
1943
1942
1941
1940
1939
1938
1937
1936
1935
1934
1933
1932
1931
1930
1929
1928
1927
1926
1925
1924
1923
1922
1921
1920
1919
1918
1917
1916
1915
1914
1913
1912
1911
1910
1909
1908
1907
1906
1905
1904
1903
1902
1901
1900




Cause of Death*



Natural
Accident




Your Information


First*
MI
Last*


Name











Relationship to Insured*



Spouse
Child
Grandchild
Niece/Nephew
Parent
Sibling
Policy Owner
Other




Are you a beneficiary of this policy?*



Yes
No




Address 1*





Address 2





City*





State*


Choose a State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
D.C.
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming




Zip Code*





Phone Number*





Fax Number





Email






                                    Comments*























Products

Term Life
Universal Life
Return of Premium
Indexed Universal Life
Variable Life*
Whole Life
Annuities
Financial Tools


Company

About Us
Leadership
Heritage
Industry Ratings
Financials
Subsidiaries
News & Press




Find An Agency
Careers
Become An Agency
Contact Us
Site Map

© Kansas City Life Insurance Company 2013All rights reserved.
Twitter
Facebook





